Undertakings 
<DATE1>  23 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Selections From CHINA TODAY: National Defense S&amp;T </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Selections From CHINA TODAY: National Defense S&amp;T </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Undertakings 

<F P=102> 93FE0922A BEIJING CHINA TODAY SERIES in Chinese Vol I, 1992 
pp 1-6, 62-64, 76-81, 108-110, 134-137, 147-148, 153-154, </F>

187-188, 195-279, 342-366, and 375-381, and Vol II, pp 62-87, 
87-99, 228-273, 274-288, 288-294, 426-427, 446. 
<F P=103> 93FE0922A </F>
<F P=104>  BEIJING CHINA TODAY SERIES </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese and 375-381, </F>
CSO 

  [Text] 
<H5>  Volume I </H5>
<H5>  Foreword </H5>
  "China Today: Scientific and Technological Undertakings of 
National Defense" is now published. It is a significant 
achievement in China's science and technology and is worth 
celebrating. 
  Defense S&amp;T is an important part of China's socialist 
modernization construction, but it is also an obscure field and 
people who devoted their hearts and minds to it are nameless 
heroes. With rich and detailed historical data, this book 
describes the development of China's defense S&amp;T from the 
beginning and celebrates the devotion and bravery of China's 
defense S&amp;T workers. 
  Directed by a decision of the Party Central Committee and 
the 
State Council, I have led and directed defense S&amp;T for a very 
long time. The publication of this book reminds me of the 
difficult early years. I am very pleased to see the book 
published and also feel that some problems still warrant our 
exploration and thought. 
  In recent history China has repeatedly suffered from 
imperialist aggression and abuse. It was the urgent desire of 
the Chinese people and many patriots that China grasp modern 
S&amp;T 
and establish a secure national defense. However, this could be 
achieved only in a socialist new China. Under the leadership of 
the Chinese Communist Party and the People's Government over the 
last 30 years, the defense S&amp;T enterprise in China, like 
other 
endeavors, enjoyed unprecedented development and made world 
renowned achievements. The industrious and courageous Chinese 
people, relying on their own intelligence and resources, built a 
complete defense S&amp;T system on the basis of a very backward 
economic and technological foundation of the old China. They 
have trained a high- quality defense S&amp;T team, accomplished 
historical missions, mastered an effective nuclear self-defense 
power, developed new models of conventional weapons, and made 
breakthroughs in the high-tech arena of aerospace. These 
achievements have elevated China to the forefront of the world 
in national and military stature and greatly improved China's 
international standing. This has served as a vivid manifestation 
of the superiority of socialism. 
  If there is one lesson to be learned from the achievements 
of 
the new China defense S&amp;T, it is that we should follow an 
independent, self-reliant path based on the national situation 
and reality in China. 
  (1) To ensure steady, sustained, and coordinated development 
in defense S&amp;T, we must adhere to centralized, unified 
leadership and, whilekeeping in mind the big picture of national 
defense development strategy, properly handle the relationship 
between economic and defense development and the relationship 
between S&amp;T modernization and modernization in industry, 
agriculture, and defense. After the birth of the New China, the 
Party Central Committee, the State Council, the Central Military 
Commission, and senior members of the Party, including Mao 
Zedong and Zhou Enlai, paid great attention to the role of 
S&amp;T 
in the development of the socialist economy and the 
establishment of a modern defense. In different periods of 
history and based on the changes of the international strategic 
situation and the defense needs and national economic ability, 
they formulated a series of effective policies and directions 
for China's defense S&amp;T development, and proposed 
programmatic 
goals and development plans. Later, under the unified leadership 
of the Party and the State, China took forceful action to build 
up research and testing facilities, organize an S&amp;T team, 
mobilize the national resources, and make a concerted push to 
master quickly the frontier technology of the atomic bombs, 
hydrogen bombs, guided missiles, and artificial satellites. 
These efforts have also laid a material and technological 
foundation for future development. Facts have shown that the 
Party Central Committee, while leading economic construction, 
has paid attention to defense and made defense S&amp;T 
development 
the main mission of defense modernization. The policy of 
concentrating the manpower and material and financial resources 
needed for prioritized construction was absolutely correct. 
  In a new historical period, the defense S&amp;T front 
adhered to 
the policy of reform and combining the military and civilian 
sectors and obtained major achievements and contributions to the 
national economy. The Party Central Committee, centered around 
Comrade Jiang Zemin, proposed the correct policy of paying 
attention to both economic development and defense development. 
China's defense S&amp;T will enjoy new successes as the nation's 
economic power becomes stronger. 
  (2) The basic policy for defense S&amp;T development is to 
adhere 
to self- reliance and to improve China's ability to develop 
defense items independently. China is a major socialist country 
but needs to fundamentally change its backward state. To elevate 
the S&amp;T standard and to achieve modernization, China cannot 
rely 
on others, so must do so with the intelligence and hard work of 
its own people. When China first began to develop its defense 
industry, the Party Central Committee put forth a policy of 
self-reliance supplemented by foreign aid. Because we have 
adhered to this correct policy, China's development of defense 
S&amp;T was not controlled by others and, despite changes in the 
international arena and blockades and sabotage coming from 
different directions, proceeded along an independent path. 
Adherence to self-reliance did not mean exclusion. We must try 
to get all the help possible, learn and absorb the advanced 
S&amp;T 
results in the world, and apply those successful experiences 
that suit China's situation. We have actively pursued foreign 
aid in the past, now we must make an extra effort to take 
advantage of the favorable reform and open policy and, on the 
basis of mutual benefits, broadly develop international 
cooperation and exchange, selectively introduce advanced 
technology and research facilities, improve the capability of 
domestic manufacturing, accelerate development, and develop 
defense S&amp;T on our own. With regard to foreign aid, however, 
we 
must keep a cool head and not harbor any unrealistic wishful 
thinking. History has proved that a backward nation is a nation 
that depends on and is controlled by others; we cannot buy 
China's modernization with money. To build a prosperous China 
and to achieve the Four Modernizations, we must rely on our own 
hard work. 
  (3) The policy of reform, openness, and combining military 
and civilian technology is necessary not only for the 
development of defense S&amp;T during peacetime, but is also a 
correct approach to improve China'sability in domestic 
development and overall efficiency. The issue of a 
military-civilian combination was raised in the early phase of 
China's defense S&amp;T construction. The military industry was 
asked to master two sets of skills so that they could deliver on 
the military production and at the same time apply the results 
of defense S&amp;T to the construction of the national economy 
and 
to the production of civilian products. After the Third Plenum 
of the Eleventh Party Central Committee, the defense S&amp;T 
industry adapted to the new situation of a reformed national 
economic and S&amp;T system. The defense industry has on the one 
hand adhered to the strategic policy centered on economic 
development, adjusted product structure, R&amp;D, and production 
and 
devoted the bulk of the resources to serve the national economic 
construction, and on the other hand consolidated its ranks, 
increased investments, improved technology reform, maintained a 
sensibly sized and structured modern defense S&amp;T force, and 
shouldered the mission to conquer problems in defense S&amp;T. 
China 
should continue to follow the principle of work division and 
accomplish major engineering R&amp;D tasks by combining the 
S&amp;T 
resources in defense and in other sectors of the country. The 
state should also take advantage of the strength and potential 
in the defense industry and emphasize the development of new, 
high-tech civilian engineering projects and products, and 
gradually establish a military- civilian defense S&amp;T system. 
  (4) An important basis for success in defense S&amp;T was to 
build a highly capable defense S&amp;T team strong in both theory 
and practice. China's defense S&amp;T workers love their 
motherland, 
socialism, and the Chinese Communist Party. They are also 
self-reliant, hard working, creative, cooperative, and selfless. 
They have not only created a golden age in defense modernization 
and material technology, but also cultivated a generation of 
leaders rich in spiritual culture. These results were achieved 
because the defense S&amp;T front adhered to the Party 
leadership, 
insisted on doing ideological and political work, implemented 
the Party's policy regarding intellectuals, insisted on learning 
Marxist- communism and the thoughts of Mao Zedong, and guided 
defense research with material dialectics. We must treasure this 
honorable tradition and foster the results in the new historical 
setting. Science and technology are the primary factors in 
developing productivity and S&amp;T workers are the pioneers for 
new 
productivity. We should establish a new trend in the society for 
respecting science, knowledge, and talent. We need to cultivate 
a new generation of S&amp;T talent in the defense industry and 
let 
the old generation of S&amp;T workers flourish. 
  (5) An important condition to accelerate the development of 
defense S&amp;T is to respect objective rules and to strengthen 
scientific management. Based on the reality in China and the 
nature of China's defense S&amp;T, a unified leadership system 
consisting of the Party Central Committee, the State Council, 
and the Central Military Commission was formed. The leadership 
management system combined research, production and application 
and made overall plans. The specific form of the large-scale 
defense S&amp;T organization was based on objective rules that 
the 
defense development must obey. This system has worked well for 
improving scientific management, eliminating scattering and 
repetition, improving the overall efficiency of S&amp;T 
investment, 
concentrating resources on major tasks, and accelerating the 
development of the defense industry. In today's new situation, 
defense S&amp;T has adapted to the big environment of national 
reform, learned from foreign experience, and pursued reform and 
investigation in a number of directions; some new experience has 
been gained. We also recognize that reform of the defense S&amp;T 
system must start from China's socialist economy. It must at 
once adapt to the requirement of planned commodity economy and 
conduct business according to the law of economics, and at the 
same time take into account the special nature of defense S&amp;T 
and use social benefits, i.e., national security interests as 
the criterion. The tendency to pursue pureeconomic interests 
should be prevented. In the practice of reform, the two aspects 
should be rationally combined so that a Chinese-style defense 
S&amp;T management system can be established, formalized, and 
institutionalized. 
  Today, a technological revolution characterized by new and 
high tech is swiftly growing in the world; it has become an 
increasingly important factor in gaging a country's national 
power and military might. People have increasingly recognized 
that science and technology is a form of productivity. The next 
10 years will be a crucial decade in revitalizing China. China's 
defense S&amp;T workers shoulder a grave historical 
responsibility 
of achieving the second step strategic goal of building up a 
national economy and social development. As an old soldier on 
the science and technology front, I expect and believe that 
comrades on the S&amp;T front, with their honorable tradition, 
must 
be able to foster the advantages and take the lead in creating 
new results in China's socialist Four Modernizations. 
  Nie Rongzheng 27 November 1991 
<H5>  Chapter II </H5>
<H5>  Section 1. Firmly Taking the Road of Self-Reliance </H5>
<H5>  Improving Product Quality and Implementing Regulations of 70 </H5>
Items for Industry 
  The "Great Leap Forward" of 1958 had a grave effect on the 
quality of military products. A number of military industries 
ignored product quality, blindly pursued value of production, 
operated without the rule of production and caused a widespread 
drop in military product quality. Aviation products were 
affected the most and not one aircraft was delivered over a 
period of three years because of failed quality. The Party 
Central Committee and the Central Military Commission were very 
disturbed by this. Having reviewed the product quality report of 
the Shenyang Airplane and Engine Plant by Minister Zhao Erlu 
[6392 1422 7120] of the First Ministry of Machine Building, the 
Central Military Commission called a special meeting of the 
standing committee members to hear more details from him. The 
Commission recognized the severity of the quality problem 
existed in the defense industry called for forceful action, and 
issued a clear policy of "quality first--increase quantity while 
maintaining quality. The Commission strongly rejected the 
erroneous viewpoint of pursuing quantity and production value 
without regard to quality and required all defense industries to 
adhere to the quality policy. In July and August of the same 
year the Party Central Committee approved and forwarded two 
reports by He Long [7729 7893] on defense industry production 
and construction and required the relevant departments and 
enterprises to ensure product quality by working on their 
ideology, technical management, production organization, and 
material and product inspection. The factories were told to 
reject all unqualified materials even if it meant a stoppage in 
production; the military was also ordered to reject unqualified 
products. Subsequently, the Secretariat of the Party Central 
Committee held special discussions on the quality of military 
products and demanded the leaders of provinces, municipalities, 
departments, and plants, mines and enterprises to strengthen 
quality inspection and to propose improvement measures. 
  In order to turn around the grave situation of poor quality 
in capital construction and military products, the Party Central 
Committee and the Central Military Commission authorized 
Director He Long of the Defense Industrial Commission to conduct 
a defense ministry/bureau/enterprise three-tier cadre conference 
in December 1960 to rectify the product quality problem. In the 
meeting, He Long summarized the 11-year experience of defense 
industry development and advocated continued readjustment of 
cadre ideology and product quality. He urged the attendants to 
adhere to the defense industry policies set by the Party Central 
Committee and the Central Military Commission and to contribute 
to the defense mission. This conference had a positive effect on 
the rectification of the chaotic management in the defense 
enterprises and the pompous working style and helped to 
establish the concept of quality first. 
  The three-tier cadre conference passed the "Instructions for 
starting a rectification campaign in the defense industry." 
Beginning in late January 1961, a 10-month rectification 
campaign centered on product quality was waged in the defense 
industry from the top down. Through this campaign, technology 
management systems were restored and improved, product quality 
gradually turned around, and the morale of the staff also 
changed significantly. 
  In order to overcome the confusion caused by the "Great Leap 
Forward" in many enterprises, including the defense industries, 
to guide the enterprises back to the right track, and to 
systematically consolidate the experience and lessons in 
leadership and enterprise management, the "R&amp;D 14" was 
formulated. In addition, Deng Xiaoping [6772 1420 1627], Li 
Fuchun [2621 1381 2504], and Bo Yibo [5631 0001 3134] organized 
an extensive survey of industrial workers and formulated the 
"Regulations for State-Owned Industries and Enterprises (Draft)" 
(known as "Industry 70" for short). This document was signed by 
Mao Zedong on 16 September 1961 and put into trial 
implementation. This regulation required the enterprises to 
practice the factory manager responsibility system under the 
party committee. The chief engineer took full responsibility for 
the technical work. The enterprises were to make quality 
assurance and improvement their top priority, and the test 
manufacture and production of new products must be done 
following the regulations. The trial implementation of this 
regulation was very important for the policy of "readjustment, 
enforcement, strengthening, and elevating," for improving the 
management of enterprises, for restoring the normal order of 
production, for elevating the management standards, and for 
upgrading the product quality. 
<H5>  Adjusting the Overall Arrangements and Building Up the Third </H5>
Line (Inland Area) 
  The three-line construction began in the mid-1960s in China. 
It was a vital action taken to protect the national security and 
the smooth progress of economic development and to improve the 
industrial layout for a possible war of invasion when China was 
faced with a hostile international environment. In May and June 
1964, the Party Central Committee made a strategic decision to 
"make strategic preparation and strengthen the construction of 
the three lines." It was decided that resources would be 
concentrated for the construction of inland and new 
constructions would be placed inland. The defense industry was 
also asked to construct the three lines and to begin survey and 
design immediately. The Office of Defense Industry immediately 
called a conference to study the preparation for three-line 
construction. It was decided that the readjustment of one line 
would be done according to the principles of small scale, 
specialization, and cooperation; resources would be put together 
for the construction of the three lines. After the conference, 
the Office of Defense Industry organized the various defense 
ministries and conducted field survey and site selection in ten 
regions on the three lines; the activity was led by Zhao Erlu. 
On this basis, Director Luo Ruiqing [5012 3843 0615] submitted a 
report entitled "New Defense Industry Projects in Second-line 
and Third-line Regions" to the Party Central Committee in 
February 1965. In this report Luo put forth the principles and 
plans for three-line construction in the defenseindustry. Luo's 
report was approved by the Central Committee in March of that 
year; hence began the all-out construction of the three lines in 
the defense industry. 
  On the whole, the construction of the three lines improved 
the strategic layout of the defense S&amp;T industry, built a 
number 
of behind-the-line bases for large-scale production and 
research, and developed and produced weapons urgently needed by 
the troops. The three-line construction was therefore very 
important for battle readiness, reinforcing defense, and 
developing the economy, S&amp;T, and culture of the mountainous 
inland. In the construction of the three lines, all the workers 
fostered the honorable tradition of enduring hardship and 
devoting selflessly and worked hard to make contributions. 
However, the three-line construction was also hampered by an 
excessively large scope and long line, diffused sites, 
uncoordinated projects and errors; these problems caused severe 
difficulties in production, research, and staff's lives. Since 
1983, the state has gradually made planned and systematic 
readjustments to the construction projects in the three-line 
regions for better efficiency in serving the defense development 
and the national economy. 
  In the first half of the 1960s, the defense industry in 
China 
has, under the leadership of the Chinese Communist Party, 
adhered to the policy of self-reliance and overcame many 
difficulties by hard work. They made quick breakthroughs in the 
technology of the atomic bomb and guided missiles, made 
considerable progress in conventional weapons, established 
several research institutes and experimental bases, unified the 
management system for defense industries and universities, made 
a start in forming a national network of research, production, 
testing, and education, and had more than 100,000 people working 
on frontier technologies in defense and conventional weapons. 
These developments laid a solid foundation for further progress 
in the defense S&amp;T enterprise. In the meantime, the Party's 
policy toward intellectuals was readjusted and adhered to, and 
the errors in the "Great Leap Forward" and the anti-rightists 
movement were corrected. S&amp;T workers were trusted 
politically, 
relied upon in the work, and taken care of in their lives. Their 
initiative and creativity were fostered and a promising new 
situation for producing results and talent had arrived. People 
praised this period as the "golden age" of China's defense 
S&amp;T. 
<H5>  Section 3. Advancement of Conventional Arms and Equipment </H5>
From Copy Production To Independent Development 
  Since 1960, China has concentrated its resources to achieve 
breakthroughs in frontier technologies in defense and has 
developed conventional weapons by relying on itself. Departments 
in defense and numerous scientists and technical staff 
diligently adhered to the policy decision by the Central 
Military Commission that China should strengthen its weaknesses 
in conventional weapons and at the same time step up the effort 
to develop and improve new weapons. After a few years, the 
quality of China's conventional weapons has improved, the 
variety has increased, the performance has improved, and the 
compatibility has also improved. By 1965, 50 percent of the 
products approved by the Military Product Typing Committee of 
the State Council were designed by the Chinese. This signaled 
that China's conventional weapon development has moved from 
copying to independent development. 
<H5>  (1) Better Progress Made in Development of Army Weapons </H5>
Systems and Equipment 
  In the late 1950s, weapons research institutes were 
established. Havingmastered emulation techniques, China 
gradually began its own weapons development projects. In 1960 
the expanded Central Military Commission proposed a policy to 
improve the firepower, attack capability, defense capability, 
and mobility of army weapons. Based on this, the Defense Science 
Commission and the Office of Defense Industries strengthened 
China's ability to develop indigenous weapons while at the same 
time improved existing systems. By the mid-1960s, China had not 
only completed the development of systems it urgently needed, 
but also developed independently within a very short time a 
series of new weapons systems meeting Chinese needs. 
  In 1958, in order to deal with high-altitude hostile 
aircraft, China introduced from the Soviet Union medium to 
high-altitude, surface-to-air missiles and named the copied 
version "Hong Qi (Red Flag) No. 1" (HQ-1). In July l958, Peng 
Dehuai [1756 1795 2037) emphasized in the expanded Central 
Military Commission meeting that: "We must actively engage in 
the research of surface-to-air missiles." In 1960, after the 
Soviet Union recalled their experts in China, Nie Rongzheng 
called for the production of the HQ-1 without outside help. In 
April 1962, Nie further pointed out in a business meeting of the 
Military Science Commission that, to master the technology of 
the HQ-1, China must first conduct reverse engineering. To do 
so, the Party Central Committee decided to have the Fifth 
Academy and the Third Ministry of Machine Building take the 
lead. It also organized close to 30 units in China to assume the 
R&amp;D and production duties for thousands of materials and 
components. Bo Yibo was specifically responsible for making sure 
that the tasks were coordinated and carried out. In 1964, the 
HQ-1 surface-to-air missile was successfully copied. This 
indicated that China had established the emulation and 
fabrication capability and had laid the foundation for 
independent development of the new surface-to-air missiles. 
  Light anti-aircraft artillery was important and they were 
effective weapons for low-altitude air defense at the time. 
However, the anti- aircraft artillery copied from the Soviet 
Union was very bulky and suffered from poor mobility. There were 
many complaints from the troops and improvements were sorely 
needed. In 1965, a twin 37mm anti-aircraft gun was successfully 
developed, based on the single-barrel 37mm Soviet model. This 
weapon played a major role in aiding Vietnam against the United 
States. 
  In order to improve the mobile firepower of the artillery, 
China's Central Military Commission made the rocket a priority 
as early as 1958. In 1963, the artillery and the Third Ministry 
of Machine Building successfully developed China's first 
generation of 107mm and 130mm rockets. In actual combat these 
weapons proved to be very powerful and were widely praised by 
the troops. In 1961, in a Central Military Commission meeting on 
equipment systems, new mortars were chosen to be a high priority 
item for development. A cooperative effort by the Chinese 
artillery and the Fifth Ministry of Machine Building led to the 
development of 60mm and 120mm mortars in the mid-1960s. This was 
followed by efforts to reduce the weight of the weapons. 
  In order to satisfy the complex weather and terrain 
conditions of China and the combat requirements in different 
regions, Peng Dehuai proposed in 1958 that China emphasize 
medium and light tanks, amphibious tanks, and armored vehicles. 
In 1959 the Central Military Commission decided that tank 
development should stress medium and light models and there 
should also be a corresponding development effort for amphibious 
tanks. In the mid-1960s, China developed light tanks, amphibious 
tanks, and armored vehicles with tracks suitable for fighting in 
China's rice patties, rivers, lakes, mountains, and coasts. 
These weapons improved the mobility of tanks and mechanized 
troops in south China and were an important milestone toward 
domestically manufactured weapons systems forChina's armored 
troops. 
  The Central Military Commission requested a weight reduction 
for the army weapons and ordered design improvement and 
simplification for the unwieldy weapons copied from the Soviet 
Union. Based on these requests, the weapon industry department 
developed in 1963 a 7.62mm automatic rifle that combined the 
roles of an assault rifle and a semiautomatic rifle. It also 
developed a silenced assault rifle for surveillance units. Both 
weapons were very popular among the troops. 
<H5>  (2) Copy Production of Military Aircraft Turned Into </H5>
Independent Development 
  In a 1960 expanded meeting of the Central Military 
Commission, a development policy was put forth for the Chinese 
Air Force. The policy emphasized high-altitude, high-speed 
fighters. It required a performance improvement of the Jian-6 (a 
copy of the MIG-19) followed by a trial development of the 
Jian-7 (a copy of the MIG-21). Scientists and technical staff at 
the Sixth Academy and the Third Ministry of Machine Building 
heeded the principle of "first master the technology, then 
gradually design our own." They worked hard to solve the quality 
problems in copying the Soviet models and began to develop 
China's own military aircraft. 
  In early 1961, the Office of Defense Industries decided to 
reproduce the Jian-6 aircraft that was plagued with quality 
problems. After 2 years of hard work, the quality problems were 
solved in 1963. For this, the Central Military Commission 
congratulated the workers in a letter that said: "This advance 
in China's defense capability is to be celebrated. It also marks 
a turning point in China's aerospace industry." By copying the 
Jian-6, China mastered the entire manufacturing technology of 
supersonic fighters and elevated its level of aircraft 
production. In 1964, the design for the Pili-1 air-to-air 
missile, to be used on the Jian-6, was finalized. 
  Before China began copying the Jian-7 high-altitude, 
high-speed fighter, Lo Ruiqing demanded that the Sixth Academy 
devote its major technical resources to the MIG-21 technology. 
Because of the thorough effort, the copying of the Jian-7 was 
completed ahead of schedule in June 1967. The copying of the 
Jian-7 laid down a sound foundation for independent design and 
production of new fighters. After research, production, and 
almost a year of planning by the user department, a report 
entitled "Proposal To Develop New Fighters" was submitted to the 
Central Military Commission by the Office of Defense Industries 
and the Defense Science Commission in April 1965. The proposal 
was approved by Lo Ruiqing in May and the effort to 
independently develop new high-altitude, high-speed fighters 
began subsequently. 
  In order to meet the needs of the Air Force, China also 
began 
the development of attack aircraft. In as early as March 1958, 
Air Force commander Liu Yalou [0491 0068 2869] raised the need 
for an advanced attack aircraft. With the approval of then 
Deputy Chief of Staff Chen Geng [7115 6342], work was initiated 
to develop the supersonic Qiang-5. The preliminary design was 
finalized at the end of 1965. The Qiang-5 attack aircraft was 
designed and developed by the Chinese themselves. It was a 
durable, high-performance aircraft and was widely used in the 
Chinese Air Force. Its successful development was highly 
significant to China's national defense. 
<H5>  (3) Naval Vessels Entering the Period of Overall Copy </H5>
Production 
  Beginning in the 1960s, China entered a phase of 
across-the-board copying of naval vessels based on manufacturing 
transfer. In Septemberand October 1960, the expanded meeting of 
the Central Military Commission specifically put forth a naval 
development policy based on submarine and fast attack craft. In 
1962, Nie Rongzheng pointed out in a briefing by the Seventh 
Academy that the R&amp;D mission of the Academy for the next 5 
years 
should be concentrated mainly on the development of torpedo 
boats, torpedo submarines, and torpedoes. In September 1963, Luo 
Ruiqing stated in his report to the Central Committee regarding 
"Some issues in the shipbuilding industry," that, in the next 
few years, China should first work on torpedo boats, submarines, 
and torpedoes, then on guided missile submarines, missile boats, 
and ship-to-ship guided missiles. Based on that, the Defense 
Science Commission and the Defense Industrial Commission 
organized an effort to develop torpedo boats, submarines, and 
torpedoes and to copy the manufacturing of foreign boats in 
China. An effort was also made to design medium and small-sized 
surface vessels. After a few years of work, China succeeded in 
developing its own torpedo boat in 1965. These boats were 
urgently needed for coastal operations at the time and they were 
developed using Chinese materials and domestic facilities. 
Medium-sized diesel-powered torpedo submarines were also 
transferred and produced in the same year and put into service. 
In 1966, China produced its first gas torpedo. While 
concentrating on the development of torpedo boats, submarines, 
and torpedoes, China also worked on guided missile submarines, 
missile boats, and ship-to-ship guided missiles. Efforts were 
made to copy the manufacturing process and to use domestic 
materials and equipment. The problem of welding special steel 
and the problem of cavitation erosion of the propellers were 
solved. The assembly and production of small missile boats, 
large missile boats and large guided missile submarines were 
successfully developed. Work also began on the improvement and 
modification of submarines. Based on instructions from Nie 
Rongzheng to prioritize the copying of naval defense missiles, 
the Defense Science Commission devoted its resources to copy the 
Shangyou-1 ship-to-ship missile in 1964. 
  In this period China also developed anti-submarine escort 
vessels and gunboat escort, began the preparation for developing 
a nuclear powered submarine and guided missile destroyers, and 
initiated studies of medium-sized torpedo submarines. 
<H5>  (4) Military Electronic Equipment Extricated Basically From </H5>
Copy Production Phase 
  China's radio electronics technology had a very weak base 
and 
could not satisfy the needs for developing border technology and 
conventional weapons. For this reason, considerable attention 
was given by the Central Committee and the Central Military 
Commission to the development of defense electronics. In August 
1958, after the expanded meeting of the Politburo met and 
discussed the "Second 5-Year Plan," Nie Rongzheng wrote a letter 
to the Central Committee leadership and recommended that 
attention be given to the study and production of radio 
electronics in future planning for capital construction and 
facilities. In November 1959, the Central Military Commission 
stated in a report to the Central Committee on the development 
plan for the last 3 years of the Second 5-Year Plan, that "radio 
electronics is the weakest link in China's defense industry. The 
original allocation for 1960-1962 must be increased." In 1960, 
the Central Military Commission again set a specific policy for 
developing electronics technology. With the attention of the 
Central Committee and the Central Military Commission and the 
gradual establishment of research institutes, China's defense 
electronics developed quickly. It basically outgrew the copying 
phase and began to stand on its own. By the mid-1960s, China's 
defense electronics not only satisfied the need for developing 
the "two bombs" and other urgently needed conventional weapons, 
but also made some breakthroughs in radar, communications, and 
electronic computers. 
  To ensure that China's first atomic bomb exploded in 1964, 
R&amp;D departments finished the development of control and test 
equipment in time and provided various radiation detection 
instruments. In 1965, China successfully copied the construction 
of a surface-to-air guided missile station. 
  In order to improve the anti-jamming ability of air defense 
radar and the detection of hostile aircraft in mountains, 
jungles, rain, and in clouds, China developed its own 
low-altitude warning radar and height-finder radar in 1963. In 
1964, China improved the performance of its gunsight radars and 
airborne firing radar in terms of counter-surveillance and 
counter-jamming ability. These improvements were very important 
for air combat. 
  The continuous development of semiconductors led to the 
miniaturization of defense electronics and promoted the 
transition from first-generation to second-generation 
electronics. In order to improve the mobility of troops, field 
communications equipment used extensively by military units up 
to the division level were miniaturized. Some semiconductor 
tactical radio stations were also developed. In the area of 
large short-wave communications equipment, single-sideband 
technology was mastered and several single-sideband short-wave 
stations were built. Considerable results were also obtained in 
multichannel communications. Wired radios, microwave relay, and 
troposphere scattering generators came on the scene. These 
instruments improved defense communications capabilities. By 
1965, China had developed some semiconductor computers and thus 
entered the second generation of defense electronics. 
<H5>  Chapter III </H5>
<H5>  Section 2. Breakthroughs in the Most Advanced Defense </H5>
Technology 
<H5>  (3) Successful Development of the Nuclear-Powered Torpedo </H5>
Submarine 
  The development of the guided missile nuclear submarine was 
approved by the Central Committee in June 1958. A 3-year effort 
produced some initial results in the hull design and in the 
nuclear power plant. In March 1963, the Central Special 
Committee decided to put the project on hold because of 
temporary difficulties in the national economy and a lack of 
research resources. However, a portion of the research effort 
was retained to work on technological breakthroughs. In the 
mid-1960s the national economy improved and the Central Special 
Committee decided in March 1965 to reinstate the project as a 
national project and to launch a full-scale R&amp;D effort. It 
also 
asked the Second Ministry of Machine Building to complete a 
land-based reactor by 1970 as an intermediate step toward a 
nuclear-powered submarine. The approach was to verify the 
nuclear reactor first on land and then to install it on the 
submarine. In order to shorten the development time for the 
complicated technology of guided missile nuclear submarine, the 
Central Special Committee decided in August of the same year 
that there would be two phases in the development. The first 
step was to develop a nuclear torpedo submarine and to solve 
major technological problems of a nuclear-powered submarine and 
an anti-submarine torpedo. The second step would be to develop a 
guided missile nuclear submarine and to solve the key technology 
for a submarine-to-land guided missile and its launch system. 
The Central Special Committee further decided that the first 
nuclear torpedo submarine should have its maiden voyage in 1972. 
The submarine should meet all the major tactical requirements so 
that it could be delivered to the Navy as a warship. The Central 
Special Committee demanded a cooperative and coordinated effort 
from the participating departments and committees of the State 
Council so that the nuclear submarine could be developed 
expediently. 
  In 1967 the Defense Science Commission organized and 
evaluated the hull design for the nuclear torpedo submarine 
based on tactical andtechnical requirements approved by the 
Central Military Commission. The nuclear submarine technology 
was complex and required broad cooperation. In order to satisfy 
the equipment needs of this major engineering project so that 
the development could proceed in a timely fashion, the Central 
Special Committee required the various departments to treat the 
development of instruments and equipment of the nuclear 
submarine as a national priority. All business was conducted 
according to the document issued by the Central Special 
Committee for the development of the atomic bomb: "Regulations 
for the Development of Atomic Energy Devices and Instruments." 
In May of that year, the Central Special Committee further 
specified that equipment urgently needed in the development of 
the nuclear submarine should be provided in a timely manner by 
the State Planning Commission, the Ministry of Materials, and 
other relevant departments. These departments responded to all 
the needs and often made special efforts beyond their regular 
operations to solve the coordination problem. Together with the 
Office of Defense Industries, the Defense Science Commission 
also held a number of large coordination meetings. In the summer 
of 1967, Liu Huaqing [0491 5478 3237] chaired a large 
coordination meeting attended by several hundred officers and 
technical cadres of plants and research institutes. Nie 
Rongzheng spoke and asked the cadres to work hard for the 
development of the nuclear torpedo submarine for the great cause 
of national defense. Later, the State Planning Commission and 
the Office of Defense Industries also organized a development 
effort for equipment systems and new materials. They organized 
more than 1,600 plants, giving the submarine development effort 
strong support. 
  In order to strengthen the coordination and organization, 
the 
Central Military Commission approved the establishment of the 
Nuclear Submarine Engineering Office under the Defense Science 
Commission in February 1968. In October 1969, the State Council 
and the Central Military Commission also decided to form a 
Nuclear Submarine Engineering Leadership Group under their 
supervision. Offices were established under the group to take 
care of day-to-day business. Various industrial ministries, 
research institutes, provinces, municipalities, and military 
regions also formed their own offices or groups for nuclear 
submarine engineering. A top-down chain of command was therefore 
established. Organizationally, the State Council and the Central 
Military Commission's Nuclear Submarine Engineering Leadership 
Group led the various research departments, manufacturing 
plants, and universities in conducting the development project. 
Problems that arose in the tests were addressed by timely 
inspection and coordination. The quality and progress of the 
nuclear submarine development were solidly guaranteed. 
  Based on the needs for ocean tests and requirements of the 
associated weapons systems, the Central Special Committee 
approved the establishment of three test fields for torpedoes, 
underwater sound, and submarine-to-land guided missiles. The 
State Council and the Central Military Commission decided to 
include the building of a dual-plane, self-guided anti-submarine 
torpedo as part of the nuclear submarine engineering project and 
gave it a high priority. With the hard work of all the 
participants, the torpedo plant and the three test sites were 
built and began to assume production and test missions. 
  Construction of the nuclear submarine assembly plant and the 
land-based nuclear reactor was vital to the development 
schedule. Mao Zedong signed two telegrams in 1968 and 1969, 
respectively, ordering the Shenyang Military Region to support 
the construction of the nuclear submarine general assembly plant 
and the Chengdu Military Region to lead the construction of the 
land-based nuclear reactor. Deputy Commander Jiang Yonghui [3068 
2340 6540] and Zhang Fengxian [1728 1496 0341] led their troops 
working at the construction site around the clock and finished 
the job as required. The land-based nuclear reactor was also 
built aheadof schedule and was completed in April 1970. 
  The power test of the land-based reactor involved safety and 
quality issues and was therefore a key project. In July 1970, 
before the onset of testing, Zhou Enlai [0719 1869 0171] invited 
the major players of the reactor project to Beijing for a 
briefing. Also invited were experts from the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building and Qinghua University. Zhou approved the test 
and, heeding the experts' recommendations, requested preparation 
for possible accident scenarios. The power was to be raised in 
steps and an expert group approved by Zhou was sent to the test 
site. The power test went smoothly and the test data showed that 
the overall design of the nuclear power plant was successful and 
the device was ready to install on the submarine. 
  In April 1971 China's first nuclear submarine began a series 
of dock tests. On 16 June 1971 the Central Special Committee 
reviewed the preparation data for the reactor startup test and 
the sailing test. The Committee decided that, for the first 
tests, work must proceed in stages, following the order of 
dockside tests, sailing tests,long- distance sailing tests, and 
deep-water tests." Following the orders of the Committee, the 
Nuclear Submarine Test Leadership Group carefully organized the 
staged tests. The dockside test and sailing test were 
accomplished in August 1971 and April 1974, respectively. Test 
results showed that the torpedo submarine had a high cruising 
speed under water, a long range, and good concealment. The 
design and construction of the submarine were both sound and the 
vessel was ready for delivery to the Navy. 
<H5>  Chapter IV </H5>
<H5>  Section 2. Concentrating Efforts To Fulfill the "Three </H5>
Grasps" Task 
  In order to accomplish breakthroughs in frontier defense 
technology, the Central Committee, the Central Military 
Commission, and the Central Special Committee decided on 18 
September 1977 that resources must be concentrated on three 
priority missions: the intercontinental ballistic missile 
(ICBM), the submarine-to-land guided missile, and the 
communications satellite. This important policy decision gave 
defense S&amp;T a tremendous boost. The completion of the three 
missions also promoted the development of conventional weapons 
and other projects. 
<H5>  (1) Oceanic Instrumentation Fleet Build-Up </H5>
  Conducting a full range of flight tests for the ICBM and to 
develop space technology required a ship-based mobile tracking 
and measurement system on the ocean. In August 1965 Zhou Enlai 
chaired a Central Special Committee meeting and decided that the 
Defense Science Commission should come up with a specific plan. 
In July 1967 the Defense Science Commission invited the general 
staff department, the Office of Defense Industries, the Navy, 
the Chinese Academy of Sciences, relevant industrial ministries, 
and research institutes to study and propose a development plan 
for an oceanic instrumentation fleet. In view of the need to 
understand the hydraulic, meteorological, and geological 
situation of the test area and the need to conduct escort 
operations, it was recommended that escort and supply vessels be 
developed simultaneously with the oceanic instrumentation fleet. 
In June 1968 Mao Zedong, Zhou Enlai, and the Central Military 
Commission approved the principle of the proposed plan. The 
Defense Science Commission immediately organized the Seventh 
Academy and the Northwest Joint Missile Test Base to begin the 
overall design for the survey vessel. The plan was submitted to 
the State Council and the Central Military Commission in July 
1970. In December 1970 Zhou Enlai chaired a Central Special 
Committee meeting, in which the project was classified as 
anational priority project. Also approved in the meeting was the 
formation of an oceanic instrumentation fleet engineering 
leading group consisting of leaders from participating 
departments and military services, to enhance the supervision of 
the engineering development. However, due to the interference by 
the "Great Cultural Revolution," the development effort was 
thwarted. 
  In April 1972, on behalf of Zhou Enlai, Ye Jianying [0673 
0494 5391] called a military committee working conference to 
review the progress. Zhang Chunchiao [1728 2504 2890) stated in 
the meeting that Shanghai would have difficulty in shouldering 
the bulk of the ship building task. Ye stressed that the project 
could not possibly be halted and work must proceed despite 
difficulties. The conference decided that the survey vessel 
development would push on and the scope of the Phase I 
engineering would be six vessels of five different models, most 
of them would be built in the Shanghai region. Later, due to 
changes of measurement procedures in the ocean target zone and 
for added assurance, six additional vessels were added. In 1973 
Zhou Enlai approved the revised development report for the 
survey vessels, clarified the guiding principles, and ordered 
work division among the various systems. Zhou decided that the 
oceanic instrumentation fleet engineering leading group should 
be supervised directly by the State Council and the Central 
Military Commission. Zhou Xihan [0719 1585 3352] was appointed 
group leader, and Qian Xuesen [6929 1331 2773] and Yu Qiuli 
[0151 4428 6849] were appointed deputy group leaders; the office 
was located in the Navy. The leadership group and its office 
took command and after extensive study and discussion 
established a rational, general system plan for assigning tasks. 
By 1975, different ship models were under construction. Survey 
ship bases were also under construction. In November 1976 the 
State Council and the Central Military Commission decided to 
eliminate the oceanic instrumentation fleet engineering leading 
group; its office in the Navy was moved to the Defense Science 
Commission and the development task was given to the Defense 
Science Commission. In September 1977, Zhang Aiping [1728 1947 
5493] and Qian Xuesen chaired a coordinating meeting in 
Shanghai. They asked for an accelerated development and 
construction schedule for the survey vessels and specified that 
two of the vessels should complete their test run, special 
equipment installation, and at-sea coordination by the end of 
1979. They demanded that the development units pledge and 
guarantee the completion of the assigned mission. The 
departments involved in the project then took some forceful 
measures and devoted great effort to technological breakthroughs 
in key equipment and quality assurance. A liaison group of the 
Defense Science Commission was stationed in Shanghai to 
coordinate with the Fourth, Sixth, and Seventh Ministries of 
Machine Building, and with the municipality of Shanghai for 
intensive on-location monitoring of the project progress. In 
July 1979, the Defense Science Commission held another 
coordination meeting in Shanghai, this time chaired by Li Yaowen 
[2621 5069 2429] and Chen Bing [7115 1755], to further solve the 
problems in special equipment installation. In the meantime, 
supervision was intensified, planning was made more intensive, 
and system engineering methods were used for on- site 
organization in the installation effort. All the tasks were 
accomplished according to the master plan. In October 1979, 
Zhang Aiping, Chen Bing, and Qian Xuesen joined other leaders 
from the First, Fourth, Sixth, and Seventh Ministries of Machine 
Building, the Shanghai Office of Defense Engineering, and the 
survey vessel base, to inspect the progress of construction in 
Shanghai. Zhang Aiping held an on-site meeting for the Central 
Special Committee and made decisions on a number of relevant 
issues. These included verification of equipment quality, 
improvement of reliability, problems with equipment systems and 
their installation aboard ship, spare parts and components, and 
command organization for overall communications and off-shore 
tests. With the coordinated effort, equipment was installed and 
tested and the all-shipcoordination and flight calibration were 
all completed by the end of the same year. The performance 
basically satisfied the requirements for the tactical and 
technical mission. By 1980, the development tasks were completed 
for two survey ships (Yuanwang-1 and Yuanwang-2), one research 
vessel (Xiangyanghong-10), and three each of rescue vessels, 
tugs, and supply ships. A total of 12 ships of five different 
models were built. The survey vessels were China's first 
generation of ocean survey and tracking stations. The other 
ships were also China's first-generation oceanic instrumentation 
vessels. Their overall performance and major equipment were the 
most advanced in China at the time. The establishment of the 
oceanic instrumentation fleet made China the fourth country in 
the world, after the United States, the Soviet Union, and 
France, to have an ocean survey and tracking capability. It 
formed a land-sea communications network for measurement and 
monitoring and provided a good tracking and monitoring system 
for the development of the three high-priority missions and 
other aerospace flight tests. It has contributed to China's 
development of its frontier defense technology. 
<H5>  (6) Development of Nuclear-Powered Missile Submarine </H5>
  Based on the decision of the Central Special Committee to 
first develop the nuclear torpedo submarine and then develop the 
guided missile submarine, the study of the overall design for 
the guided missile submarine and submarine-to-land missile 
system began shortly after initial results were obtained in the 
nuclear torpedo submarine project. In 1969 the State Planning 
Commission, the Office of Defense Industries, and the Defense 
Science Commission made some specific assignments for the guided 
missile submarine project. The Seventh Academy was assigned to 
develop the missile bay and the launch device, the Second 
Ministry of Machine Building was picked to design and build the 
nuclear power device, and the Seventh Ministry of Machine 
Building was given the task of developing the submarine-to-land 
guided missile. Other participants in the submarine weapons 
system development included the First and Fourth Ministries of 
Machine Building, 15 other departments and institutes, 24 
provinces and municipalities, and some 2,000 plants and research 
laboratories. In 1970 the construction of the first guided 
missile nuclear submarine began but was hampered by the "Great 
Cultural Revolution." In addition, because of the high degree of 
technical difficulty in developing the submarine-to-land guided 
missile and the launch system, there were many technical 
obstacles and progress was slow. In 1977, after reorganization, 
the development project returned to normal and progress 
accelerated. In the development process, attention was 
preferentially given to the design and construction of the 
submarine and not enough attention was given to the torpedo, 
resulting in a void in the weapon system. Deng Xiaoping [6772 
1420 1627] stressed repeatedly that the nuclear submarine alone 
was not a weapon. Because of this, Zhang Aiping rigorously 
supervised work on the submarine and the torpedo, and paid 
special attention to the quality problems encountered in the 
project. In 1983, the first submarine was completed and 
delivered to the Navy for training use. Key technologies in the 
submarine-to-land guided missile system and its installation 
were subsequently solved. Launching tests of model missiles from 
the nuclear submarine were conducted and succeeded, proving that 
the overall design was correct and that the submarine, missile, 
and launching system were compatible. With this, China became 
the fifth nation in the world to have a guided missile nuclear 
submarine. 
<H5>  Section 3 </H5>
<H5>  (3) Improving the First Generation of Naval Vessels </H5>
  In 1977 the Central Military Commission decided that the 
development ofthe Navy equipment should still be focused on the 
submarine, guided missile boats, anti-ship missiles, and 
torpedoes. In order to improve existing vessels, the Central 
Military Commission decided in 1978 that the quality of nuclear 
torpedo submarines, and destroyers, mid-sized torpedo 
submarines, large missile boats, and anti-submarine escorts 
should be improved and the systems should be made more 
compatible. In November 1978, the Central Military Commission 
approved the formation of an engineering leadership group for 
the above five types of vessels and assigned Zheng Hantao [6774 
3352 3447] to be the group leader (later replaced by Fan Mohan 
[5400 1970 7281] in March 1981.) After several years of work, 
the upgrading of the five types of vessels produced significant 
results. Several hundred upgrading and technical breakthrough 
tasks proposed in 1979 were all completed in 1984. 
  In 1977, at the request of the [PLA] General Staff and the 
Office of Defense Industries, the first generation Duihai guided 
missile escort vessel was entirely redesigned. In the early 
1980s, a dual 100mm gun system was added and systems were 
developed for the weapons, electronics, and power plant. The 
remodeled vessel was named Duihai-I. In 1983 eight Yingji-8 
anti-ship missile fixed launchers replaced the original two 
Shangyou-1 guided missile twin joint rotation launchers. A new 
electronics warfare system was also added. The improved model 
was called the Duihai-II guided missile escort. After the 
escorts were placed in service, a series of escorts developed 
and some were also exported. 
  To meet the modern warfare requirements, China modernized 
its 
first generation destroyers in the early 1980s. The emphases 
were: to upgrade the weapons, to improve the electronics, and to 
automate the battle command. In this period China upgraded its 
large guided missile boats, four-launcher torpedo boats, 
anti-submarine escorts, minesweepers, minelaying vessels, and 
landing craft. By 1984, all the development and upgrading of the 
first generation vessels were completed and the performance has 
all improved. 
  While working on the first-generation ships, the Central 
Military Commission also decided to develop the 
second-generation ships and weapons to meet the Navy's needs. 
These systems included new models of conventional submarine, 
destroyers, guided missile frigates, light anti-submarine 
escorts, large missile boats, and anti-submarine torpedoes. 
  To change the previous practice of developing the ships and 
weapons separately, the Central Military Commission repeatedly 
stressed that the development of naval weapons must adhere to 
the principle of "five compatibilities," namely, compatible 
planning, compatible design, compatible modeling, compatible 
production, and compatible delivery. The purpose was to ensure 
coordinated progress in shipbuilding and weapons development. 
The responsible departments conscientiously carried out the 
orders of the Central Military Commission. Weapons developed in 
this period included the Model 76 twin 37mm gun system, the 
Model 66 twin 57mm gun, the twin 100mm gun system, and the copy 
of the Model 69 twin 30mm gun system. These weapons systems 
formed a new series of ship-board guns. Design improvement and 
development were also made for the following naval weapons: 
Model 81 rocket depth charge anti-submarine system, models Yu-4A 
and Yu-4B acoustic anti-ship torpedoes, and the Haiying-2A, 
Haiying-2B, Shangyou-lA, and Yingji-6 anti-ship missiles. 
  In the mid-1980s new Chinese-made ships and weapons were 
developed and put into service. This new equipment has greatly 
improved the combat capability of the Chinese Navy. 
<H5>  Chapter V </H5>
<H5>  Section 3. Coordinated Development of Defense S&amp;T </H5>
<H5>  (2) New Progress in Strategic Missile and Nuclear Weapons </H5>
Systems 
  The successful completion of the "three priority" missions 
marked the serialization of the land-based short-range, 
mid-range, mid-to-long range, and intercontinental strategic 
guided missiles. It also marked the end of first-generation 
submarine-to-land nuclear guided missiles. China had entered the 
development phase for second-generation strategic weapons. 
  In May 1985 China made its first mobile launch of a 
surface-to-surface solid-fuel strategic missile. Lessons were 
learned from the failed submarine-to-land solid-fuel guided 
missile and a modified design was completed in September 1988. 
This indicated that China had mastered the new technology of 
solid fuel, mobile launchers,and underwater submarine launching, 
and had gained useful experience for the development of the 
second-generation strategic missiles. 
  In this period China had made new breakthroughs in its 
nuclear weapons program. While finalizing the warhead design for 
the various strategic guided missiles, China conducted research 
into new design theories and manufacturing technology and 
achieved numerous results. Under the leadership of the Defense 
Science Commission, there was close coordination between the 
nuclear weapons research institutes and the target ranges. A 
series of tests was successfully conducted. New nuclear weapon 
theories were evaluated and a solid foundation was laid for 
future development. 
  China has conducted necessary and limited nuclear tests and 
developed nuclear weapons for defense purposes. China continues 
to improve and perfect its nuclear weapons and makes new 
breakthroughs in design theory to ensure the safety of China and 
to contribute to the keeping of world peace. 
  From April to May 1988 China's first nuclear submarine 
conducted deep- diving, underwater high-speed cruising and 
deep-sea torpedo launch tests in the South China Sea. Tests 
showed that the ocean access system had excellent strength and 
seal and the torpedo system operated normally, meeting the 
design requirements. The success of the deep-water tests of 
China's first nuclear submarine was another major achievement of 
China's strategic weapons development program. It showed that 
China's first-generation nuclear submarine was designed and 
built properly and led the way to the second-generation nuclear 
submarines. 
<H5>  Chapter VI. Development of Nuclear Weapons </H5>
  Nuclear weapons make use of the energy released from 
self-sustained nuclear fission or fusion reactions for mass 
killing and destruction. In 1955 China decided to initiate its 
nuclear industry and to develop its nuclear weapons. After 30 
years, China has independently mastered the technology of atomic 
and hydrogen bombs, and has made major advances in the 
development of new nuclear weapons. 
<H5>  Section 1. Preparation for the Development of Nuclear </H5>
Weapons. 
<H5>  (l) Establishment of nuclear scientific research center </H5>
  The development of nuclear weapons relies on the 
establishment of nuclear science and technology and a 
nuclear-industry. Before the formation of the People's Republic 
of China, although there was the Atomic Research Institute in 
Beijing and the Nuclear Physics Laboratory under the Institute 
of Physics in Academia Sinica,the total number of researchers 
was less than 10 and there was not even a small 
accelerator.Nuclear science and technology was basically a void 
in China at that time. 
  The New China stressed the initiation and development of 
nuclear science and technology. In April 1950 the Chinese 
Academy of Sciences (CAS) established the Institute of Modern 
Physics. Its main mission was to establish a foundation for 
nuclear science and technology and prepare for nuclear energy 
application and development. The director of the institute was 
Wu Youxun [0702 2589 6064] and the deputy director was Qian 
Sanqiang. 
  The Institute of Modern Physics had some renowned scientists 
but there were too few of them and their specialties did not 
complement each other. The pressing obligation at the time was 
to attract talent and to expand the ranks of science research. 
With Zhou Enlai's interest and support, the Institute attracted 
theoretical physicist Peng Huanwu from Qinghua University and 
experimental physicist Wang Ganchang [3769 3227 2490] from 
Zhejiang University. In 1955, 13 scientists and overseas Chinese 
students came to the Institute from Europe and the United 
States, some of them risking their lives to do so. The famous 
nuclear physicist Zhao Zhongyao [6392 1813 1031] was illegally 
detained by American troops in Japan as he was returning to 
China from the United States via Japan. It was only with the 
protests from the Chinese scientific community and civil 
organizations, and the support of friends in the scientific 
community in America and other countries, that Zhao was freed by 
the American troops. In this period China also drafted a group 
of young technicians and capable college graduates to move the 
nuclear research forward. 
  In spring 1949, newly liberated Beijing did not have the 
necessary equipment for nuclear research. Minister Li Weihan 
[2621 4850 3352] of the United Front Work Department under the 
Communist Central Committee approved a special foreign exchange 
fund. The money was transferred by Qian Xuesen indirectly to two 
overseas Chinese students in France and England. With the help 
of the Curie Laboratory in France and some British friends, they 
managed to buy a batch of equipment and literature and brought 
them back to China despite the embargo. This equipment and data, 
together with the 30 boxes of equipment brought by Zhao Zhongyao 
from the United States, became the main resources of the 
Institute of Modern Physics in the early days. Leaders of the 
Institute led the staff in learning from the Yanan spirit and 
made the most out of old and discarded equipment. Some of the 
electronic components were bought in salvage yards and many 
instruments were built by the researchers themselves. Gradually 
the research facility was improved and some results were 
obtained. With Zhao Zhongyao in charge, the Institute built a 
700-kV atmospheric electrostatic accelerator and a high-voltage 
2.5-MeV electrostatic accelerator. With He Zehui [0149 3419 
1979] in charge, the Institute built a number of nuclear 
detectors and instruments. With Wang Ganchang as the designer, 
the Institute also built a 30 x 30 x 10 cm[.sup]3[/] 
7000-Gauss cloud chamber. On Luoxueshan in Yunnan, they built 
China's first mountain cosmic ray laboratory at an elevation of 
3,180 meters and began research on strange particles. Peng 
Huanwu and others initiated research on nuclear physics, 
elementary particle physics, and reactor theory. Researchers in 
the radiation chemistry group began the extraction, 
purification, and analysis of uranium and the development of 
heavy water and high purity graphite. By 1955 the Institute of 
Modern Physics had ongoing research in six areas and had trained 
a group of key researchers. Some research results were obtained 
and the foundation of China's nuclear science and technology was 
established. 
  In the mid-1950s, when the Central Committee of the Chinese 
Communist Party promoted the development of atomic energy, 
R&amp;D 
in nuclear sciencemade new advances. Notably, a 7000-kW 
experimental heavy water reactor and a 1.2-meter-diameter 
cyclotron were built in Tuoli, Beijing, and put into operation 
in September 1958. The construction of the reactor and cyclotron 
was organized by Liu Wei [0149 0251], administrator of the 
Architecture and Construction Bureau under the State 
Construction Commission and guided by Soviet experts, and built 
by Beijing municipality, the Third Ministry of Machine Building 
and the Architecture and Engineering Department, in close 
cooperation. After that, the Atomic Energy Institute (formerly 
the Institute of Modern Physics) was led by the CAS and the 
Second Ministry of Machine Building, mostly under the latter. 
While completing the reactor and the cyclotron, the Atomic 
Energy Institute also imported laboratory facilities from the 
Soviet Union for uranium isotope separation by gas diffusion. 
Instruments developed independently included high-voltage 
multipliers, crystal spectrometers, neutron spectrometers, 
neutron selectors, nanosecond oscilloscopes, and a zero-power 
reactor. A total of 50 instruments were built and research began 
in nuclear physics, reactor physics, plutonium chemistry, and 
isotope separation. In early 1960, the Institute had a total of 
4,300 people, with 1,500 of them being technical staff having a 
college education. Work began in 20 disciplines and 60 branches. 
Gradually a comprehensive nuclear science R&amp;D center was 
formed. 
it prepared personnel and technology for China's independent 
development of a nuclear industry and nuclear weapons. 
<H5>  (2) Building Up a Nuclear Industry </H5>
  While establishing nuclear science and technology, China 
also 
began a survey of uranium resources. Under the leadership of 
Deputy Minister Liu Jie [0149 2638] of the Ministry of Geology, 
preparation for the mining of uranium began in February 1954. 
From June to October 1954, geologists Gao Zhizhang [7559 0037 
2627] and others surveyed Haicheng in Liaoning and Fuzhong and 
Shanmuchong in Guangxi, where uranium was discovered before the 
New China. They brought back uranium ore samples from 
Shanmuchong. These findings received the attention of Mao Zedong 
and Zhou Enlai, who were quickly briefed by Liu Jie. Mao said: 
"We are very hopeful. There are bound to be uranium mines, we 
only have to look for them." 
  After accomplishing some preliminary achievements in nuclear 
technology and making some discovery in uranium mines, the 
Chinese Communist Party held an expanded meeting of its Central 
Secretariat on 15 January 1955. In this meeting chaired by Mao 
Zedong, a policy was formulated to develop China's atomic 
energy. That decision marked the beginning of China's nuclear 
industry and nuclear weapons development. On 20 January an 
agreement was signed by China and the Soviet Union to conduct a 
joint survey of uranium deposits in China. In April, the State 
Council decided to establish a Third Bureau of the Ministry of 
Geology under the Third Office of the State Council. Lei 
Rongtian [7191 2837 1131] was named bureau chief in charge of 
all geological efforts related to uranium mines in China. Also, 
uranium geological survey teams such as the Hunan 309 team and 
the Xinjiang 519 team were formed with people drafted from 
relevant departments, regions and armed services in China. The 
draft orders came from the Party Central Committee, the State 
Council, and the Central Military Commission. Under the 
organization of the Third Bureau of the Ministry of Geology and 
the advice of the Soviet experts, the geological survey teams 
found a large number of radiation anomalies, including 11 sites 
worthy of further investigation. The survey effort and 
industrial evaluation continued and the first uranium reserve 
data were reported to the state. By 1960, there were eight 
mining sites for uranium and the first set of uranium mining 
requirements was satisfied. 
  As China was planning its first batch of uranium mines, 
processing plants and nuclear fuel plants, it was faced with a 
question: how largeshould the nuclear industry be? In early 
1957, Zhou Enlai pointed out that China should have its own 
nuclear industry system and its own nuclear force; however, the 
problem was to go from "have not" to "have" so the scale should 
not be too large. Based on this, the Third Ministry of Machine 
Building re-evaluated the plan in the China-Soviet agreement and 
felt that the scale of the plan was too big. After repeated 
studies and to satisfy the requirement of maintaining a complete 
set of nuclear industry, they proposed a smaller but complete 
plan. The size of the uranium concentration plant was greatly 
reduced and investment was reduced by 40 percent. The new 
proposal suited the Chinese situation better and was approved by 
the Party Central Committee and the State Council. 
  Another important issue in China's nuclear industrial 
development was how to implement the policy of "mainly 
self-reliant, but strive for external assistance." In the 1959 
movement of technological innovation and revolution, some people 
wanted to improve the technology by revising the Soviet plant 
design and the design of instruments and meters. Minister Song 
Renqiong [1345 01717 4522] reported this situation to Mao Zedong 
in a letter. Mao's comment was "Let us learn how to walk before 
we learn how to run." Based on this, the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building urged all the technical workers to patiently 
learn from the Soviet experts and to understand the Soviet 
technology. It was emphasized that no revisions were permitted 
before mastering the Soviet technology, and equipment and 
instruments supplied by the Soviet Union were not to be modified 
or dismantled. In cases where the Soviet technology did not suit 
the Chinese situation, necessary improvements were made only 
after experimental research and with the approval of the Soviet 
experts. The State Council also decided that when equipment and 
raw materials could be found in China, they should be supplied 
domestically. An effort was made to produce special equipment in 
China, thus creating the ability to design and manufacture the 
needed equipment. The construction of the Atomic Energy 
Institute was accelerated and special research organizations for 
uranium mine geology and uranium ore refining were established. 
The initiative of the research personnel was fully mobilized and 
self-reliance was enhanced. 
  In the nationwide "Great Leap Forward" movement, there were 
instances of pushing safety and quality aside in the pursuit of 
production and construction schedules. For such behavior the 
Second Ministry of Machine Building took a firm stand and 
clearly sided with quality and safety. Construction not meeting 
quality standards had to be bulldozed and rebuilt. Deputy 
minister in charge of capital construction, Liu Wei, indeed led 
the destruction of substandard buildings and started 
construction all over again. This rigorous attitude got the 
attention of the construction units and ensured the quality of 
construction. 
  In the build-up of the nuclear industry, China properly 
handled the issues of self-reliance, outside assistance, 
construction scope, and national resources. The correct policy 
and practice led to very good results. In August 1960, uranium 
mines in Chenxian County and Hengshan Dapu in Hunan, and 
Shengyao in Jiangxi were near completion, the uranium processing 
plant in Hengyang, Hunan, began installing equipment, the 
Lanzhou uranium enrichment plant was partially equipped, and the 
associated civil construction for the atomic enterprise in 
Qiuchuan, Gansu, and the fuel element plant in Baotou, Inner 
Mongolia, were also near completion. The successful build-up of 
the nuclear industry made the development of nuclear weapons 
possible. 
<H5>  Section 2. Development of the First Atomic Bomb </H5>
  To speed up the pace of nuclear weapon development, China 
actively sought help from the Soviet Union. The "Agreement on 
New DefenseTechnology" signed by China and the Soviet Union 
contained an article stating that the Soviet Union would help 
China develop its nuclear weapons. The implementation of this 
agreement was relatively smooth in the beginning and contributed 
to the construction of nuclear weapons development bases in 
northwest China; however, as the split between the two parties 
and the two countries deepened, the government of the Soviet 
Union not only ceased to provide teaching models and graphical 
data for the atomic bomb, but also unilaterally voided the 
agreement. In August 1960 the Soviet Union withdrew all 233 
experts assisting China's development of the nuclear industry 
and carried away important graphs and data. The supply of 
equipment and materials stopped shortly thereafter. The 
unilateral action by the Soviet Union to tear up the agreement 
caused severe difficulty and great loss in China's nuclear 
industry and nuclear weapon development. At this key moment, the 
Party Central Committee decided to develop the atomic bomb with 
China's own resources. This important policy stimulated the 
patriotic fervor and national pride of the development 
personnel. They were determined to develop the atomic bomb with 
their own intelligence and skill. They were determined to break 
the hegemonies nuclear monopoly and bring glory to China and its 
people. 
<H5>  (1) Tackling Key Problems in Atomic Bomb Development </H5>
  At the end of the 1950s, China's nuclear bases in the 
Northwest were still under construction and not ready to begin 
R&amp;D work. The Second Ministry of Machine Building decided to 
begin the research and design of the atomic bomb in the Nuclear 
Weapons Institute established in Beijing in July 1958. Efforts 
were put in three areas. The first area was the assembly of 
talent. At the end of 1959 nuclear physicist Zhu Guangya [2612 
0342 0068] left the Atomic Energy Institute and became the 
deputy director of the Nuclear Weapons Institute, where he 
assisted Li Jue [2621 6030] and Wu Jilin [0702 7139 7207] in 
organizing and coordinating the effort. In March 1960, with the 
approval of Deng Xiaoping, 105 senior and middle-level technical 
staff including Guo Yonghuai [6753 3057 2037], Cheng Kaijia 
[4453 7030 3946], Chen Nengkuan [7115 5174 1401], and Long 
Wenguang [7893 2429 0342] were drafted to join the atomic bomb 
development. Subsequently, renowned scientists Wang Ganchang, 
Peng Huanwu, and Guo Yonghuai took the assignment of deputy 
director of the Nuclear Weapons Institute. Together with Deng 
Jiaxian [6772 4471 0341] who came over from the Atomic Energy 
Institute earlier, they formed the backbone of the nuclear 
weapons development effort. The second area was the 
establishment of research laboratories and shops for theoretical 
physics, explosion physics, neutron physics, radiation 
chemistry, metals physics, detonation control and ballistic 
trajectory. The third area was the building of more laboratories 
and the acquisition of more equipment from other departments and 
from abroad. After 6 months of preparation the development of an 
atomic bomb formally began in spring 1960. The atomic bomb was a 
new topic for China, and initial exploration was conducted in 
theoretical design, explosion physics, neutron physics, 
radiation chemistry, detonation control system, and structural 
design. 
<H5>  (A) Theoretical Design </H5>
  Theoretical design of China's first atomic bomb was 
conducted 
under the supervision of Peng Huanwu, Deng Jiaxian, and Zhou 
Guangzhao. Peng analyzed the entire process of atomic bomb 
explosion and determined the principal physical quantities for 
the different stages. His analysis was very important for 
understanding the basic principles and the physical picture of 
the nuclear reaction. 
  Research proceeded before the nuclear reaction. After the 
Chinese new year in 1960, Hu Side [5170 1835 1795] and three 
other young workersstudied the equation of state of the 
explosion products, particularly the uranium equation of state. 
They were determined to succeed and began with learning basic 
knowledge. They surveyed foreign literature and learned as they 
proceeded. After half a year, they finally established the 
equation of state for the entire pressure range. These results 
formed the basis for calculating the overall mechanics of the 
atomic bomb. 
  In April 1960, Sun Qinghe [1327 3237 3109], Zhu Jianshi 
[2612 
1696 1102], and eight other young workers performed the 
whole-body mechanical calculation of the atomic bomb using only 
a few manually cranked and electric calculators. Because of the 
large volume of calculations, they worked around the clock in 
three shifts; everybody worked more than 10 hours a day. Within 
a year's time, they had repeated the calculation for the 
material movement within the bomb body a total of nine times, 
with results very close to each other. In May 1961, Zhou 
Guangzhao was transferred to assume the duties of first deputy 
director of the theoretical design office of the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute. He carefully analyzed the calculation results and 
proved their correctness from a theoretical approach. Meanwhile, 
mathematician Zhou Yulin [0719 3022 7792] also obtained the same 
results using effective computation procedures. After this work, 
scientists gained a deeper understanding of the mechanical 
process before the nuclear reaction. This understanding later 
became the solid foundation for theoretical design and 
mechanical calculations of the atomic bomb. 
  Research was done to study the process after the nuclear 
reaction. Peng Huanwu described the energy release in the chain 
reaction and other physical phenomena when the nuclear material 
was compressed to a super- high critical state. Mathematicians 
Qin Yuanxun [4440 0337 8113] and Li Deyuan [2621 1795 0337] 
completed the total calculation for the energy release process 
after the nuclear material was compressed to a super- high 
critical state. After 2 years of extensive calculations and 
repeated discussion, the theoretical designers had a better 
understanding of the reaction process and performance of an 
atomic bomb loaded with enriched uranium. The first theoretical 
design proposal was submitted in March 1963. 
<H5>  (B) Explosion Physics Research </H5>
  This work was conducted under the supervision of Wang 
Ganchang and Chen Nengkuan. The goal of the experiment was not 
only to verify the theoretical design of the atomic bomb and to 
evaluate the dynamic behavior of the components, but also to 
solve some key technical problems in the development of the 
atomic bomb. With the approval of the Central Military 
Commission and before the completion of the northwest nuclear 
weapons development base, it was decided that small-scale 
explosion tests would be conducted at the testing ground of the 
Army Engineer Corps in Beijing. Tests were conducted to study 
the detonation element and the equations of state of the 
materials. The objective was also to investigate the basic 
principles of atomic bomb design and measurement methods for 
different parameters, and to train technical personnel with 
actual operating ability. In early April, the construction of 
the explosion test site was going at full steam. In order to 
save time, Wu Yungwen led staff and workers to melt explosives 
in ordinary kitchen aluminum pots in temporary sheds. Cylinders 
were formed with cardboard instead of metal molds. Manual 
stirring replaced mechanical stirring and the first explosive 
component was cast. Later, they developed a new explosive 
injection method that improved the quality and performance of 
the charge. The development of the high-pressure detonator was a 
cooperative effort by Deputy Director Qian Jin of the Second 
Laboratory in the Nuclear Weapons Institute, the Beijing 
Industrial University, the Xi'an Third Academy of the Third 
Ministry of Machine Building, and the No. 804 Plant. After 
thousands of tests, a high-performance, high-pressure detonator 
was developed. Extensive tests proved that performance met 
requirements. In order to acquire the focused waveform, Chen 
Nengkuan and coworkers spent about a year in designing and 
testing the first detonation element. Lin Chuanliu [2651 0278 
7511] and coworkers spent 2 years developing electrical 
measurement instruments and other test instruments. Wu Shifa 
[0702 0013 3127] applied high-speed photography to detonation 
experiments and solved the measurement problems in the tests. 
<H5>  (C) Neutron physics and radiation chemistry </H5>
  This project was led by Qian Sanqiang and guided by He 
Zehui. 
The neutron source was an important component of the atomic bomb 
and its development was assumed by the Atomic Energy Institute 
and the Nuclear Weapons Institute. The development followed a 
three-pronged approach. The young technical staff in Wang 
Fangding's [3769 2455 1353] group conducted hundreds of tests 
and developed a neutron source at the end of 1962 that met the 
nuclear weapons requirements. Technicians and workers at the 
Atomic Energy Institute conquered a series of technological 
hurdles and solved the packaging problem of the neutron source 
and the final inspection technique. The neutron source developed 
by Wang Fangding, et al., functioned successfully in the 
detonation test of December 1963. It was employed in the first 
nuclear test. The neutron sources developed by the two other 
approaches were also successful. 
  In the area of neutron physics, scientists at the Atomic 
Energy Institute and other units measured the heavy ion neutron 
cross section in the fission reaction, the energy spectrum of 
the fission neutron, and the average number of fission neutrons. 
They established methods and standards for radiation 
measurements. The Atomic Energy Institute had also assisted the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute in completing the theoretical 
calculation for the fast neutron critical device and the 
criticality safety calculations. 
<H5>  (D) Detonation control </H5>
  The synchronous detonation device in the detonation control 
system was a key component for achieving implosion of the 
nuclear device. Hui Zhongxi [1920 6988 6932], Zhu Guoliang [4376 
0948 2733], and others took on the job with a crude facility 
and, after several months of hard work, solved the circuit 
design problem and mastered the design technology for the 
synchronous detonation device. Meanwhile, other components of 
the detonation control system were also completed in time. These 
results were all employed in the first nuclear test. 
<H5>  (E) Structure design </H5>
  Led by Guo Yonghuai and Long Wenguang, designers of the 
atomic bomb studied two proposals of the nuclear device from the 
detonation and mechanics points of view. By 1962 they had 
obtained the expected results. 
<H5>  (2) Crash Construction of the Northwest Nuclear Weapons </H5>
Development Base 
  From March to June 1958, the joint site selection group 
consisting of Chinese and Soviet experts selected Jinyintan in 
Haiyan County, Qinghai Province, as the place to construct the 
northwest nuclear weapons base. The choice was approved by the 
Party Central Committee in July. Later, the Soviet Union 
provided some preliminary designs and a small amount of 
equipment for part of the northwest nuclear weapons development 
base. Meanwhile, all regions and departments in China strongly 
supported theconstruction of the base. The People's Government 
of Qinghai formed a special group to assist the land use, 
relocation, road, local construction material, and living supply 
problems. It also selected 7,000 able-bodied men to participate 
in the base construction. The construction engineering 
department selected people from its Lanzhou Engineering Bureau 
and the Ninth Production Facility Installation Company to form 
the No. 104 Construction Engineering Company and the Fourth 
Engineering Office in the No. 103 Installation Engineering 
Company to assume the construction duties. The Central Military 
Commission also assigned 1,900 veterans to the base to enhance 
the capital construction force. This capital construction team 
moved onto the construction site beginning in February 1959. 
  In order to save time, design and construction proceeded in 
parallel. In August 1960, construction started on the detonation 
experiment site. later, work began on the assembly and explosive 
processing plant, mechanical processing plant, and standby 
electric power plant. Construction proceeded at a brisk pace. 
  However, around 1961, China's national economy encountered 
some severe difficulties. The situation in Qinghai, harsh even 
in normal times, became even worse. The monthly grain quota per 
person was reduced by more than 10 jin; each person could only 
have two qian of oil and hardly any vegetables. Malnutrition 
caused edema in more than 40 percent of the personnel in some 
units. Construction was greatly affected. Faced with this dire 
situation, base leaders, including Li Jui [2621 6030], strove to 
keep both the project and the workers' welfare afloat. Teams 
were organized to work on agriculture, animal husbandry, and 
fishery. Planting, fishing, and hunting were activities for 
solving the shortage of staple and supplemental foodstuffs. Zhou 
Enlai was very concerned about the workers at the base and 
decided to bring in food from the east and west in order to deal 
with the emergency. At the worst moment, the Ministry of Food 
allocated several million jin of soybeans to three units of the 
Second Ministry of Machine Building in the northwest, including 
the nuclear weapons development base. The Qinghai People's 
Government also shipped 40,000 sheep to the base. The Ministry 
of Commerce set up special second-level wholesale stations in 
Lanzhou, Gansu. These steps stimulated the confidence and 
courage of the workers, stabilized the ranks and ensured the 
normal progress of the project. At the end of 1962, the 
explosive-pouring plant and two small test sites were completed 
and the base began to look like a development base. However, the 
detonation test site and main buildings, like the assembly 
plant, were yet to be built. In the meantime, large-scale 
detonation tests and atomic bomb assembly had to be moved from 
Beijing to the base. These projects required another 100,000 
square meters of capital construction. The complexity and 
quality requirements of the construction, together with the 
short frost-free period on the Qinghai plateau and 
under-strength work force made the base construction exceedingly 
difficult. 
  In early December 1962, the Central Special Committee 
reviewed and approved the 2-year plan for atomic bomb 
development proposed by the Second Ministry of Machine Building. 
The Committee also investigated the construction progress of the 
northwest nuclear weapons base and decided to take some action 
to speed up the pace of construction. On 7 December, Deputy 
Director Zheng Hantao [6774 3352 3447] of the Central Special 
Committee office met with 13 departments including the 
Ministries of Construction, Transportation, Water Conservancy 
and Electric Power, Telecommunications, and the Army Corps of 
Engineers, Railways, and Communications. It was decided that a 
15,000-man construction team, with 500 pieces of construction 
equipment and 300 motor vehicles, should be sent to the 
construction site for a crash building effort. Under the joint 
command headed by Li Jue, the major construction tasks 
werecompleted in April 1964, which made the breakthrough in 
atomic bomb technology possible. 
  With the completion of the northwest nuclear weapons 
development base, the development of the atomic bomb was 
gradually shifted from Beijing to the northwest. Prior to 1969, 
the Ninth Bureau of the Second Ministry of Machine Building, the 
Beijing Nuclear Weapons Institute, and the Northwest Nuclear 
Weapons Development Base were three names of the same institute. 
The research, design and production of nuclear weapons were done 
by the same organization. In 1969, the new base was completed 
and was given the job of nuclear weapons research and design. It 
was called the Nuclear Weapons Design Institute. The Northwest 
Nuclear Weapons Development Base was then responsible only for 
the production of nuclear weapons. The research, design and 
production of the nuclear weapons have since been separated. 
<H5>  (3) Production of Enriched Uranium and Development of </H5>
Nuclear Component 
<H5>  (A) Production of enriched uranium </H5>
  China's first atomic bomb was loaded with enriched uranium. 
The timely production of acceptable uranium was therefore key to 
the successful development of the atomic bomb. 
  Planning of the Lanzhou enriched uranium plant began in 1956 
and construction began in 1958. Under the organization of plant 
director Wang Jiefu [3769 0094 4395] and with help from the No. 
101 Construction Company, the Second Engineering Office of the 
No. 103 Installation Company, and the Atomic Energy Institute, 
the principal civil engineering was basically completed in 1960. 
In 1961, the diffusion units were in place and fluoridized. 
However, production and stable operation of the plant still 
required uranium hexafluoride material and separation membranes. 
  To solve the production and supply problem of uranium 
hexafluoride, Zhou Enlai wrote a letter to Khrushchev in May 
1960. Zhou asked the Soviet Union to honor the agreement and 
provide the Lanzhou enriched uranium plant with the necessary 
uranium hexafluoride. Because the Soviet Union refused to supply 
the material, the Second Ministry of Machine Building decided in 
July 1960 to produce the material by the tube method. Deng 
Zuoqing [6772 0146 0615] and Zheng Qiongying [6774 8825 5391] of 
the Beijing Uranium Refining Institute organized an effort to 
complete the tube production facility in 4 months. The facility 
produced good-quality UO[.sub]2[/] and UF[.sub]4[/]. 
Meanwhile the effort of Cao Benxi [2580 2609 3588], Wu Zhengkai 
[0702 1767 6963], and Huang Changqing [7806 2490 1987] of the 
Atomic Energy Institute built two production facilities of 
UF[.sub]6[/] using the method; acceptable products were 
delivered before 1963. Together with part of the UF[.sub]6[/] 
produced by the recovery facility of the chemical plant at the 
Lanzhou enriched uranium plant, the needs of the early phase of 
the enriched uranium plant were satisfied. This simple 
production facility made vital contributions to the development 
of the first atomic bomb and to the successful detonation. From 
1962 to 1963, under the organization of the Mining Bureau 
Director Su Hua [5685 5478], the uranium mines at Chen Xian and 
Hengshan Dapu in Hunan Province and Shangrao in Jiangxi Province 
and the uranium water processing plant in Hengyang, Hunan, were 
all completed and placed in service. Acceptable products also 
began to come from the UF[.sub]4[/] shop at the Baotou Fuel 
Element Plant and from the UF[.sub]6[/] plant of the Jiuquan 
Atomic Energy Joint Enterprise. The supply of necessary material 
to the Lanzhou enriched uranium plant had a reliable source. 
  The uranium separation membrane represented a sensitive 
frontier technology and was a highly guarded secret in countries 
that had it. In the late 1950s, China spent about 4 years and 
came up with its first generation uranium separation membrane. 
The effort was organized and coordinated by Zhao Erlu, Qian 
Sanqiang, and Pei Yusheng [5952 7183 3932] and the work was done 
by the Ministry of Metallurgical Industry, the Second Ministry 
of Machine Building, the Chinese Academy of Sciences, the 
Ministry of Textile Industry, and some plants in Shanghai. This 
product kept the Lanzhou uranium enrichment plant in stable 
operation. 
  On 9 April 1963, under the direction of experts such as Wang 
Chengshu [3769 2110 2579], Wu Zhengkai, and Qian Gaojun [6929 
4108 7301], the Lanzhou plant started its diffusers in batches. 
On 14 January 1964, it obtained highly enriched uranium suitable 
for atomic bombs. This achievement was praised and congratulated 
by Mao Zedong and Zhou Enlai. 
<H5>  (B) Development of Nuclear Components </H5>
  In November 1961, before the nuclear component plant was 
built at the Jiuquan Atomic Energy Joint Enterprise, personnel 
from the enterprise and the Nuclear Weapons Institute built a 
simple laboratory in Beijing to study the machining of the 
enriched uranium. Chen Hongyi [7115 1347 3015], He Wenzhao [0149 
2429 6856], Yang Yun [2799 1661], and Xu Jiqian [1776 1015 0051] 
worked for more than 2 years and acquired the technology to 
cast, machine, and inspect the uranium. They determined the 
parameters, developed the procedure and the basic principle for 
impurity control, and laid a foundation for the fabrication of 
nuclear components. 
  Construction of the nuclear component plant in the Jiuquan 
Atomic Energy Joint Enterprise began in August 1959. In the 
second half of 1962, a design modification proposed by Zhu 
Linfang [4376 7792 5364] was adopted and the simple nuclear 
component shop was built in less than a year. From November 1963 
to April 1964, chemical engineering and refining of nuclear 
components proceeded smoothly, but gas porosity in casting 
remained an unsolved problem and severely affected the quality 
of the components. The technology for eliminating the porosity 
was finally found by Zhang Tongxing [1728 0681 2502], under the 
guidance of Chief Engineer Jiang Shengjie of the joint 
enterprise and Chief Engineer Zhang Peilin [1728 3099 7207] of 
the Production Bureau of the Second Ministry of Machine 
Building. With the skillful shaping and machining by machinist 
Yuan Gongpu [0626 0361 3184], the first set of acceptable 
enriched uranium components was produced on 1 May 1964. 
  In the meantime, the Baotou nuclear component plant, under 
the supervision of Zhang Cheng [1728 6134], worked for more than 
2 years and developed the machining technique for natural 
uranium components. Acceptable parts were first produced in 
1964. By then, all the components needed for the first atomic 
bomb were produced in time. 
<H5>  (4) Overall Breakthroughs in Atomic Bomb Technology </H5>
  In spring 1963, scientists of the design, testing, and 
production departments in the Beijing Nuclear Weapons Institute 
gradually moved to the northwest nuclear weapons base. The 
Central Special Committee approved the drafting of 126 senior 
and middle-level scientists and technical staff to the Qinghai 
plateau. These included Professors Zhang Xingqian [1728 5281 
6870] and Fang Zhengzhi [2455 2973 4249], and Engineer Huang 
Guoguang. Leading cadres Li Jue, Zhao Jinpu, and Guo Yinghui let 
the scientists live in the only buildings and moved themselves 
into tents. Using crude shops, scientists launched into all-out 
experimental research of the atomic bomb. 
  Under the guidance of Wang Ganchang and Chen Nengkuan, a 
series of planned local decomposition detonation tests were 
conducted from May to November 1963. On 24 December a 
scaled-down integrated detonation test was performed. However, 
there were different interpretations of the test results. After 
Tang Xiaowei [0781 1321 1218] made an overall analysis of the 
test parameters, a correct judgement was made, which was later 
verified by further tests. This integrated test verified the 
theoretical design and the results of separate tests. It laid 
the foundation for the design of the atomic bomb. 
  The success of the integrated detonation experiment and the 
acquisition of the highly enriched uranium were important 
achievements in China's development of its first atomic bomb. It 
indicated that major technical hurdles have been overcome. After 
receiving the reports, Zhou Enlai happily congratulated the 
workers for completing vital production and technical tests 
ahead of schedule. He also encouraged them to be prudent and 
persistent in carrying out the remaining tasks. 
  In order to be absolutely sure, scientists conducted a 
full-scale detonation simulation test and other related tests in 
June 1964. The tests were a total success. In 4 years, there was 
a total of 1,000 small-scale tests and several large-scale tests 
to evaluate the components separately and in combination. The 
theoretical design was verified and key technical problems in 
integrated detonation were solved. The results were very 
fruitful. 
  Large-scale detonation tests showed that both structural 
components were satisfactory. To ensure timely production of the 
necessary components for the first nuclear explosion, Leu Jie 
held extensive discussions with the experts and technical staff. 
He decided on 23 March 1964 that a structural component designed 
by Wu Daixian [0124 0108 0341] with greater rigidity and 
strength would be used. However, the new component was more 
difficult to machine to high precision. The required machining 
precision was not available at that time at either the northwest 
base or in the Second Ministry of Machine Building. With the 
permission of the Central Special Committee, a precision machine 
shop was set up in the 403 Plant of the Third Ministry of 
Machine Building and the task was completed as an emergency 
measure. The task was coordinated by Minister Sun Zhiyuan of the 
Third Ministry, Deputy Secretary Liu Boluo [0149 2672 5012] of 
the Office of Defense Industries, and Deputy Bureau Chief Lai 
Jian [6351 1017]. 
  From May to July 1964, scientists at the nuclear weapons 
base 
performed vibration tests and transport simulation for nuclear 
components, explosive components, detonation elements and 
synchronization devices. Tests results showed that the nuclear 
components and control systems could stand the transport 
environment and their structures were reliable. Using a 
self-developed subcritical device, Lai Zuwu [6351 4371 2976] 
successfully performed a subcritical test on the nuclear device. 
His test results showed that all the steps in the assembly 
procedure of the atomic bomb had sufficient subcritical safety; 
safety would be ensured even under the least favorable 
conditions. Using crude testing methods, Song Guangzhou [1345 
0342 3166] and others led the workers through a series of tests 
and solved technical problems in the machining and assembly 
process. Machining quality of the parts was assured. 
  In July and August, technical staff and workers at the 
northwest nuclear weapons base completed the assembly of three 
acceptable nuclear devices. This was accomplished with strong 
support from various departments and the operation was performed 
strictly according to the procedures. The work was led by Cai 
Baozhen [5591 2128 4176]. In mid and late August, the devices 
were shipped via special train to the nuclear test base in the 
northwest. Following the instruction from Zhou Enlai, the 
movementwas kept under strict secrecy and security. Before the 
train started, detailed transportation procedures were 
formulated. Specific requirements were set for the stops along 
the way and for transfer, teaming, and security procedures. The 
train was escorted by armed police and the route was guarded by 
public security police. At the border of two provinces, the 
train was escorted across the border by the public security 
chiefs of the two provinces and the security duty was 
transferred from one to the other. All the steel hammers for 
rail inspection were replaced with brass hammers to avoid 
sparks. All the coal used by the train was sifted to detect the 
presence of explosives. High-voltage power was temporarily cut 
off in regions where the train was passing. Under tight security 
and planning, the nuclear devices were safely delivered to the 
intended station in Xinjiang. The devices were then transported 
by truck to the northwest nuclear test site. Enriched uranium 
components were flown directly to the test site. 
  On 16 October 1964, China's first atomic bomb was 
successfully detonated at the northwest nuclear test site. After 
the explosion, the Atomic Energy Institute conducted radiation 
chemistry analysis and the Nuclear Weapons Institute and the 
Northwest Nuclear Technology Institute conducted optical and 
mechanical measurements to determine the power of the explosion. 
The power was equivalent to 20,000 tons of TNT, close to the 
theoretical value. The test results showed that the research, 
design, experimentation, fabrication, and testing of China's 
first atomic bomb had met the designed requirements and a solid 
foundation was established for the development of nuclear 
weapons. 
<H5>  Section 3. Breakthrough in Hydrogen Bomb Technology </H5>
  As a nuclear weapon, the hydrogen bomb makes use of the 
enormous amount of energy released at the instance of the fusion 
reaction (thermonuclear reaction) of deuterium and tritium, 
isotopes of hydrogen. The power of a hydrogen bomb is much 
greater than that of an atomic bomb. There is a qualitative jump 
from the atomic bomb to the hydrogen bomb. All countries engaged 
in nuclear weapons development have strived to develop the 
hydrogen bomb as quickly as possible after they succeeded in 
developing the atomic bomb. China also began its exploration of 
the hydrogen bomb--and obtained some results--while it was 
developing the atomic bomb. In February 1965 the Central Special 
Committee approved the "Report on the Accelerated Development of 
Nuclear Weapons" submitted by the Second Ministry of Machine 
Building and decided to conduct a nuclear test of a hydrogen 
bomb device in 1968. This goal stimulated all the workers in 
nuclear science and technology to reach a new high. 
<H5>  (1) Exploring the Theory of H-bomb Design </H5>
  The success story in China's development of the atomic bomb 
was the attention to design research and the basic principles. 
It was also an important approach to the H-bomb technology 
breakthrough. The Second Ministry and the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute took some effective actions in basic research. 
  (A) In December 1960, based on the plan made by Liu Jie, 
Qian 
Sanqiong, and organized by Huang Zuchia [7806 4371 3174] and Yu 
Min [0060 2404] of the Atomic Energy Institute and formed the 
lepton nuclear theory group. The group began to explore H-bomb 
principles and the different physical processes and viable 
structures. In 4 years the group has submitted 69 research 
result reports and gained in depth understanding of many basic 
phenomena. In September 1963, some of the scientists of the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute began the theoretical exploration of 
the H-bomb by designing an atomic bomb that contained 
thermonuclear material. After the success of the first nuclear 
test, the Institute quickly shifted most of the theoretical 
researchers to H-bomb research. In order tostrengthen the 
theoretical effort on the H-bomb, the Second Ministry of Machine 
Building decided to move Huang Zuqia, Yu Min, and another 29 
people from the Atomic Energy Institute to the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute in January 1965. After these changes, the theoretical 
group became a strong force in H-bomb research. 
  (B) Formulating design principles. 
  In February 1965, under the supervision of Zhu Guangya and 
Peng Huanwu, Deng Jiaxian, and Zhou Guangzhao led the scientists 
in consolidating the experience of the previous stage of 
research and formulated a work plan to achieve the H-bomb 
technology breakthrough. The second step was to complete the 
theoretical design of the thermonuclear warhead to meet 
requirements in weight, power, and the deployment of nuclear 
weapons. 
  (C) Preparing accurate and complete nuclear data. 
  Accurate and complete nuclear data are important to the 
design of nuclear devices. Scientists at the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute discovered many inconsistencies in nuclear data in the 
literature. In February 1965 He Zehui of the Atomic Energy 
Institute led 30 research staff to conduct nuclear reaction 
cross section measurements for thermonuclear material. They used 
the research results obtained by Ding Dazhao and others and 
obtained reliable experimental data after half a year of 
experimental research. 
  (D) Conducting exploratory H-bomb test 
  To understand thermonuclear reaction and to obtain 
first-hand 
information as needed in the H-bomb design, the Central Special 
Committee approved the test of an enhanced atomic bomb. The 
design of the enhanced atomic bomb was based on the first 
experimental atomic bomb but contained a certain amount of 
thermonuclear material; the structure was modified 
correspondingly. Theoretical design proceeded quickly and used 
only about half a year. Since the new test used components of 
the detonation system that was employed in the two previous 
atomic bomb tests, the fabrication process also progressed 
quickly. From September 1965 to April 1966, detonation, 
subcritical, and environmental tests were completed. On 9 May 
1966, an atmospheric test of the enhanced atomic bomb was 
successfully conducted. This test provided real data for the 
theoretical study of the H-bomb. 
  (E) Break through the H-bomb design 
  After a year of investigation, scientists clearly recognized 
that, in order to break through the H-bomb design principle, 
they must pursue many approaches and understand the principal 
factors that affected the burning of the thermonuclear material 
and the rule of energy release. From February to July 1965, the 
theoretical department of the Nuclear Weapons Institute 
concentrated on several structural proposals and conducted 
repeated calculations. The results were not satisfactory. Facing 
an impasse, scientists consolidated experience and conducted 
various special topics symposia and discussions so that everyone 
could think about the problem and come up with new concepts, new 
ideas, and new proposals. The main direction for pursuing the 
H-bomb theory was determined this way. 
  In the summer of 1965, scientists at the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute learned from foreign news media that France planned to 
conduct a test of their first thermonuclear device in 1968. To 
win one for China and the Chinese people, they proposed to 
realize China's first H-bomb before the French. Deputy director 
Yu Min of the theoretical department of the Institute led staff 
members to the Huadong Computation Institute in Shanghai before 
National Day and spent all the holidays calculating models. 
After analysis, they obtained important results in the burning 
rule of thermonuclear material. However, the model was too heavy 
and the specific power and specific fusion were low and did not 
meet the criterion of 1 million tons of TNT for every ton. Yu 
Min summarized the results and made a series of reports. Staff 
members calculated some more ideal models and discovered the key 
in sustained burning of thermonuclear material. This important 
issue in the H-bomb principle was thus resolved. 
<H5>  (2) Speeding Up the Production of Thermonuclear Materials </H5>
and the Development of Thermonuclear Components 
  Another important step in the development of the H-bomb was 
the production of thermonuclear materials and thermonuclear 
components. 
  Just as China was about to install its first lithium 
deuteride-6 production line, the Soviet Union cut off aid to 
China. The Second Ministry of Machine Building immediately 
transferred the scientists engaged in light isotope separation 
in the Atomic Energy Institute to the Baotou Nuclear Fuel 
Element Plant to solve technical problems. With assistance from 
the Atomic Energy Institute, Beijing University, and Qinghua 
University, plant personnel tackled 95 topics centered on the 
production of thermonuclear materials and solved the problem of 
the exchange tower enrichment process and the production rate of 
the chemical exchange system. Meanwhile, the First Ministry of 
Machine Building actively sought out production equipment like 
the reagent pump of the Shenyang Water Pump Plant and 
electrolysis trough, and satisfied the needs of the lithium 
deuteride-6 production line installation. The installation 
personnel actively developed installation tools, modified the 
installation method, and completed the installation of the main 
unit in early 1963. 
  In spring 1963, the lithium deuteride-6 production line was 
ready for a test run. The intermediate test for heavy water--the 
material for producing deuterium--had basically been acceptable, 
but industrial-scale production of heavy water was still not 
possible. The Central Special Committee requested the Ministry 
of Chemical Industry to include the project at an earlier date. 
In July the Committee again studied the heavy water problem and 
decided that the Ministry of Chemical Industry should give top 
priority to small shops for producing heavy water. The Ministry 
then organized Dalian Grease Chemical Plant and Shanghai 
Institute of Chemical Engineering and accelerated the process of 
producing heavy water by electrolytic exchange. Acceptable heavy 
water was produced in December 1963 and in May 1964; there was 
therefore a technology base for building a heavy water plant. 
Subsequently the Jilin Chemical Industrial Company quickly built 
a small heavy water production shop and produced the first batch 
of acceptable heavy water with strong support from the Beijing 
Institute of Chemical Design, the First Ministry of Machine 
Building, and other departments. In this period the test-run of 
the lithium deuteride-6 production line succeeded on the first 
try and produced its first batch of products. The plant then 
acquired the ability to produce lithium chloride and metallic 
lithium, and produced deuterium by electrolytically decomposing 
heavy water. On 11 September 1965, the plant synthesized its 
first charge of lithium deuteride-6. 
  The Northwest Nuclear Weapons Development Base was 
responsible for machining lithium-deuteride-6 into thermonuclear 
material components for the H-bomb according to the design shape 
and size. In early 1965 Song Jiashu [1345 1367 2885] and other 
scientists began the R&amp;D of thermonuclear components. The 
first 
problem they encountered was the machining of the thermonuclear 
material. They took a three-prongedapproach to break through the 
technology. After repeated tests they settled on a fabrication 
method that could yield near-theoretical density blanks with 
fewer defects at a lower pressure. Scientists and workers were 
very conscious about safety in their work; they properly handled 
the possible ignition problem of the thermonuclear materials 
during mechanical processing. They also tested dozens of 
coatings and finally found one coating that helped the 
short-term storage problem of thermonuclear components. After 
almost a year of development, the first set of acceptable 
lithium deuteride-6 component was produced and the fuel problem 
for the enhanced atomic bomb and H-bomb test was solved. These 
results were very crucial for the successful development of the 
H- bomb. 
<H5>  (3) The First Hydrogen Bomb Successfully Developed </H5>
  In December 1965, experts of the Northwest Nuclear Weapons 
Institute conducted a series of studies. These studies were 
chaired by Deputy Director Wu Jilin [0702 7139 7207] and 
participated in by deputy ministers Leu Xiyao [0149 6007 1031] 
and Li Jue of the Second Ministry of Machine Building, and 
Second Bureau Chief Hu Ruexia [5170 5387 3838] of the Defense 
Science Commission. After these studies, it was determined that 
the theoretical proposal of triggering the H-bomb with the 
atomic bomb was reasonable and feasible according to the basic 
principles. Based on this analysis, it was possible to have a 
smaller and lighter 1-megaton H-bomb with a higher specific 
fusion at the end of 1967 or the first half of 1968. The 
emphasis for breaking through the H-bomb technology was 
therefore placed on the new proposal. However, the new proposal 
was only a concept and its success was not ensured; on the other 
hand, the originally planned H-bomb, although larger, heavier, 
and having a smaller specific fusion ratio, was more likely to 
succeed based on theoretical considerations. For this reason, 
research and testing of the original design was not abandoned 
either. With the two-pronged approach as the guiding concept, 
the Second Ministry of Machine Building formulated the 1966 and 
1967 plans for nuclear weapons development; the plans were 
approved by the Central Special Committee. After that, the 
Committee approved the specific steps to implement the 2-year 
plan and the request by the relevant departments to cooperate. 
The new arrangement for breaking through the H-bomb technology 
developed quickly. 
  In the new plan, the difficult task of triggering the 
thermonuclear device with the atomic bomb had to be overcome. 
After hundreds of detonation simulation experiments and many 
in-depth academic discussions, a clever method employed by Chen 
Changyi and Tao Zucong [7118 4371 5115] solved this technical 
problem and provided experimental data for the theoretical 
design of the detonator 
  To design the body of the H-bomb, physicists and mechanics 
researchers studied the physical picture and mechanisms in the 
explosion process of the thermonuclear device, investigated the 
effects of the explosion of the detonator bomb on the main 
H-bomb, and mastered the layout of the components and the 
relationship of energy release. The theoretical design of the 
H-bomb body was thus formulated. 
  However, by the time the theoretical design plan for the 
entire experimental device was handed to the design and 
manufacture departments, it was already mid-October 1966. The 
design and manufacture departments had very little time to 
complete the engineering design and to fabricate the device. 
Furthermore, the device was very complex, with many odd-shaped 
components which were hard to make. To ensure quality and 
schedule, theorists, designers and manufacturers worked 
together, exchanged ideas, discussed problems, and moved the 
design and manufacture preparation forward. After the completion 
of the theoreticaldesign plan, the design and manufacture moved 
forward together to save time. By December 1966, all the design 
and manufacturing tasks had been completed. However, when 
scientists inspected the H-bomb experimental device on 10 
October, a major component was found to have quality problems. 
When Zhou Enlai learned of this, he sent Lie Jie to fly in on a 
special plane on the next day to inspect the problem. On-site 
inspection showed a crack that was visible only with a 
magnifying glass. Liu studied with the scientists and determined 
that the component was usable and the crack would not affect the 
explosion test. Thus, the experimental device was shipped to the 
northwest testing site as scheduled. 
  To ensure the success of the test, theoretical designers and 
testing personnel added many monitors for different parts of the 
thermonuclear device. Eight additional near-field physical 
measurements were added and each measurement involved many 
items. Under the guidance of Wang Ganchang and deputy director 
Hu Renyu of the experimental department, test personnel 
carefully formulated measurement procedures and repeatedly 
calibrated and tuned the detectors, transmission system, and 
recorders. All measurement preparations were ready on time. On 
28 December 1966, the design principle test passed with flying 
colors. The results showed that China had mastered the key 
technologies of H-bomb development. However, the thermonuclear 
reaction of this test was incomplete because of the small 
quantity of thermonuclear fuel used in the test and because of 
the field limitations of the equivalence. In order to understand 
the parameters of a fully developed thermonuclear reaction and 
to further evaluate the design principle and its future 
prospects, the Second Ministry obtained permission from the 
Central Special Committee to conduct a direct full-equivalence 
air-drop H-bomb test. Preparations for this test were to be 
completed by 20 June 1967. To this end, Mao Zedong signed a 
telegram authorizing the nuclear weapons base to temporarily 
halt the "Big Four" activities of the "Great Cultural 
Revolution." The decision by Mao and by the Central Special 
Committee was vital to the research, production, quality, and 
security of the H-bomb development. Close cooperation in theory, 
experiment, design, and production on the base accelerated the 
progress and made full use of the facility for developing a 
thermonuclear bomb and certain other products. On 5 June 1967, 
the H-bomb for the official test was finished. The various 
components and subsystems of the H-bomb were inspected for 
quality before leaving the plant. 
  A full-equivalence H-bomb test was carried out on 7 June 
1967 
at the northwest nuclear testing site and the test was a 
success. The explosive power was equivalent to 3 million tons of 
TNT. 
  The reduced-equivalence and full-equivalence H-bomb tests 
showed that China had mastered the H-bomb technology and was 
capable of producing H- bombs. This was the second major 
breakthrough in China's nuclear weapons development and was the 
basis for developing a system of ballistic missiles and 
missile-equipped troops. 
<H5>  Section 4. Atomic Bomb and Hydrogen Bomb Reach Application </H5>
Stage; Research on a New Generation of Nuclear Weapons 
  The application of the atomic bomb and the H-bomb involved 
converting the experimental nuclear device into a weapon 
according to certain tactical and technical requirements. It 
took extensive engineering research and testing to implement the 
application. 
  In June 1963 the Central Special Committee decided that the 
weapons production problem after the first nuclear test must be 
solved. In January, the Central Special Committee stated in a 
report to the Party Central Committee and Mao Zedong that China 
should systematicallydevelop atomic and hydrogen bombs that 
could be delivered by missile and aircraft. Thanks to the 
definitive guidance thoughts in nuclear weapons development and 
the hard work of weapons developers and nuclear fuel producers, 
the progress was relatively smooth and the Central Special 
Committee's requests were met either in time or ahead of 
schedule. 
<H5>  (1) Atomic Bomb Reaches Application Stage </H5>
<H5>  (A) Airdropped Atomic Bomb </H5>
  The airborne atomic bomb consisted of the nuclear device, 
the 
detonation system, and the bomb shell. It was closely integrated 
with the delivery aircraft. 
  China's first nuclear device was originally designed for 
atmospheric explosion. Under the guidance of Guo Yonghuai, 
scientists in the Nuclear Weapons Institute began the design in 
April 1960 and designed three aerodynamic profiles for the bomb 
shell. With the assistance of the Fifth Academy of the Ministry 
of Defense and the Beijing Aeronautical Institute, they 
conducted a number of low- and high-speed wind tunnel tests and 
made preliminary decisions on the exterior profile and 
resistance coefficient. They have also produced a scaled 
air-drop model and tested it in October and November of 1961 
above the northwest integrated missile testing base. The 
air-drop test of a full-size model was conducted late 1962. 
Based on test results, an aerodynamic profile was finalized and, 
based on this profile, structural design and fabrication of the 
bomb shell proceeded. 
  After the mode of testing for the first nuclear device was 
changed to a tower explosion, research on the air-drop atomic 
bomb continued. In 1963 the Nuclear Weapons Institute 
collaborated with a unit in the Air Force to conduct flight 
tests for the detonation control system. After a number of 
improvements, the detonation control system was completed by the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute in early 1965. 
  After China's first successful nuclear test, scientists at 
the Nuclear Weapons Institute improved upon the theoretical 
model of the nuclear device based on the tactical and technical 
requirements of air-dropped bombs and raised the reliability of 
the structure. Led by Shu Songgui [3990 2646 2710] and Yu 
Daguang [0205 1129 0342], designers completed the design of the 
remote sensing system in 3 months. The model bomb for practicing 
air drops and the bomb for "cold" experiments and live tests 
were completed respectively at the end of March and April at the 
Northwest Nuclear Weapons Development Base. Large-scale 
vibration, temperature, and simulated environmental tests showed 
that the structure was reliable and the detonation system and 
remote sensing system both functioned normally. 
  An air-drop atomic bomb test, approved by the Central 
Special 
Committee and held on 14 May 1965, was successfully conducted. 
The explosive power was basically in agreement with the 
theoretical design. 
  From the first nuclear test to the first air-drop nuclear 
test, only 8 months elapsed. This indicated that China's 
development of atomic weapons had proceeded very quickly. 
<H5>  (B) Nuclear Missile Warheads </H5>
  The Nuclear Weapons Institute followed the policy set by the 
Central Special Committee that "nuclear weapons research should 
be based primarily on missile warheads and only supplemented by 
air-dropped bombs," and began developing atomic bomb missile 
warheads. Some of the scientists still working on the 
development of the first atomic bombwere transferred to work on 
missile warheads. 
  Theoretical research of missile warheads began in August 
1963. Based on the design of China's first atomic bomb and the 
tactical requirements of medium-range and short-range 
surface-to-surface missiles, scientists worked on 
miniaturization design and combined detonation test results and 
feasibility of the fabrication process. Corresponding measures 
taken in the structural design reduced the size and weight of 
the warhead, increasing its rigidity to meet the needs of a 
varying environment in the flight of a missile. 
  After the reduction in size, scientists made extensive 
calculations to address the waveform symmetry problem of the 
explosion. At the end of 1965, they provided acceptable 
detonators for the missile warhead and ensured the synchronous 
nature of the composite waveform. 
  The warhead experienced vibration, impact, high and low 
temperatures, and acceleration during the storage phase and in 
flight. To ensure normal functioning of the warhead under these 
conditions, scientists at the Nuclear Weapons Institute designed 
a safety device for the detonation system and reliable trigger 
and self-destruct systems. If the missile launch failed, the 
nuclear warhead would not lead to a nuclear explosion. 
Scientists conducted a series of tests and verifications. First, 
certain key components of the detonation system of the nuclear 
device and the entire system were given centrifuge, vibration, 
impact, and extreme-temperature tests. Next, they went beyond 
the limitation of simulated transport of the model bomb and 
boldly tested high-speed transport of the nuclear warhead at 40 
kilometers per hour. In 1966, they conducted detonation tests 
that simulated the actual environment and the enlarged 
graphpaper error. These tests helped finalize the model of the 
device. To test the detonation control system for the warhead; 
they also conducted "cold" runs without the nuclear material. 
Test results showed that the detonation control system was 
properly designed. To ensure absolute safety, the Nuclear 
Weapons Institute of the Second Ministry of Machine Building 
followed Zhou Enlai's instruction and conducted combustion tests 
that simulated the situation of a nuclear warhead with the 
safety still engaged and simulated drop impact tests. These 
tests showed that the nuclear warhead was safe and reliable. 
After the successful completion of the above tests, a nuclear 
missile was successfully launched on 27 October 1966. This 
proved that China had acquired battle-ready nuclear missiles. 
<H5>  (2) Production of Plutonium and Tritium </H5>
  In China's nuclear weapons development the first nuclear 
material used was enriched uranium-235 and thermonuclear 
material lithium deuteride-6. To improve the quality, increase 
the power and reduce the weight of nuclear weapons, China 
urgently needed to produce plutonium and tritium. 
  Plutonium-239 does not exist in nature. It is produced by 
irradiating U-238 in a reactor. China's first graphite light 
water reactor for producing Pu-239 began its construction in 
March 1960. When the Soviet Union withdrew its aid, the project 
was brought to a stop, but construction resumed in June 1962. 
After 4 years, the Baotou nuclear fuel element plant produced 
acceptable fuel elements. The Shanghai Turbine Works of the 
First Ministry of Machine Building and dozens of other plants 
produced 154 components for the reactor. Under the direction of 
Zhou Zhi [0719 4442] and Jiang Shengjie, the Jiuchuan Atomic 
Energy Consortium, the 102 Company, and the third engineering 
office of the 103 Company jointly overcame technical hurdles in 
construction and production, and completed the production 
reactor in October 1966. The reactor was officially put into 
service in 1967. 
  The post-processing plant of the Jiuchuan Atomic Energy 
Consortium was responsible for processing the fuel element after 
irradiation. The plant developed an innovative extraction method 
that replaced the precipitation method provided by the Soviets. 
The method was developed with the cooperation of the Design 
Institute of the Second Ministry of Machine Building, the Atomic 
Energy Institute, and Qinghua University. The new method saved 
costs and reduced construction time. In May 1965, construction 
began on the experimental facility of the post-processing plant. 
With rush building by the fifth engineering office of the 103 
Company, the plant was finished in September 1968 and put into 
service to produce Pu-239. A large-scale post-processing plant 
was built in April 1970. China's tritium production facility was 
built without any outside help. The Atomic Energy Institute 
completed the study of tritium production in the 1960s. In the 
mid-1960s, the Second Ministry of Machine Building's design 
institute completed a design for a tritium production line. In 
May 1968, the tritium production line was officially put into 
service to produce acceptable tritium. 
  The completion of the Pu-239 and tritium production 
facilities provided important materials for improving the 
performance of nuclear weapons. 
<H5>  (3) Hydrogen Bomb Reaches Application Stage </H5>
  The development of the air-dropped nuclear bomb and nuclear 
missile warhead and the breakthrough in hydrogen bomb technology 
were the foundation for making the hydrogen bomb a weapon. 
However, while work was proceeding following the instruction of 
the Central Special Committee, the "Great Cultural Revolution" 
took place. In October 1969 the Lin Biao [2651 1753] 
counter-revolutionary clique interfered directly. Many senior 
and mid-level scientists engaged in nuclear weapons research and 
cadres at the office and shop level were criticized and 
persecuted; research and experimentation could not proceed 
normally. After the Lin Biao counter-revolutionary group was 
crushed, many victims were rehabilitated thanks to Zhou Enlai's 
personal attention. 
  Beginning in 1967, the Defense Science Commission and the 
Office of Defense Industries have held many meetings with R&amp;D 
units for missiles and nuclear weapons to discuss the tactical 
and technical targets of thermonuclear warheads. These targets 
were officially approved by the State Council and Central 
Military Commission before they were handed down. To make the 
thermonuclear warhead more compact, lighter, reliable and easier 
to use, scientists and researchers engaged in nuclear device 
research and the development of detonation control and remote 
sensing systems branched out into other areas. These areas 
included new structures, new technologies, new materials and new 
designs, detonation control system reliability, environmental 
adaptability, miniaturization design, explosive power 
reliability, experimental techniques to evaluate the flight of 
the nuclear device, more advanced, multifunction large 
facilities, and ground testing facilities. These efforts led to 
expected results and moved the application of the hydrogen bomb 
forward. 
  To satisfy the tactical requirements for the weapons, 
researchers also developed large-scale explosion tests, 
mechanical tests, environmental tests. and flight tests for 
weapon components and detonation control systems in the missile 
warhead. Through these tests, the design was evaluated and the 
components were checked. Test results served as a data base for 
improving thermonuclear warheads. To evaluate the explosion 
performance of the nuclear device, researchers also followed 
Zhou Enlai's request and tested the flight of the nuclear device 
using nonnuclear means. The test they used was not only safe and 
economical, but also met the requirement of evaluating the 
nuclear device. 
  The application of the hydrogen bomb proceeded according to 
the instruction of Zhou Enlai. Testing and design finalization 
was donesimultaneously and small-scale production began after 
the design was finalized. After the completion of the nuclear 
device evaluation, scientists at the Nuclear Weapons Design 
Institute proceeded with the test production using the design 
drawings and technical documents. After acceptable products 
could be produced, the final weapons development report was 
submitted. Drawings of the final design, technical papers, and 
engineering data were submitted to the State Design Finalization 
Committee for evaluation and approval. Batch production of the 
weapons began after the design was approved. This procedure was 
followed in the 1970s and 1980s for the development of a 
medium-range missile, medium-to-long range missile, ICBM, and 
submarine-to-surface missile and associated warheads. The 
designs of these weapons were finalized and the weapons were 
placed into service. 
<H5>  (4) Research on New Generation of Weapons </H5>
  Scientists at the Nuclear Weapons Design Institute followed 
the new direction of smaller, mobile, safe, and reliable nuclear 
weapons. They conducted extensive preparatory research in 
related disciplines and technologies. They explored new design 
theories and manufacturing techniques and launched into the 
development of a new generation of nuclear weapons. Under the 
leadership of the Office of Defense Industries and the Second 
Ministry of Machine Building, the Nuclear Weapons Design 
Institute cooperated with the Northwest Nuclear Testing Base and 
conducted a series of experiments from 1982 to 1988. The design 
principle was checked, breakthroughs were made in key 
technologies, and China's nuclear weapons research entered a new 
era. 
  China made the decision to develop nuclear weapons in the 
mid-1950s. In the last 30 years, China has established a 
complete nuclear science and technology industrial system, 
cultivated a formidable power, accumulated rich experience, and 
built a high-level R&amp;D team. They independently developed 
atomic 
and hydrogen bombs and put them into military service. They also 
made major achievements in the research of new nuclear weapons. 
They have made great contributions to China's defense 
construction and broke the nuclear threat and nuclear blackmail 
by the superpowers. They have done a great deal in elevating 
China's international stature. However, there were also failures 
and set-backs in China's nuclear weapons development. Due to 
insufficient understanding of the scientific principles, some 
nuclear tests did not reach the expected goals. 
shall continue to develop nuclear technology and to maintain an 
effective defense nuclear force for the purpose of national 
defense and world peace. 
<H5>  Chapter VII. Testing of Nuclear Weapons </H5>
  A nuclear weapons testing is the explosion experiment of a 
nuclear device conducted under present conditions and based on 
military needs and scientific research goals. It is 
indispensable to the development of nuclear weapons. China began 
building its nuclear test sites in 1958. By 1989, China had 
conducted 34 nuclear tests using different test methods and at 
different power. These tests provided important basis for the 
research and improvement of nuclear weapons and for the design, 
production, and application of nuclear weapons. They contributed 
greatly to the enhancement of China's defense power. 
<H5>  Section 1. Establishment of Nuclear Test Base </H5>
<H5>  (1) Surveying, Siting and Setting Up of Test Base </H5>
  In April 1958, the Central Military Commission decided to 
build a nuclear test site (later known as the Nuclear Test Base) 
and assigned army engineers the job of surveying, siting, 
designing, and constructing the test base. A nuclear test team 
was formed based on part of the cadres and soldiers of the 
Shangqiu Infantry School. This team was first responsible for 
surveying and constructing the base, and then was given the duty 
of conducting the nuclear tests. In May, the siting committee, 
headed by Commander Chen Shiju [7115 1102 2829] of the engineer 
troops, studied the relevant information and followed the siting 
criteria recommended by the Soviet experts. After the paper 
study, four possible sites were selected, including the region 
west of Dunhuang in Gansu, and the region north of Lop Nur in 
Xinjiang. The region west of Dunhuang seemed to be more 
appropriate. In June, Chen Shiju [7115 1102 2829] led 30 people 
in a detailed survey of the region west of Dunhuang. The region 
160 km west of Dunhuang was chosen to be the central 
experimental zone. This location was also the Soviet experts' 
choice, but the experts pointed out that in finalizing the 
central zone location, high-altitude weather data must be 
acquired. They recommended that a permanent weather station be 
established. In July, Chief of Staff Huang Kecheng [7806 0344 
6134] obtained the approval of Peng Dehuai to build the nuclear 
testing ground. 
  In August 1958, the Ministry of Defense appointed Zhang 
Yunyu 
[1728 5686 6877] to be director of the nuclear test team (later 
the title was changed to Nuclear Test Base Commander), Chang 
Yong [1603 0516] to head the political committee, and Zhang 
Zhishan [1728 1807 0810] to be deputy director (later changed to 
Deputy Commander of the Nuclear Test Base). For 2 months, an 
expedition of 1,800 people consisting of the nuclear test team, 
the topographical drafting team of the chief of staff, the 
geological survey team of the Ministry of Metallurgical Industry 
and the engineer troops, led by Zhang Zhishan and Chang Yong, 
completed the topographical survey, engineering geology, and 
hydrological geology survey. The survey was completed on 20 
August. Subsequently, an engineering siting group completed a 
siting survey. The group consisted of people from the Defense 
Engineering Design Institute of the Engineers, the Fourth 
Institute of Design of the First Ministry of Machine Building, 
the Barracks Management Department of the General Logistics 
Service, and communications troops. In early November, Chen 
Shiju and Soviet geologists made an on-site review of the 
engineering siting survey results. Chen also led the research to 
determine the relative layout of the experimental central zone 
and the auxiliary zones. In the study, the high-altitude wind 
direction was found to be likely from the northwest to the 
southeast, but the wind direction on the surface was mostly from 
the northeast to the southwest. Under such wind directions, the 
effects of the radioactive materials from the nuclear test still 
awaited the study by the Soviet experts. In early November, 
after Zhang Yunyu assumed his duties, he carefully surveyed the 
construction zone and studied the detailed organization of the 
nuclear test team with Chang Yong and Zhang Zhishan. After the 
Soviet experts went home, they analyzed the weather data of the 
border area and determined that the high-altitude wind direction 
at the chosen central experimental zone was from the northwest 
to the southeast, with the Dunhuang region smack in the downwind 
direction. On 21 November 1958, the Soviet Union recommended to 
China by letter that the feasibility of moving the nuclear test 
site to the Lop Nur region in Xinjiang should be considered. 
Chen Shiju and Wan Yi [8001 3015] led a study of the Soviet 
letter and organized further investigation of the relevant 
weather data. They proved that the high-altitude wind direction 
in the Dunhuang region was from the northwest to the southeast. 
In order to protect the residents of the Dunhuang region, Chen 
Shiyu and Wan Yi obtained permission from the Central Military 
Commission and sent Zhang Yunyu, Zhang Zhishan and Shi Guohua 
[0670 0948 5478] to lead a survey team for a site survey in the 
Lop Nur region. From late 1958 to early 1959, they surveyed the 
topographical and geomorphological features, water resources, 
and soil quality of the region and selected an area northwest of 
Lop Nur as a suitable test site. In early January, Wan Yi was 
briefed by Zhang Yunyu and made an aerial survey of Lop Nur 
region. Wan concurred that the region northwest of Lop Nur was 
suitable for a test site. On 6 February, in a report submitted 
to Huang Kecheng, Wan Yi proposed that the nuclear test field be 
built in the region northwest of Lop Nur. The reasons were that 
the predominant wind direction at high altitude in the Lop Nur 
area was westerly, there were no residents within 450 km in the 
downwind direction, and there were no significant settlements 
within a radius of 230 km. Water was readily available for 
construction and for subsistence, and there was strong support 
from the Xinjiang Autonomous Region. The Central Military 
Commission agreed to move the test site from Dunhuang region to 
the Lop Nur region. The Commission notified Wang Enmao, Sai 
Fuding [6357 4395 7844] and the Xinjiang Military Region on 12 
March and asked for leadership and support. Beginning on 1 
April, the survey group led by Zhang Yunyu conducted survey and 
siting for the technical zone, the office and living quarters 
zone, the airport, the communications facility and roads in the 
region west of Lop Nur. This siting survey was participated in 
by the Engineering Troops Headquarters, the Corps of Engineers, 
Defense Engineering and Design Institute, the general logistics 
barracks management department, Military Medicine Institute, Air 
Force construction department, communications troops, the Fourth 
Design Institute of the First Ministry of Machine Building, and 
the survey company of the First Ministry. People in the survey 
team worked around the clock and, in only 11 days, selected the 
site proposals for the various zones and the associated 
construction. On 4 May, the headquarters of the Engineers 
submitted a nuclear test site survey report to Peng Dehuai and 
Huang Kecheng. This report was approved by the Central Military 
Commission on 15 May. 
  Concurrent with the siting survey, the organization of the 
nuclear test team was also being worked on. In November 1958, 
Zhang Yunyu submitted the organization plan to the Ministry of 
Defense. To facilitate the staffing of the team and the planning 
of future work, Wan Yi submitted a draft organization plan to 
Huang Kecheng, Yang Chengwu and Zhang Aiping on 7 January 1959 
and suggested that the plan be adopted for trial use. The plan 
was approved by Huang Kecheng on 10 January. The General 
Political Department picked cadres with sound political and 
military training for the nuclear test team from the services, 
military schools, and the various military regions. The General 
Staff Headquarters dispatched troops from Shenyang, Beijing, and 
Jinan military regions to the nuclear test site. By the end of 
May the nuclear test team was basically established. South of 
where the troops were stationed was a prairie with malan flowers 
in full bloom. At the suggestion of Zhang Yunyu, the office and 
living quarters was named Malan, for the hardy flower that 
survived and bloomed in the desert. 
<H5>  (2) Overcoming Difficulties in Building the Test Base </H5>
  In mid-June 1959, the Nuclear Test Base held its first 
expanded meeting, chaired by the Party Secretary Chang Yong of 
the base. The meeting reviewed the survey and siting effort of 
the previous 10 months and decided that the main mission for the 
second half of 1959 was to focus on the construction preparation 
and getting ready for the ground-breaking in 1960; at the same 
time, the ideology style of the troops was improved and 
organizational and vocational work was carried out. 
  On 27 November, the Communist Party Central Secretariat 
listened to the briefing of the Central Military Commission 
regarding the siting of the test base and the construction 
progress of the base. The Secretariat approved the construction 
plan and requested that the base be built as soon as possible. 
  To accelerate the base construction, the Ministry of Defense 
decided to assign the engineering construction mission to the 
Special Engineering Command (SEC) of the Engineers. The Xinjiang 
Military Region assigned 2,200 new soldiers to the base. The SEC 
assigned four engineer battalions and one vehicle battalion to 
base construction. A construction team of more than 30,000 
people was formed from the above units and the following units: 
Lanzhou No. 2 Construction Company, the Tianjin Construction 
Company, and the construction brigade of the Second Division of 
the Xinjiang Production Construction Army Group. In addition, 
the No. 273 hospital in Guangzhou Military Region was 
transferred to the nuclear test base to serve the construction 
workers. 
  On 1 April 1960, under the leadership of the SEC, the base 
construction began. The major construction projects were road 
construction from the living quarters to the experimental center 
zone and the command control zone, establishing communications 
lines, building a landing strip, barracks, power plant, and 
associated facilities. 
  Two major difficulties were encountered soon after the 
beginning of construction. First, the Soviet Union tore up the 
agreement and halted its aid so the designs and equipment 
specified in the agreement were not forthcoming. Faced with this 
difficulty, Zhang Aiping followed the instruction from Nie 
Rongzhen and immediately organized army units to work on the 
engineering design and construction of the base. The Defense 
Engineering Design Institute of the engineer troops used the 
preliminary Soviet design as a reference and began a technical 
design that suited the Chinese situation. The Signal Corps, the 
Engineers Command and the Nuclear Test Base jointly conducted 
communications and control tests between the control zone and 
the experimental central zone. Chief Hu Ruoxia of the second 
bureau of the Defense Science Commission organized relevant 
engineering and technical personnel and evaluated the designs of 
the test zone. The relevant personnel came from the Defense 
Engineering Design Institute of the Engineers, the 
communications troops of the General Staff Headquarters, and 
technical staff at the Nuclear Test Base and the 9th Bureau of 
the Second Ministry of Machine Building. 
  To ascertain the utility and specifications of the special 
equipment and to organize development and production, the 
Defense Science Commission formed a leading group headed by 
Zhang Yunyu. After a few months, an inventory was made for the 
equipment of known utility and specification. But there remained 
some key measurement equipment whose test methods and 
measurement functions would have to wait until after results 
were obtained in the atomic bomb development. For this reason, 
the construction design of the Nuclear Test Base was still not 
available at the end of 1962. 
  The second difficulty encountered in the base construction 
was that China happened to be in a period of financial 
difficulty. There was a shortage of investment, construction 
materials, construction machinery and associated tools, labor 
force, and transport vehicles. The Defense Science Commission 
asked the base to recognize the national difficulty and make do 
with available resources. The base scaled down some of the 
capital construction and the construction troops did everything 
possible to overcome obstacles and get the job done. To combat 
the lack of vehicles, one commander of an engineer regiment 
carried rocks for road construction on his back. Without enough 
mechanical tools, the troops fixed and fashioned tools by hand. 
One engineer regiment did not have a large crane to build their 
plant, so they made a hoist themselves and moved 11-ton concrete 
structural members. There were not enough steamrollers, so 
reinforced concrete rollers were pulled by men to compact the 
road base. To keep the supply of materials, equipment, and 
living necessities flowing, people in charge of logistics were 
out hustling. Transport was difficult on the Gobi Desert. Grain 
had to be hauled from Nanjiang, 1,700 km away, and the round 
trip took one month. Transporting the large amount of material 
used for constructing the base was a formidable task. Drivers 
drove fully loaded trucks through deserts, mountains, and windy 
passes. Local workers participating in the construction were 
fearless and cooperated fully with the troops. By the end of 
1962, 564 km of roads had been built in the experimental zone 
and where the troops were stationed. Barracks and plant 
buildings exceeded 100,000 square meters. A simple airport had 
been built and 1,800 km of communications line had been set up 
for communications within the base and between the base and 
Urumqi and Beijing. The nuclear test base was taking shape. 
<H5>  Section 2. Explosion Test of the First Atomic Bomb </H5>
  On 16 October 1964, China successfully exploded its first 
atomic bomb, thus erecting a milestone on the road of China's 
development of nuclear weapons. 
<H5>  (1) Preparing for the Test </H5>
  On 3 November 1962, Mao Zedong approved the target date of 
1964 for China's first test of an atomic bomb. After that the 
Defense Science Commission met many times to discuss 
preparations for the various tests. On 21 November, the Defense 
Science Commission proposed that the armed services be 
responsible for the construction of the ground tower experiment 
site, communications engineering, and protective missions such 
as aviation, security, weather, geodesic survey, and mapping. 
The proposal was approved by Nie Rongzhen and Luo Ruiqing. On 25 
December, Zhang Aiping and Liu Xiyao chaired a nuclear test 
preparation meeting. In the meeting assignments were given to 
the Air Force, Headquarters' units, signal troops, chemical 
defense troops, equipment planning units, weather bureaus, 
mapping bureaus, and the General Political and Security 
Department. It was decided that a command protection working 
group consisting of the leading cadres of the units attending 
the meeting should be formed. The group leader was Base 
Commander Zhang Ying. Following the meeting, special task teams 
were formed to prepare for the nuclear test. 
  (A) Establishing Research Institutes and Preparing for 
Experimental Technology 
  In October 1962, the Defense Science Commission proposed and 
obtained approval to form a Nuclear Weapons Experiment Institute 
based on the technology foundation of the Nuclear Test Base. A 
cadre of 20 technical staff was selected from the Second 
Ministry of Machine Building and other units. In early November, 
the Second Ministry assigned Deputy Director Cheng Kaijia of the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute and Director of Technology Zhang Chao 
[1728 6389] of the Nuclear Test Base to be jointly responsible 
for the building of the Nuclear Weapons Experiment Institute. 
Zhang was assigned the deputy position and Cheng Kaijia was the 
deputy director. Forty key technical personnel were selected by 
the Organization Department of the Communist Party Central 
Committee, the General Political Department, and the Defense 
Science Commission. These people included Lu Min [0712 2404], Lu 
Zuying [7120 4371 5593], Xin Xianjie [1823 6343 2638], Dong 
Shoushen [5516 1108 5450], Sun Ruifan [1327 3843 5603], and Wang 
Ruzhi [3769 5423 5347]. One hundred fifty college graduates were 
selected from military engineering schools and other schools to 
work in this new institute. With these personnel, the institute 
took its initial form. 
  The spirit was to proceed with building the institute and to 
prepare for the nuclear test at the same time. The work plan 
(draft) for testing the first atomic bomb and urgent research 
topics were proposed on 26 November 1962 by Cheng Kaijia, Lu 
Min, Lu Zuying, and Xin Xianjie. The proposal was based on the 
preliminary recommendations by the Ninth Bureau of the Second 
Ministry of Machine Building. After half a year of hard work, 83 
topics were proposed by May 1963; 80 percent of the technical 
problems required outside collaboration. Deputy Secretary Zhang 
Zhenhuan [1728 7201 1403] of the Defense Science Commission and 
Bureau Chief Hu Ruogu [5170 5387 0858] organized the 
collaboration with 23 units including the Chinese Academy of 
Sciences, plants and institutes in relevant ministries, and 
research institutes in the armed services. Assignments were 
taken by the Changchun Institute of Optics and Fine Mechanics of 
the Chinese Academy of Sciences, Xi'an Institute of Optics and 
Fine Mechanics, Institute of Physics, Institute of Geophysics, 
Institute of Electronics, Institute of Automation, Institute of 
Mechanics, Atomic Energy Institute of the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building, laboratories No. 19 and No. 10 of the Tenth 
Academy of the Ministry of Defense, the Military Engineering 
School, the Institute of Chemical Weapons, and plants in the 
First, Fourth, and Fifth Ministries of Machine Building. Special 
leadership groups were formed, strong technical resources were 
allocated and superior equipment was acquired to complete the 
testing and manufacturing missions in time. 
  To meet the needs of R&amp;D, the Nuclear Weapons Experiment 
Institute established a technology committee. The main tasks of 
the committee were to discuss technical proposals, to coordinate 
research missions, to check the progress periodically, and to 
solve problems in a timely manner. The base also invited 
renowned scientists to give talks and held more than 100 
technical meetings to carry out extensive discussions of the 
testing plans. 
  The Institute made good progress on the technical topics 
that 
it assumed. Deputy Director Lu Min of the Nuclear Physics 
Laboratory, with strong support from the Atomic Energy 
Institute, developed a complete equipment system for measuring 
nuclear chain reaction kinetics. Xin Xianjie and others proposed 
a plan to develop control system instrumentation and worked with 
Laboratory 19 of the Tenth Academy in developing highly reliable 
and compatible instruments. Wang Ruzhi was responsible for 
measuring the nuclear explosion shock wave and explosion 
equivalence and Sun Ruifan was responsible for measuring the 
fireball and the radiation. Yang Yusheng was responsible for 
obtaining samples of the radioactive cloud and conducting 
radiochemistry analysis. Lu Zuying was responsible for measuring 
early phase radiation. These leaders have all led the technical 
staff and obtained good results. 
  In just a year or so, with strong support of relevant units, 
the Institute developed more than 1,000 testing, sampling, and 
control instruments. Each instrument was validated in a 
simulation explosion and the functions of the instruments were 
found to be reliable and stable. 
  (B) Selecting a Surface Nuclear Test Site 
  From November 1962 to early 1963, the Defense Science 
Commission had more than once brought together the Nuclear 
Weapons Institute, the Nuclear Weapons Institute and other 
research units to study the testing method and testing plan for 
the first atomic bomb in China. Zhu Guangya and Cheng Kaijia 
proposed that the atomic bomb first be exploded on a tower to 
make sure that the action of the core was reliable and then it 
could be tested in an air burst. The tower test would also 
facilitate the collection of reliable data. The Defense Science 
Commission therefore decided that the first atomic bomb test 
would be done on a tower. The Nuclear Test Base then organized a 
siting effort for the ground explosion, formulated a layout plan 
for the test site, and had the Defense Engineering Design 
Institute design a steel tower. In May 1963, Zhang Aiping 
reported to the Central Special Committee and the Central 
Military Commission on the location of the test site and the 
layout of the site. The Central Special Committee approved the 
report in July. The Central Special Committee office took care 
of some of the urgent needs in construction funds, building 
materials and machining tasks. 
  The construction of the nuclear test site began around April 
1963. The design of the test structure was handled by the 
Defense Engineering Design Institute of the Engineers. The 
Institute did not have reference material on most of the items, 
but managed to carry out research and design simultaneously, 
with close cooperation from the Nuclear Weapons Institute and 
the Nuclear Weapons Experiment Institute. Engineers responsible 
for designing the steel tower and associated facilities were led 
by Qu Congzhi [2575 1783 3112]. After investigation and 
discussion, the design was completed at the end of July 1963. 
The design was reviewed and approved by experts organized by the 
Defense Science Commission. 
  The steel tower employed a seamless tube structure with a 
square cross-section. The associated facilities included a 
hoist, air conditioning, electric power, ground transportation, 
and a temperature-controlled suspended basket. The tower was 102 
meters high, had 8,467 components and weighed 76 tons. The 
seamless tubes were made by Anshan Iron &amp; Steel Works as an 
emergency assignment by the State Economic Council. The frame 
was built by the Huabei Metal Structures Plant of the Ministry 
of Construction. The suspended basket and the ground hoist were 
made by the Beijing Crane Factory. These units all gave the 
atomic bomb testing a high priority and completed the tasks. All 
the components for the tower were transported to the 
experimental zone at the end of February 1964. 
  The installation of the tower was led by the Special 
Engineering Technical Team of the Engineers. The precision 
requirements were stringent and the time schedule was tight. An 
installation team of 160 people was formed, based on 32 
technicians for work high above the ground as the key personnel. 
These personnel were transferred from the broadcasting bureau 
and the Lanzhou Chemical Industry Company as requested by the 
Second Bureau of the Defense Science Commission and assisted by 
office of the Central Special Committee. Sixty-eight working 
days were used to complete the construction of validated quality. 
  Designing of the communications project was assumed by the 
General Staff Headquarters' Signal Corps. With close cooperation 
between the design department, user department and the 
construction unit, and with scientific coordination of the 
construction tasks, the job was completed on schedule and the 
quality met specifications. The engineer regiment responsible 
for civil construction ignored the summer heat and winter cold, 
and contributed a great deal to the testing of China's first 
atomic bomb. 
  With hard work by all the departments, all 154 projects were 
completed on schedule at the end of 1964. The quality of the 
output met the requirements and the results created a favorable 
condition for the later air burst test. 
  (C) Test Site Preparation Completed in 3 Months 
  Test site preparation began in May 1964. The 26 participants 
of this effort included the General Staff Headquarters of the 
PLA, the armed services, the military districts of Xinjiang and 
Lanzhou, the Second Ministry of Machine Building, the public 
security department, the Tenth Academy of the Ministry of 
Defense, military engineering schools, institutes of the Chinese 
Academy of Sciences, and the August-First Movie Producers. A 
total of 5,058 people worked on the project. Under the unified 
command of the Defense Science Commission, these units moved 
into the nuclear test experiment field in an orderly manner. 
  To organize and direct the experiment, Zhang Yunyu proposed 
to draw on the experience of combat command and combine this 
with the unique characteristics of scientific testing. The 
organization and command of the test site was based on the 
"Methods for Nuclear Weapons Testing" authored by Zhang Ying. 
  The test mission was jointly assumed by the 21st team of the 
Nuclear Test Base, the ninth team of the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building, and the Atomic Energy Institute. The test 
items included in the experiment were mechanics, optics, and 
three types of nuclear measurements. There were 38 items and 992 
test points. More than 1,000 pieces of test instruments were 
used, most of them within a radius of 8 km from ground zero. The 
wired automated control system for the detonation control and 
measurement was carefully installed and tuned to eliminate 
hidden pitfalls. Cadres, experts, and the people worked together 
with a highly responsible and serious scientific attitude. By 
mid-August, all the equipment had been installed and tuned up. 
The technical team gained experience and became familiar with 
the performance and operation procedures of the instruments; 
tuning procedures were also perfected. 
  Weather condition assurance was handled by the weather 
bureau 
of the General Staff Headquarters. The Bureau assigned a group 
of specialists to enhance the weather stations at the nuclear 
test base; new instruments were installed. In March 1964, the 
General Staff Headquarters invited the Central Weather Bureau 
and weather bureaus in various provinces to form a northwest 
special weather network. Weather conditions for the first atomic 
bomb test and a weather assurance plan were formulated. In the 
meantime, the test base also began long-term, mid-term, and 
short-term weather forecasts at the test base. These forecasts 
were directed by Deputy Bureau Chief He Gefei [6320 2706 7236] 
of the Headquarters weather bureau and weather expert Gu 
Zhenchao [7357 7201 3390] of the Geophysics Institute of the 
Chinese Academy of Sciences. Weathermen analyzed the accumulated 
weather data of the test zone and surrounding areas for the last 
several years. They also investigated the weather pattern of the 
area in the September-to-December period and got the essence of 
3-5-day weather forecast and 48-hour forecasts. 
  Communications assurance was uniformly organized by the 
signal troops of the General Staff Headquarters, with strong 
support from the Ministry of Communications. The Signal Corps 
installed wired communications circuit and opened back-up 
wireless station. The communications assurance team of the 
Nuclear Test Base installed permanent circuits at the test zone, 
built a radio receiver and transmitter center, telephone 
stations, carrier stations, booster stations, power stations, 
and 50 km of insulated wire. Communications were assured between 
the test zone and various stations and points and particularly 
between the test zone and Beijing. 
  Security assurance was led by the chemical defense troops of 
General Staff Headquarters. The chemical defense troops 
organized a 670-man safety team to work at the test zone. They 
jointly formulated safety and security regulations and rules 
with the Nuclear Test Base. They installed wired and wireless 
remote dosimeters and built shower stations. Soldiers of the 
First Battalion of the chemical regiment wore plastic clothing 
and gas masks and conducted training day after day on the Gobi 
Desert. The temperature in the protective clothing reached 
40C. The troops perspired several cups of sweat in each 
hour of training. They lost 1.5 to 2 kg after each training 
session. 
  The Air Force was responsible for aviation. The Air Force 
established a command post at the Nuclear Test Base and used 14 
aircraft for transportation, acquiring radioactive samples, 
dosimetry surveys, weather surveillance, searching the landing 
points of sample parachutes, and aerial photography. Some of the 
tasks had to be carried out above contaminated zones. Pilots and 
test personnel practiced repeatedly and got every movement down 
pat. The Air Force also dispatched a radar battalion to assure 
air warning for the test zone surroundings. 
  Nine military units organized by the Defense Science 
Commission conducted 21 tests of eight different types to obtain 
casualty data on humans and objects and to investigate 
protective measures. Effects on aircraft, tanks, self-propelled 
guns, artillery, communications equipment, ships, entrenchments, 
mines, animals, medicine, food, sea water, and oil were tested 
with the subjects located within a 200- to 300-meter range. 
  Logistics in the experiment zone was handled by the Nuclear 
Test Base, with strong support coming from the General Logistics 
Department, the Second Material Department, the Military 
Medicine College, the Second Mobile Field Hospital, and the 
Ministry of Trade. For shipping material by highway and by rail, 
a transport group was formed. The group was headed by the 
military transport department of the General Staff Headquarters 
and supported by the second material department of the General 
Logistics Department and the Nuclear Test Base. The Ministry of 
Railways provided strong support for this effort. Logistics 
personnel had to deal with long-distance, high-volume 
transportation from scattered supply points; 1,116 pieces of 
rolling stock and 1,270 motor vehicles were mobilized to travel 
more than 18.51 million kilometers to move 33,000 tons of 
equipment. The transportation group made sure that 200 tons of 
supplies were delivered daily. Drivers used their leather 
overcoats to wrap precision instruments, or had back-up drivers 
hold the instruments on their laps so that the equipment was 
delivered undamaged to its destination. To provide on-site 
treatment of illness or injury, medical units organized mobile 
field hospitals and special rescue teams. The Defense Science 
Commission published "Temporary regulations on maximum allowable 
dosage of ionizing radiation." 
  In the process of preparing for the tests, the public 
security department and the general political department jointly 
organized security groups to handle security matters in the 
tests. In the meantime, security orders were issued and the 
public was educated about security. Security troops organized by 
the test base patrolled the perimeter of the site. Soldiers 
carried 30 to 40 kilograms of weapons, backpacks, rations, and 
water and patrolled more than 4,000 kilometers in 6 months to 
ensure the safety of the test zone. 
  All units participating in the test preparations heeded the 
request of the general political department and enhanced their 
ideology effort. Leading cadres and political personnel 
repeatedly explained the significance of the test to the test 
personnel to improve their political responsibility and their 
confidence in accomplishing the mission. 
  With the strong cooperation and hard work of the units, all 
test preparations were completed in mid-August. 
<H5>  (2) Organizing Test Rehearsal for Direct Experience </H5>
  The rehearsal for the first nuclear test was conducted under 
conditions that approached the real test. All preparation tasks 
were extensively and systematically evaluated to assure that the 
first test would be successful. The rehearsal began with the 
transportation of the atomic bomb. For the on-site dry run, the 
Northwest Nuclear Weapons Development Base of the Second 
Ministry of Machine Building specifically produced a simulated 
atomic bomb. On 10 July 1964, Zhang Zhenhuan called a meeting to 
discuss the transportation of the atomic bomb. On 14 July, Zhou 
Enlai pointed that the transport of the simulated atomic bomb 
had to be done carefully to avoid accidents and each step had to 
be kept secure and confidential. Zhang Aiping was joined by 
leaders from the Central Special Committee, the Defense Science 
Commission, the Second Ministry of Machine Building, the 
Security Department, the Air Force, and the Military 
Transportation Department of the General Staff Headquarters on 
24 and 25 July to inspect the transport aircraft and the 
air-conditioned train at Xijiao Airport of Beijing and at the 
Xizhimen train station, respectively. They studied security 
measures at the site and made specific arrangements for the 
combined air and land transportation. Leading cadres and workers 
of units participating in the transportation meticulously 
planned and executed the transportation mission of the simulated 
atomic bomb. 
  Following the decision of the Central Special Committee, a 
68-member first test committee and a 35-member first test party 
committee were formed to provide unified direction and command 
of the entire test mission. The committees were made up by 
leading cadres and experts from the Defense Science Commission, 
the Second Ministry of Machine Building, the Nuclear Test Base, 
and the headquarters and armed services. Zhang Aiping was 
chairman and party secretary of the test committee and Liu Xiyao 
was deputy chairman and deputy party secretary. Major members 
were Chang Jun [2052 6874] (deputy commander of the Air Force), 
Zhang Zhenhuan, Zhang Yunyu, Li Jue, Zhu Guangya, Cheng Kaijia, 
and Bi Qingtang [3968 1987 1016] (deputy director of the 
chemical troops of the General Staff Headquarters), and Zhu 
Qingyun (director of the science and technology department of 
the General Staff Headquarters). 
  The on-site dry run was conducted from 26 August to 1 
September. The nuclear test committee party secretary put forth 
a call for "guaranteed detonation, measurement, and security." 
The rehearsal included bomb assembly, remote detonation, test 
measurement, dosage surveillance, sample acquisition, and 
protection and safety. The rehearsal consisted of single task 
rehearsal and joint rehearsal. Attention was given to the 
assembly and control of the bomb. In assembling the bomb, 
workers repeatedly inspected each component and carried out the 
assembly and tower installation according to the engineering 
procedures. The control system was tested 53 times. Through the 
rehearsal, the test preparation was given an extensive and 
across-the-board inspection; some direct experience was obtained 
for facing the real test. The nuclear test committee party 
secretary ordered that "each small problem must be solved and no 
tests will proceed with unresolved problems." Regulations and 
procedures were modified according to the approach of defining 
personnel, job assignment, position, movement, and relationship. 
Problems in organization and technology were solved one by one. 
Test procedures and command methods were formulated and a main 
control station and safe withdrawal and sample recovery commands 
were established. 
<H5>  (3) First Atomic Bomb Successfully Detonated </H5>
  On 16 and 17 September 1964, the Central Special Committee 
was briefed by Zhang Aiping and Liu Xiyao regarding the 
rehearsal. The timing of the actual test was discussed and an 
agreement was made to conduct the test in October; Zhou Enlai 
would report to Mao Zedong and the Party Central Committee about 
the decision. The test committee held special meetings to 
discuss countdown standards and timing for emergency abort. The 
dosage standards and safety protection rules were revised. 
Preparations were made for smoke and cloud detection outside the 
test zone, for observing ground settlement, and for emergency 
evacuation of personnel and residents. Plans were made to 
respond to premature explosion and errors. 
  The atomic bomb for the real test was moved to the 
experimental site on 4 October. Scientists made an overall 
inspection of all the components and control and measurement 
systems and found the quality to be within specification. Zhang 
Aiping, Liu Xiyao and other leaders and experts of the 
departments personally inspected the assembly of the bomb and 
the control and measurement systems. On the evening of 8 
October, Wang Ganchang, Guo Yonghuai, Peng Huanwu and Deng 
Jiaxian arrived at the test zone by special plane. Leaders, 
experts, and the people in participating units worked together, 
held democratic technology meetings, and made a final check of 
the tasks following the requests of the test committee. 
  On 9 October, the test party committee reviewed the weather 
forecast and recommended that the test be held between 15 
October and 20 October. A special envoy was sent to Beijing to 
report to Zhou Enlai about the preparation and the recommended 
test time. 
  At one o'clock in the morning on 11 October, Zhou reviewed 
the report and had a secretary carrying the report to Mao 
Zedong, Liu Shaochi [0149 1421 1142], Lin Biao, Peng Zhen, He 
Long, Nie Rongzhen, and Luo Ruiqing to get their consent and 
signatures. Zhou then sent a letter to Liu Jie: "Please tell 
Zhang and Liu that we agree with the arrangement described in 
their letter to have the test between 15 and 20 October. They 
may decide the detonation date and time according to the weather 
conditions and inform us after a decision is made." The test 
office in Beijing then forwarded Zhou's instruction to the 
office of the test committee. 
  After all preparations had been completed, the main factor 
affecting the detonation time was weather. On 12 October, the 
weather people forecast a possibility of good weather on the 
16th. People in charge of the test committee then studied the 
weather around the clock with meteorological experts, including 
Gu Zhenchao, and closely watched the weather for the 16th. At 6 
PM on the 14th, Zhang Aiping chaired a party standing committee 
meeting and analyzed the weather in detail. A decision was then 
made to fix the formal test on 16 October. At 1830 14 October, 
the assembled atomic bomb was hoisted to the top of the tower. 
The test committee office communicated the decision to Zhou 
Enlai and Luo Ruiqing via the Beijing test office. Zhou approved 
the decision at 2030 hours. 
  At 1920, 14 October, the atomic bomb was steadily hoisted to 
the top of the tower and positioned in the closed workroom. In 
the morning of the 15th, the test field weather department 
consulted with the General Staff weather bureau and decided that 
the good weather expected for the 16th was meeting the test 
requirements. The test committee decided that 1500 hours on 16 
October would be the zero hour. Zhang Aiping and Liu Xiyai then 
sent a request to Zhou Enlai, Lin Biao, He Long, Hie Rongzhen, 
and Luo Ruiqing for approval of the time. Zhou immediately 
approved the choice of time. 
  After zero hour was approved, the test committee officially 
issued an order to act according to the previously approved 
plan. Combat units and the weather bureaus of the General Staff 
Headquarters, the Defense Industry Office, the Defense Science 
Commission, and the health department double-checked air 
defense, radioactive smoke and cloud detection, radioactive dust 
measurement and monitoring, security and evacuation of key 
factories, aviation safety and control, and radio 
communications. The weather department at the test site made 
weather forecasts every 2 hours. 
  At 0400 on the 16th, Zhang Aiping and Liu Xiyao made a final 
inspection of the preparation under the tower and approved that 
the atomic bomb detonator would be connected at 0630. They then 
went to the main control station to inspect the readiness of the 
control system. 
  Technicians responsible for connecting the detonator, the 
power source and the probes carefully completed all the steps 
according to the manual, followed by self-check, mutual check, 
and check by the leader. At 1030, the tasks were completed, 
Zhang Yunyu, Li Jue, and Zhu Qingyun evacuated from the tower. 
Zhang Yunyu then came to the main control station and handed the 
key to the detonation control panel to Zhang Zhenhuan. At 1430, 
Zhang Aiping, Liu Xiyao and others entered the Baiyun 
observation station located 60 kilometers from ground zero. 
Zhang Aiping then briefed Zhou Enlai on a secure telephone line. 
Zhou then approved the detonation according to schedule. At 
1440, or 20 minutes before zero hour, Zhang Zhenhuan ordered 
"power on," "turn on," and "warm up" in the main control room. 
The main operator Han Yunti [7281 0061 2748] accurately pressed 
the proper buttons and all return signals were normal. Ten 
seconds before zero hour, Zhang Zhenhuan ordered "start" and Han 
Yunti pressed the final button. While the programmed automatic 
control ticked away second by seconds, the announcer called out 
"10,9,8,7,6,5,4,3,2,1, Detonation!" Suddenly, from the depth of 
the Gobi came a blinding flash followed by a giant fireball 
rising from the surface. A hurricane-like shock wave spread from 
the center and an explosive noise shattered the environment. 
After that, the fireball turned into a smoke cloud and gradually 
merged with the dust column from the earth, forming a 
spectacular mushroom cloud. Based on the flash, fireball, and 
mushroom cloud, experts judged that the explosion was a success. 
Suddenly, all the test personnel let out a triumphant cheer for 
China's first atomic bomb test. At 1504, Zhang Aiping reported 
to Zhou Enlai that: "The atomic bomb was exploded on schedule, 
the mushroom cloud has risen, and the explosion indications show 
that it was a nuclear explosion. The test has succeeded." Zhou 
was delighted to hear it and asked people to do well in the work 
after zero hour and report the test results as soon as possible. 
  At the test site, post-zero-hour activities proceeded 
briskly 
and orderly according to the joint plan and the action plan. One 
minute after zero hour, the artillery company fired sampling 
chutes toward the mushroom cloud. Seven minutes after the 
explosion, the first team in charge of radiation surveillance 
moved toward the explosion zone, they discovered that the upper 
half of the steel tower had melted and evaporated and the lower 
half had collapsed on the ground. The rock and sand on the 
ground around the tower were melted by the high temperature of 
the nuclear explosion and had turned into fused glass. One hour 
later, an IL-12 aircraft flew into the mushroom cloud to take 
samples. All the participating units skillfully accomplished 
their tasks. 
  As planned before zero hour, health and safety organizations 
in 15 provinces, municipalities, autonomous regions, and cities 
including Gansu, Beijing, Liaoning, Shanxi, Henan, Jinan, and 
Qingdao intensified their close monitoring of the background 
radiation level and their surveillance of the effects of 
radioactive particulates in the air and on the ground and the 
arrival times at various locations. The Air Force, the General 
Staff chemical troops, and the General Staff weather bureaus 
worked closely and took samples at different locations along the 
diffusion path of the radioactive cloud in a timely fashion. 
  Based on preliminary data taken at various test points, the 
test committee organized experts to make a study. They verified 
that a nuclear explosion had indeed taken place and the power 
was estimated to be more than 20,000 tons of TNT equivalent. 
After that, Zhang Aiping and Liu Xiyao reported the results to 
Mao Zedong, Zhou Enlai, Lin Biao, He Long, Nie Rongzhen, and Luo 
Ruiqing. That evening, the Chinese Communist Party Central 
Committee and the State Council issued a congratulatory telegram 
to the test committee and to all those who had participated in 
the test. 
  When the atomic bomb exploded, 97 percent of the measurement 
instruments functioned accurately and collected a large amount 
of data. Missions to survey the dosage, recover articles, and 
collect smoke samples were completed successfully and all 
personnel entering the contaminated zone had returned safely. 
Chemical analysis was made for soil, water, grain and 
vegetables. Results showed that the radiation dosage in the 
smoke and cloud trace zone was within the allowable range. 
Technicians carefully examined damage to objects and recorded 
the results. Analysis of such data yielded useful experimental 
data for future radiation effect experiments. 
  In mid-November, experts and scientists at the Northwest 
Nuclear Weapons Development Base and the Nuclear Weapons 
Experiment Institute made a systematic analysis of the test 
data. After verifying all key data, they concluded that the 
power of the atomic bomb was 22,000 tons of TNT equivalent, in 
agreement with the theoretical design. Test results showed that 
China's first atomic bomb has reached a high level in 
theoretical design, manufacture and assembly technology, testing 
method, measurement instruments, and automated control 
equipment. The test had achieved the expected goals. 
<H5>  Section 3. First Atomic Bomb Airburst Test </H5>
  On 14 May 1965, China successfully conducted an airburst 
test 
of an atomic bomb. This marked the milestone that China was in 
possession of practical nuclear weapons. 
<H5>  (1) Getting Ready for the Test Before May Day </H5>
  While organizing the tower test for the atomic bomb, the 
Defense Science Commission and the office of Defense Industries 
were also preparing for the airburst test. To satisfy the needs 
for dropping an atomic bomb, a number of units made a joint 
study of the technological requirements for modifying the Hong-6 
aircraft. These units included the Office of Defense Industries, 
the Defense Science Commission, Air Force combat units, the 
engineering units, the Fourth Bureau of the Third Ministry of 
Machine Building, and the Ninth Bureau of the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building. In September 1964, the Xi'an Airplane Plant of 
the Third Ministry of Machine Building completed the 
modification of the first Hong-6. 
  In December 1964, the General Staff Headquarters and the 
Defense Science Commission formulated a plan for the airburst 
test. They determined that the goal for the airburst test was to 
verify the technical performance of the atomic bomb under 
dynamic conditions and to measure its power. Test results would 
be used as a basis for improving the design. More complete 
radiation effect tests would also be conducted. They required 
that all preparation be completed by 1 May 1965. This plan was 
approved by the Central Special Committee. 
  After the General Staff Headquarters and the Defense Science 
Commission jointly issued the test and protection plan, military 
and non-military units completed various technical preparations. 
From mid-February 1965, on-site preparations were carried out at 
the Nuclear Test Base. By 11 April, construction teams of the 
nuclear test base, the railway troops and the Ministry of 
Petroleum had completed 351 tasks including installing the 
target marker and the radar reflectors, and various testing and 
radiation effect experiments. After 20 days of tense work, 
equipment installation personnel had installed 727 pieces of 
control and measurement instruments and performed 48 tests. 
Preparations for the comprehensive rehearsal had been completed. 
  Deputy Commander Cheng Jun oversaw the air practice. Two 
teams made up by Li Yuanyi [2621 3293 0001] and Yu Fuhai [0060 
4395 3189], and Xu Wenhong [1776 2429 1347] and Zhao Chengye 
[6392 2052 2814] of the Fourth Independent Regiment flew Hong-6s 
for high altitude optics flight training. By 23 April, they had 
flown 11 training flights and dropped 29 training bombs over the 
airburst test zone. They also flew 14 training flights at other 
Air Force target ranges and achieved the required bombing 
accuracy. In addition, the Air Force conducted training flights 
for the sampling plane and for parachute surveillance and 
radiation surveillance flights. 
  The General Staff weather bureau led a study of weather 
analysis. Units participating in the study included Air Force 
headquarters, the Lanzhou Air Force weather bureau, the 
Northwest General Missile Test Base, and the weather department 
of the Nuclear Test Base. The analysis was based on weather 
trends of the large area, actual observation data of stations in 
the test zone, and local weather changes. They mastered the 
basic rules for the appearance, sustainment, and disappearance 
of good weather days. Using available equipment, they tried 
everything to monitor weather changes and to improve the 
forecast accuracy. 
  The communications department studied the emphases of the 
various stages and formulated a protection plan. They inspected 
communications equipment and circuits, and repeatedly practiced 
the procedure. The General Staff training department organized 
tactical teams of the armed services and prepared for the 
tactical exercise under the conditions of a nuclear explosion. 
  Bombing practice used three models of bombs. The two bombs 
for the dry run and the two bombs (one spare) for the official 
test were fully assembled at the Northwest Nuclear Weapons 
Development Base. Vibration tests showed that they were 
structurally dependable. The detonation control system and the 
remote control system functioned normally and met the 
requirements for air transport and dropping. 
  In mid-March, Zhang Aiping, Zhang Zhenhuan and others 
inspected the bombing training and the preparation for the 
airburst test at the flight training field and the nuclear 
experimental zone. 
  On 20 March, the Central Special Committee reviewed the 
nuclear bomb preparation. Zhou Enlai stressed in the meeting 
that this test be properly prepared, experience from last test 
be learned, and arrangements be made more carefully, more 
thoroughly, and more securely. In a word, all experimental data 
that should be acquired would be acquired. To test the effects 
of the explosion, the killing and damage radius in the air, on 
the ground, and under different conditions had to be determined. 
China was facing nuclear blackmail and nuclear threat. It did 
not want to make hundreds of nuclear tests. Our nuclear tests 
were all based on military and scientific and technological 
needs and had to be successful on the first test. After the 
meeting, Zhang Aiping and Zhang Zhenhuan reported the details of 
the airburst test preparations to the Central Special Committee. 
Such details included basic tests, effects tests, tactical 
exercise, surveillance of radioactive smoke and clouds outside 
the test zone, earthquake, micropressure, and surface 
radioactive dust measurements. Liu Shaoqi, Deng Xiaoping, and 
Peng Zhen reviewed the report. Zhou Enlai also talked 
face-to-face with the standing committee members of the 
Communist Party Central Political Bureau. 
  With strong commitment from everyone, it was decided that 
all 
preparation before the comprehensive preview should be completed 
by the first of May. 
<H5>  (2) Integrated Rehearsal and "Practical Demonstration" </H5>
  On 28 April, a comprehensive rehearsal was conducted 
following formal procedure. The aircraft piloted by Li Yuanyi 
and Yu Fuhai dropped the first dry-run bomb at the experimental 
zone at 8:50 and the bomb exploded on time. The explosion 
projection point was 96 meters southeast of the target center. 
The detonation and remote sensing systems worked normally and 
ground test instruments functioned basically normally. 
Organization and command and various logistical protection were 
all accomplished according to plan. After the preview, various 
units examined the problems revealed in the trial and took 
corrective action to complete the final preparation. Meanwhile, 
the Central Special Committee and the Central Military 
Commission approved a 90-member second nuclear test committee to 
lead the test. The committee was chaired by Zhang Aiping and had 
nine vice chairmen, including Liu Xiyao. 
  On 1 May, the weather department reported the possibility of 
good weather from the 9th to the 15th. Zhang Aiping and others 
then recommended to the Central Special Committee and the 
Central Military Commission that a good day be chosen in that 
period to conduct the real test. Mao Zedong and Zhou Enlai also 
approved the recommendation. Zhou stressed that the test must be 
assured and should not be forced. 
  On the 7th, leaders of the test committee met with experts 
and weather forecasters in early morning and at 1400 hours and 
determined that the weather on the 8th might satisfy 
requirements, so they recommended that the test be conducted on 
the 8th. Zhou Enlai and Luo Ruiqing then approved the 
recommendation. At this time, Zhou had Yang Chengwu and Luo 
Shunchu work on the readiness, radioactive trace surveillance 
outside the test site and measurement of ground settlement. 
  Late at night on the 7th, the test committee again examined 
the weather. At 2 AM on the 8th, Zhang Aiping spoke to Zhou 
Enlai on the telephone and recommended that zero hour be set at 
8:00; Zhou approved. But at 4:30 on the 8th, weather forecasters 
found in the sensing information that the high-altitude winds 
over the test site had shifted from northwest to northeast and 
test conditions were not met. Zhang Zhenhuan and Zhang Yunyu 
then immediately had their people calculate the possible 
contamination region. Results showed that the test site would be 
contaminated if the test took place. At 6 AM, Zhang Aiping 
immediately placed a call to Zhou Enlai to report the situation. 
Zhou immediately ordered a halt to the test and changed the 
status to "ready." 
  Although the test did not take place on the 8th, a general 
inspection did. It was a practical demonstration more practical 
than the comprehensive rehearsal. The practical demonstration 
proved that the preparations had been done well and that the 
systems could endure the real test. Moreover, it also improved 
the command experience. 
<H5>  (3) Successful Airburst Test of First Atomic Bomb </H5>
  During the waiting period, the various units took protective 
measures for the nuclear bomb projectile, the aircraft, 
expensive instruments, and specimens. The test committee 
continued to focus on the weather conditions. After working 
around the clock for several days, a forecast came at 2:30 on 14 
May that there would be a brief period of good weather from 9:00 
to 12:00 o'clock on 14 May. The test committee then boldly 
decided that 9:30 14 May would be zero hour. The decision was 
reported to Zhou Enlai and Luo Ruiqing and they approved the 
decision. 
  The zero hour information was then given to the Air Force 
command and the Northwest Nuclear Weapons Development Base. Upon 
receiving the information, they made a final inspection of the 
assembled atomic bomb and hung it in the bomb bay of the 
aircraft. Responsible personnel at various levels signed their 
names. At the test site, the final preparation was completed in 
only 5 and one-half hours. 
  At 30 seconds past 8:30, Li Yuanyi and Yu Fuhai took off 
with 
the bomb. At 9:26, Yu Fuhai reported seeing the target marker at 
a distance of 50 km. To ensure accuracy and to make sure that 
ground instruments and effects test instruments could obtain 
reliable data, the flight plan called for the plane to enter the 
target zone three times. After finding the target marker, Yu 
Fuhai computed the drop and aimed at the target based on 
aircraft altitude, speed, wind speed, and wind direction. Yu 
Fuhai flew over the target twice and reported the aiming 
situation and the computed data to ground command. The command 
post then ordered the aircraft to make the third entry. The 
arming switch was turned on at 9:53. At 9:57, the atomic bomb 
was connected to its power source. At 9:58:40, the automatic 
bomb release was activated and the atomic bomb was released at 
9:59:10. Due to the sudden loss of weight, the plane jerked up, 
and the atomic bomb was heading straight to the target. At 
9:59:38, the atomic bomb exploded in the air above the target 
marker. 
  As planned, the Nuclear Weapons Experiment Institute and the 
artillery effects team immediately made rapid measurements of 
the nature of the explosion, its altitude, projection point, and 
power. Preliminary results were reported within 10 minutes: The 
explosion altitude was about 500 meters, the explosion 
projection point was about 135 meters from the target center, 
the azimuth was 232 degrees, and the explosion power was greater 
than 30,000 tons of TNT equivalent. Zhang Aiping immediately 
spoke to Zhou Enlai and Luo Ruiqing on the phone and reported 
the preliminary results. Zhou and Luo were very pleased and 
congratulated all the people who had participated in the test. 
Zhou also congratulated the bomber crew. 
  Three minutes after the explosion, the first radiation 
observation eschelon of the first chemical company of the 
Nuclear Test Base left its position and moved toward the 
explosion zone. Twenty minutes after the explosion, a report on 
the dosage in the contaminated zone was available. Three hours 
after the explosion, various units followed the plan and 
systematically recovered numerous items. tactical demonstration 
teams came through the explosion zone 8 hours after the 
explosion and gained some understanding of tactical action using 
atomic explosion effects. There were 3,250 man-times of entry 
into the contaminated zone and not one person exceeded the 
allowable dosage standard. By observing the damage situation of 
the test articles, a limit of the killing power was obtained. 
All necessary information was obtained in this one test. 
  Outside the nuclear test site, various departments conducted 
planned tests and proved that there was very little surface 
particulate contamination, all dosages were within the allowable 
range. 
  To praise and encourage the people who had participated in 
the development and testing of the nuclear weapons, the 
Communist Party Central Committee and national leaders Zhou 
Enlai, Lin Biao, Chen Yi, He Long, Nie Rongzhen, and Luo Ruiqing 
received the department leaders, scientists, technical experts, 
and pilots in the Great Hall of the People on 30 May. 
<H5>  Section 4. Test of Missile With Nuclear Warhead </H5>
  To test a missile with a nuclear warhead, the missile serves 
as the carrier and a nuclear warhead is delivered to a target 
location to cause a nuclear explosion. On 27 October 1966, China 
successfully delivered an atomic bomb with a medium- to 
short-range missile and conducted a nuclear explosion test. It 
marked the possession of practical missile warhead weapons by 
China. 
<H5>  (1) A Careful Decision </H5>
  On 5 December 1963, the Central Special Committee made a 
decision that China's nuclear weapons development should be 
based mainly on missile-delivered warheads supplemented by 
aircraft-delivered warheads. To link up the atomic bomb 
technology with the missile technology, technical discussions 
and coordination were held by scientists and engineers from the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute of the Second Ministry of Machine 
Building and the Fifth Academy of the Ministry of Defense. These 
activities were organized by the Central Special Committee, the 
Defense Industries Office, and the Defense Science Commission. 
R&amp;D efforts were initiated according to technical topic. 
  Since China had no experience in this area, it had to go 
through a learning process in evaluating the performance of the 
missile's atomic warhead. Initially, the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute believed that an atomic bomb would be ready for 
installment on a medium- to short-range missile after ground 
simulation tests for missile flight environment, detonation 
test, full-range flight test of the detonation control system, 
and underground tests of the performance of the nuclear warhead. 
For this reason, the third nuclear test arranged by the Defense 
Science Commission was an underground test. The purpose was to 
determine the power and performance parameters of the medium-to 
short-range missile with an atomic warhead. In November 1965, 
the Defense Science Commission and the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building did some in-depth analysis and decided that the 
underground test could not test whether the atomic bomb would 
satisfy the actual flight conditions. In order to develop 
nuclear warheads that could survive the flight test, the 
underground test was temporarily put on hold; instead, a "cold" 
test under flight conditions would be conducted. Once there was 
strong confidence, a "hot" flight test would be made. In terms 
of actual need, the "hot" flight test would be best conducted at 
full equivalence and full range so as to test the combination of 
the atomic bomb and missile technology. On 13 December, the 
Second Ministry made such a suggestion to the Central Special 
Committee. At the end of December, Zhou Enlai chaired the 
Central Special Committee meeting and carefully studied the 
suggestion. Zhou asked the Defense Science Commission to make up 
several scenarios and make some comparisons for the Committee to 
evaluate. 
  In February 1966, the Defense Science Commission invited 
leaders from the Second and Seventh Ministries of Machine 
Building, the General Staff, the Equipment Planning Department, 
the Northwest General Missile Test Base, and the Nuclear Test 
Base to study the test proposal of the (modified) medium- to 
short-range surface-to-surface missile with nuclear warhead. The 
meeting decided that neither ground simulation tests nor 
underground explosion tests could truly simulate the actual 
fight conditions to test the combination of the missile and the 
atomic bomb. A "cold" flight test could not evaluate the actual 
condition of the atomic bomb during flight. A full-range, 
full-power "hot" test with a normal trajectory and a 
low-altitude explosion would not only achieve the test goal but 
would also conform to actual war conditions. In terms of 
reliability and test safety, the (modified) medium- to 
short-range missile had its own self-destruction device. If a 
malfunction occurred during the powered part of the flight, a 
signal could be sent from the ground to destroy the missile. The 
nuclear warhead had a safety switch and the switch would not 
open if the warhead fell off during flight. The bomb body would 
be destroyed upon impacting the ground but there would not be a 
nuclear fission reaction. So the "hot" test was feasible from a 
safety point of view. It was therefore decided that a "cold" 
test would be made as a practice run, followed by a "hot" test. 
In the meeting, specific studies were also made for the launch 
site, the target zone, the range, the explosion altitude, the 
test items, and the division of tasks. On 26 February, the 
Defense Science Commission reported the study results to the 
Central Special Committee. 
  On 11 March, Zhou Enlai chaired a Central Special Committee 
meeting and carefully studied the Defense Science Commission 
report. Based on the technology level at the time, and the 
desire to quickly develop and test a missile warhead, the 
Central Special Committee agreed to the test plan proposed by 
the Defense Science Commission. The Committee asked the Science 
Commission to organize the Second and Seventh Ministries and 
conduct more preparatory tests so that the test could be 
guaranteed absolutely safe. The commission also set a date of 
the end of August for completing all preparatory tests. 
<H5>  (2) Careful Preparation </H5>
  In order to guarantee the absolute safety of the "hot" 
flight 
test of the nuclear warhead missile, the Defense Science 
Commission, the Office of Defense Industries, and the Second and 
Seventh Ministries of Machine Building made careful 
preparations. In March and June 1966, the Defense Science 
Commission twice reviewed the technical plan, launch plan, 
measurement plan, and accident handling plan and set a progress 
schedule for field engineering, weather, communications, 
aviation, and logistical tasks. Meanwhile, special topics 
studies and arrangements were also made for the political work 
of the test mission. The Office of Defense Industries also 
called a number of meetings of the Second and Seventh Ministries 
to study the development and test of the missile and warhead. 
Problems that arose in the coordination were resolved in a 
timely manner. 
  The Nuclear Weapons Institute of the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building conducted a series of tests for the nuclear 
device and the detonation control system. It also revisited the 
reliability of the detonation system and the self-destruction 
system and concluded that reliability was assured. Plants and 
institutes of the Seventh Ministry of Machine Building completed 
the production mission on schedule and maintained high quality. 
They also conducted self-destruction tests of the bomb and 
proved that the safety system functioned reliably. 
  The Northwest General Missile Test Base proposed a launch 
plan, selected the launch position, built a temporary launch 
pad, underground control and command rooms and personnel 
shielding structures, and began operation practice. The nuclear 
test base selected the target zone, built rudimentary roads to 
the target zone, constructed measurement stations, proposed 
measurement plan, and made arrangements to measure the explosion 
position and explosion power. The two bases respectively 
formulated safety measures for the launch position and the 
target zone. 
  On 30 June, on his way back to Beijing from an overseas 
trip, 
Zhou Enlai stopped by the Northwest General Missile Test Base, 
viewed the launch test for the medium- to short-range missile 
and inspected the preparation for the nuclear weapons test. 
  On 5 September, Nie Rongzhen was briefed by the Defense 
Science Commission and leaders of participating units, and 
inspected the completion of the preparation. On the 12th, Zhang 
Zhenhuan led some workers to the two bases to inspect the 
preparation, and put the test plan and safety measures on a 
solid basis. On the 15th, the General Political Department 
approved the formation of a party committee for the 
"missile-bomb" test. Zhang Zhenhuan was named the first deputy 
secretary and Li Zaishan [2698 0375 1472] and Zhang Yunyu were 
the deputy secretaries. From 24 to 29 September, the launch zone 
and the target zone conducted a number of time-synchronized 
logistical communications and signal exchanges and joint launch 
practices. Through these practices, the operators became 
familiar with procedure-and-command relationship, and actually 
checked the test facilities, control systems, wired and wireless 
communications systems and circuits in the target zone. 
Inaccurate call-out by commanding personnel, sluggish hand 
operation, and malfunctions of individual instruments were 
corrected. 
  On 25 September, Zhou Enlai again chaired the Central 
Special 
Committee meeting and in principle approved the arrangement of 
the Defense Science Commission to conduct joint self-destruct 
tests in October, "cold" flight tests in mid-October, and to 
determine the date for the "hot" test based on the results of 
the above two tests. The Central Special Committee also ordered 
the Defense Science Commission to form a joint group for unified 
command to temporarily evacuate the 10,000 residents under the 
flight path of the missile. 
  At the end of September, the missiles and warheads used for 
the self-destruct tests and for the "cold" flight tests arrived 
at the Northwest General Missile Test Base. Testing at the base 
and communications during the test, weather, aviation, medical 
care, protection and smoke, and cloud detection outside the test 
site had all been properly handled. The safety of the residents 
was put on a solid basis. 
  To ensure that the "hot" flight of the combination test was 
failure-proof, a combination flight test was conducted at the 
Northwest General Missile Test Base on 7 October to evaluate the 
safety self-destruct system. After the launch, all the 
instruments on the missile and on the ground functioned 
normally. Following the planned procedure, trajectory and 
timing, the warhead was first destroyed in the air, followed by 
the destruction of the missile body. The target zone also went 
through a normal procedure exercise. The test results showed 
that the missile functioned normally and the safety 
self-destruct system was reliable. The goals of the test had 
been achieved. 
  On 8 October, Zhou Enlai chaired a Central Special Committee 
meeting and heard Zhang Zhenhuan's report on the combination 
test, the self-destruction experiment, and the preparation for 
the "cold" and "hot" flight tests. Zhou was also briefed on the 
weather forecast for October. Zhou pointed out that since the 
test was to be conducted on land, there could be no accidents. 
The "cold" test had to be carefully inspected; the "hot" had to 
be even more carefully monitored. Every step had to be 
100-percent problem-free. The nuclear warhead had to go through 
impact tests, including oblique impact and lateral impact. The 
warhead had to be guaranteed not to explode under various 
anomalous conditions. The "cold" flight was scheduled around the 
15th. Test results had to be submitted within 2 or 3 days so 
that Chairman Mao could make up his mind. Zhou assigned Zhang 
Zhenhuan to be responsible for this test. 
  At 8:33 on 13 October, the first "cold" test missile was 
successfully launched. At 1730 on the 16th, a second "cold" test 
missile was launched. Loaded with simulated warheads, these two 
missiles made normal flights, the detonation control systems 
worked reliably, and the explosive components were detonated at 
the planned altitude above the target zone. The reliability of 
the missile and the detonation control system was again 
verified. In these two "cold" tests, all formal procedures and 
steps were executed in the launch zone and the target zone. The 
tests served as overall checks for all the preparatory work. 
<H5>  (3) Combination Test </H5>
  On 12 October, Zhou Enlai called a special meeting and, 
together with Nie Rongzhen, Ye Jianying, and Yang Chengwu, was 
briefed by Zhang Zhenhuan about details of the launch zone 
inspection and target zone preparation. Joined by leaders of the 
relevant departments and experts, they again made an 
across-the-board review of the test preparation and safety 
issues. Ye pointed out that the success of that test would 
attract great attention in China. The "hot" test was the final 
test and everything had to be checked carefully, including every 
screw, and human error had to be eliminated. Zhou stressed that 
the test must be fail safe and assigned Nie Rongzhen to take 
charge of the launch. 
  Nie arrived at the Northwest General Missile Test Base on 25 
October and heard a briefing on the testing situation of the 
missile and the warhead. He inspected the test preparation and 
relayed Mao Zedong's instructions given in the previous evening 
when Mao heard Nie's briefing. Mao said that the upcoming test 
could succeed or fail, but it would not matter even if it 
failed. Nie took Mao's comment to mean that people should 
prepare for the worst but do their best to succeed. Nie asked 
the leading cadres to carry out Mao's instruction and carefully 
execute the final preparations. 
  At 1600 hours, the test committee studied the weather 
forecast for the next 48 hours in the launch zone and the target 
zone. It was deep autumn weather and the wind was strong at the 
launch zone. The forecast was that weather would improve after 
daybreak on the 26th. Nie agreed with the opinion of the test 
committee that the formal launch should be scheduled for the 
27th. 
  At the launch site, the testing team carefully completed all 
tests for the missile and made sure that all the technical 
specifications were met. Scientists of the Northwest Nuclear 
Weapons Development Base repeatedly and rigorously inspected and 
tested each component. With assistance from scientists of the 
First Academy of the Seventh Ministry of Machine Building, final 
assembly of the nuclear warhead was carefully checked out. 
  At about 9 o'clock on the 26th, the test committee 
determined 
that the launch time would be 9 o'clock on the 27th. Zhou Enlai 
approved this launch time and asked people to calmly do their 
job. Launch team No. 2, under the leadership of Yan Zhenqing 
[7346 2182 3237] accurately carried out several hundred 
operations; all preparations fully met the requirements. The 
nuclear missile was ready for launch. 
  At 2 AM on the 27th, the target zone suddenly had 6-7-grade 
strong winds. This weather change was not good for safety in the 
target zone. Zhang Yunyu, being in charge of the target zone, 
prepared for the worst-case scenario and organized people for 
emergency evacuation preparation. Meanwhile, he kept a close eye 
on the weather. At this key moment, the weather department of 
the base made real-time observations of the weather and, after 
rigorous calculation, determined that the strong wind would move 
out of the target zone at 8 o'clock at a speed of 50 km/hr; the 
weather would then turn fair. That forecast turned out to be 
very accurate and the strong winds indeed moved out of the 
region at about 8 o'clock. 
  At about 9 o'clock, the launch commander gave the launch 
order. Immediately, the missile was ignited and leaped into the 
air. Following the program, it ascended, turned, and flew in a 
westward direction. After separation from the missile body, the 
warhead flew toward the target zone as programmed. The 
observation instruments in the target zone aimed at the incoming 
warhead and the remote sensing instruments received radio 
signals for "target acquired!" and "remote sensing signals 
normal!" At 09:09:14, the nuclear warhead exploded above the 
target zone at an altitude of 569 meters. It turned into an 
incandescent fireball and emitted a blinding flash. After some 
violent churning of smoke and cloud, a mushroom cloud slowly 
rose. All the measurement instruments in the target zone 
functioned well and obtained data. Preliminary test results 
showed that the explosive power was in agreement with the 
theoretical design values. The test was a success. 
  The success of this test showed that China now had a 
practical nuclear missile. It was highly significant for China 
in terms of an accelerated pace for nuclear weapons development 
and a stronger national power. In the meantime, China also 
gained the full experience of developing a nuclear warhead. 
After that, other models of China's surface-to-surface nuclear 
warheads did not go through this type of actual flight test. 
<H5>  Section 5. First Hydrogen Bomb Test </H5>
  On 28 December 1966, 2 years and 2 months after its first 
atomic bomb test, China successfully exploded its first hydrogen 
bomb on a tower in Lop Nur. Half a year after that, on 17 June 
1967, China conducted its first successful hydrogen bomb 
airburst test. 
<H5>  (1) First Hydrogen Bomb Principle Test </H5>
  At the end of December 1965 the Central Special Committee 
approved a principle explosion test of a hydrogen bomb to be 
conducted around the end of 1966. In early April 1966, the 
Defense Science Commission organized a study of the principle 
test for a hydrogen bomb. After analysis and debate, it was 
concluded that the spare steel tower for the first atomic bomb 
test could be used for the hydrogen bomb principle test. The 
Engineers Research Institute was to redesign the room for 
installing the hydrogen bomb and the hoist system. In the 
meantime, the measurement requirements of the hydrogen bomb 
principle test were studied. New measurement items were added 
and the measurement tasks were assigned to various units. 
Subsequently the nuclear test base decided the position of the 
steel tower and formulated the experimental plan. New 
measurement items were determined and needed instruments were 
arranged. 
  In mid-June, the Defense Science Commission reviewed the 
experimental plan, discussed the safety measures for nearby 
residents in the downwind direction, and investigated the 
effects test plan. The commission asked that preparations for 
the tests be completed by 1 December. The Central Special 
Committee approved the test plan and work assignment of the 
Defense Science Commission. Preparations continued at the test 
site by the participating units. 
  Engineering Preparation 
  This test involved a total of 113 engineering projects and 
needed 1,400 kilometers of electric cable. The test base used 
only 5 months to complete the projects with acceptable quality. 
The steel tower construction began on 18 June and was completed 
at the end of October. The total number of working days was less 
than 100 and it took 80 days less to construct than the first 
tower. 
  Measurement Preparation 
  The main issues of the measurement preparation were to 
determine which measurement data should be used to evaluate the 
success of the hydrogen bomb test, and which techniques should 
be used to acquire these data. Theoretical designers and 
measurement experts discussed and formulated the test items. To 
evaluate the working condition of the hydrogen bomb in the 
initial phase, four new test items were added. These tasks were 
accomplished by the cooperation of a number of institutes, 
including the Nuclear Weapons Institute, the Atomic Energy 
Institute, the Physics Institute of the Chinese Academy of 
Sciences, the Shanghai Institute of Optics and Fine Mechanics, 
the Xi'an Institute of Optics and Fine Mechanics, the Changchun 
Institute of Optics and Fine Mechanics, and Zhejiang University. 
The effort was led by the Nuclear Weapons Test Institute. The 
test employed 1,014 pieces of instruments and required only 1 
month to finish the on-site installation. 
  Safety and Protection 
  Compared with previous tests, this test was characterized by 
greater power, lower explosion point, and greater surface 
contamination. The power of the hydrogen test was hampered by 
the steel tower and other field conditions. Even with reduced 
load of fission and fusion materials in the design, its 
explosive power was still 5 to 6 times greater than China's 
first atomic bomb. To reduce the impact of radioactive fallout 
on the test zone and the downwind direction, experts from the 
health department of the Defense Science Commission and the 
Military Medical College made exhaustive studies of safety 
issues; their consensus was that the test would not affect the 
health of the residents. Studies by Cheng Kaijia and others had 
shown that the weather conditions at the test must be carefully 
chosen. In addition, the ground surface within 230 meters of the 
tower base must be reinforced with cement and rock to reduce the 
amount of loose soil swept into the cloud. Simulation tests made 
with conventional explosives showed that these measures were 
equivalent to raising the steel tower by 60 meters. The safety 
of the test was assured. 
  Testing the Explosion Effects 
  To further investigate the effects of the hydrogen bomb 
explosion on structures and weapons and to study the biological 
effects, the Defense Science Commission organized 16 military 
units and arranged 81 tests using 1,377 articles of 158 
different types. 
  Test Command and Logistical Protection 
  In formulating the test plan for this test, the nuclear test 
base recognized the complexity and safety requirements of the 
test. Preparations were initiated for communications, air 
travel, weather, action plans, safety protection, emergency 
evacuation, and results recovery. The test was conducted in a 
cold winter and the air temperature at the test zone was about 
22C below zero. The test base prepared for personnel and 
equipment protection against the cold. They organized 68 food 
service units, stored 100,000 kilograms of vegetables and 
maintained a drinking water supply using 50 water trucks. 
  Having directed the nuclear missile test at the Northwest 
General Missile Test Base, Nie Rongzhen came to the nuclear test 
base again on 31 October and inspected the preparation for the 
hydrogen bomb principle test. He telegraphed Zhou Enlai and 
reported the remaining weak links in the test and argued 
strongly for conducting the test in December or the following 
January. 
  Following Zhou's order, the Second Ministry of Machine 
Building made an extensive review of the production of the 
hydrogen bomb device. The Defense Science Commission sent Hu 
Ruogu to the Northwest Nuclear Weapons Development Base to solve 
some problems in the test preparation. Because of the tight 
schedule, Hu consulted with the test base and Air Force leaders 
and decided to fly the hydrogen bomb to the test site. 
  On 11 December, Zhou Enlai chaired a Central Special 
Committee meeting and agreed in principle to the arrangements 
made by the Defense Science Commission and the Second Ministry. 
Zhou agreed to a test date in late December or early January. 
The meeting stressed that, because the radioactive contamination 
of the test must be tightly controlled, the test had to be 
conducted in the right weather on the surface and at high 
altitude. Contamination of the test zone and the downwind 
direction had to be prevented as much as possible. The Central 
Special Committee also assigned Zhang Zhenhuan as the chief 
commander of the test. 
  After the preparations were basically ready, an all-site 
joint practice and a comprehensive rehearsal were conducted 
respectively on 18 and 20 December. Problems revealed in the 
practice were resolved. 
  The hydrogen bomb device to be used in the formal test was 
delivered to the test zone at 5:20 on 21 December. Assembly of 
the bomb was completed on the 25th and Nie Rongzhen flew into 
the test zone on the 26th to direct the test. 
  In the afternoon of the 26th, the hydrogen bomb device was 
hoisted up the tower. In the evening, Nie Rongzhen studied the 
weather with Zhang Zhenhuan and other members of the test 
committee. Zero hour was set at 12:00 of the 28th. At 19:00 on 
the 27th, Zhou Enlai telegraphed his approval. 
  From 2100 on the 27th to the early morning of the 28th, the 
detonator of the hydrogen bomb was installed. After inspecting 
the exterior and components of the hydrogen bomb, installers 
withdrew from the tower. 
  At 12:00 on 28th, the hydrogen bomb exploded on schedule. A 
large amount of data were taken after the explosion, 
particularly data on the thermonuclear reaction process, the 
reaction rate of the lithium deuteride-6 and the fusion power. 
Based on the integrated analysis of the measured data, the 
explosive power was estimated to be 122,000 tons of TNT 
equivalent. The test was a success. 
  This test was a hydrogen bomb surface test whether one 
considers the theory, the structure, or the measured data and 
results. The success was proof that China had mastered the key 
technology for making the hydrogen bomb. It was another 
milestone in China's nuclear weapons development history. After 
the United States, the Soviet Union, and the United Kingdom, 
China became the fourth nation in the world to master hydrogen 
bomb technology. 
  Because the weather and protection department of the Nuclear 
Test Base had chosen the appropriate wind direction to conduct 
the test, the central axis of the radioactive cloud missed the 
residential area downwind from the explosion. After the 
explosion, from 1500 hours 28 December to 30 December, the Air 
Force flew 27 sorties according to the plan. Radioactive clouds 
and smoke were surveyed at different altitudes. Measurement 
results showed that the radioactive smoke and clouds did not 
cause any adverse effects in the regions they passed over. 
<H5>  (2) First Hydrogen Bomb Airburst Test </H5>
  From 30 to 31 December 1966, Nie Rongzhen held a meeting at 
the nuclear test base. The meeting was attended by Qian Xuesen, 
Peng Huanwu, Zhu Guangya, Chen Nengkuan, Cheng Kaijia, Yu Min, 
Zhou Guangzhao, and Fang Zhengzhi. These experts all agreed that 
the hydrogen bomb principle test was a success. They recommended 
that, based on the design principle, structure, and bomb body, 
the next step should be the development of a million-ton 
full-power hydrogen bomb for airburst. This approach should be 
recognized as the direction for future medium-range and 
long-range surface-to-surface hydrogen bomb warheads. After some 
more discussion, it was decided that the hydrogen bomb airburst 
test should be conducted before 1 October 1967. 
  In early February 1967, several scientists in the Nuclear 
Weapons Institute of the Second Ministry of Machine Building 
suggested to Hu Ruogu and Zhu Guangya that the theoretical 
design of the full-power hydrogen bomb could be finalized in 
February and the test date should be moved forward. They wanted 
to explode the hydrogen bomb by 1 July, before the French could 
explode their bomb. The Defense Science Commission carefully 
studied the situation with the Second Ministry, the Nuclear Test 
Base, and the Air Force and briefed Zhou Enlai and Nie Rongzhen 
on 20 February about the preparation progress for the first 
airburst test of the hydrogen bomb. The Commission suggested 
that the test be conducted before 1 July. Zhou and Nie consented 
to the new schedule. The Nuclear Test Base and the Northwest 
Nuclear Weapons Development Base then formulated their 
respective execution plans and preparations for the test began 
in March. 
  The carrier for the test was a Hong-6A aircraft. The 
parachute-equipped bomb was to be dropped and the explosion was 
to take place at an altitude of 3,000 meters. (This was referred 
to as the "aircraft-chute-bomb test.") According to theoretical 
design, the power of the hydrogen bomb should be between 1.5 
million and 3 million tons of TNT equivalent. The bomb's shell 
was designed by the Northwest Nuclear Weapons Development Base 
and the bomb body parts were manufactured by the 
surface-to-surface missile assembly plant of the Seventh 
Ministry of Machine Building. The parachute was developed by the 
No. 513 Plant of the Third Ministry of Machine Building. 
Modification of the bomb racks of the two Hong-6As was made by a 
modification group consisting of personnel from the Air Force, 
the Second Ministry and the Third Ministry, with the Xi'an 
Aircraft Plant of the Third Ministry taking the lead. These 
units all accomplished their development, manufacturing and 
modification tasks for the bomb, parachute, and aircraft. 
  After modification, the Hong-6As participated in a flight 
test to evaluate its parachute and to verify the trajectory. The 
test was conducted from 15 March to 3 April at the Northwest 
General Missile Test Base. Test results showed that the 
trajectory met the design requirements and the control system on 
the bomb functioned normally. The parachute's structure, 
strength, and opening sequence were normal. After some revision 
and repeated tests, the design was finalized and the parachute 
was put into production in early April. This test also proved 
that the modified aircraft could satisfy requirements. The 
Nuclear Test Base sent people to participate in the test and to 
become familiar with the operation of the aircraft, parachute, 
and bomb. These activities formed the basis for the formal test. 
  This test was characterized by the high power of the bomb 
and 
by the high explosion altitude. An important component of the 
test was to ensure the safety of the aircraft and the inside and 
outside of the test site. The Defense Science Commission formed 
an aircraft safety computation group with personnel from the 
Northwest Nuclear Weapons Developments Base, the Third Ministry 
of Machine Building, the Nuclear Weapons Institute, and the Air 
Force Command. The group made careful calculations for the 
safety of the pilots and the aircraft based on the specified 
flight altitude, speed, bomb dropping conditions and explosion 
altitude. They concluded that the aircraft and the personnel 
would be safe for an explosive power of up to 4 million tons of 
TNT equivalent. Heeding the request of the Defense Science 
Commission, the Nuclear Test Base carefully investigated the 
safety problems within and without the test zone. Learning from 
previous nuclear tests, a strict safety protection plan was 
formulated. Under the guidance of the General Staff weather 
bureau, the test base formulated a complete weather protection 
plan. A weather forecast network was formed by the General Staff 
weather bureau, the Lanzhou Air Force weather station, the 
weather department of the test base, and other weather stations 
in the vicinity. 
  To organize the test, the Nuclear Test Base consolidated the 
experience of previous tests and carefully formulated test 
plans, communications plans, and other test preparations. 
  Thirty-eight measurement items were scheduled for the test; 
there were 493 pieces of equipment and 53 effect tests. In 
addition to the usual sample acquisition by flying into the 
mushroom cloud, this test would for the first time launch a 
solid fuel rocket to acquire radioactive particle samples. The 
solid rocket was developed by the Eighth Academy of the Seventh 
Ministry of Machine Building. The rocket launcher was produced 
by plants of the Sixth Ministry of Machine Building. 
  Because of the greater explosive power, the original control 
system on the ground was no longer sufficient. Xin Xianjie and 
other scientists of the control technology laboratory in the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute independently designed and developed a 
sensitive, reliable, and energy-saving second-generation control 
system capable of long-distance remote control. They worked 
around the clock to complete the assembly and testing ahead of 
schedule. 
  The engineering tasks of the test were very demanding. 
Although there were more than 10 permanent shops and several 
dozen large effect engineering projects available, it was still 
necessary to build 327 new test facilities. The requirement for 
equipment and facilities was solved by the State Planning 
Commission and the Ministry of Materials. To save construction 
time, the test base volunteered to assume engineering design. 
Engineers were on site to direct the construction and to assure 
speed and quality. 
  The test base established a command in the experimental zone 
on 25 April; 6,185 technical and security personnel from 28 
military and civilian units moved into the test zone and began 
their work. Meanwhile, Hong-6A aircraft of the Air Force were 
transferred to the test base airport and began air-drop 
exercises. 
  On 9 May Zhou Enlai chaired a Central Special Committee 
meeting to review the preparation of the hydrogen bomb air burst 
test preparation. The meeting asked the workers to repeatedly 
check the various steps of the test to make sure that the test 
was successful and safe. Health protection and other safety 
measures had to be taken in regions over which smoke and cloud 
would pass. Protection preparations also had to be made in 
regions where accumulated radioactive dosage could exceed safety 
levels. Emergency response plans had to be prepared to prevent 
accidents. The Defense Science commission was asked to finish 
all the preparatory work by 20 June. The Central Special 
Committee also agreed to have the Party Committee chairman of 
the Nuclear Test Base be in charge of the on-site command of the 
test. Zhang Zhenhuan and Li Jue were also assigned to 
participate in leadership roles. 
  The Defense Science Commission accomplished the requests of 
the Central Special Committee by consulting with the relevant 
military and civilian departments. The test base made a 
comprehensive analysis of the weather data in and out of the 
test zone and in regions to be covered by smoke and clouds for 
the period 1961 to 1966. They also consulted many times with the 
General Staff weather bureau. On 30 May they submitted the 
weather forecast for June, estimating the possible dates for 
good weather. All units finished their instrument installation 
and adjustment and conducted an all-site combined test on 1 June 
and 3 June. 
  Piloted by Xu Kejiang [1776 0344 3068] and Zhang Wende [1728 
2429 1795] the two aircraft were responsible for dropping the 
bomb; they trained very hard. By 10 June, they had flown a total 
of 53 sorties and dropped 35 dummy bombs. Most of the landing 
points were within 500 meters of the bull's eye. The air force 
decided that Xu's plane would be the official plane and Zhang's 
plane would be the back-up. 
  On 3 June, a Hong-6A was practicing the third drop of a 
weighted bomb and the main parachute ripped in the air, which 
caused the bomb to hit the ground in free fall. After the 
incidence, Zhang Yunyu, Zhang Zhenhuan, and responsible 
personnel from the Third Ministry, the Northwest Weapons 
Development Base, and the Air Force conducted an on-site 
investigation to analyze the cause. This incidence attracted a 
high degree of attention from leaders like Zhang Zhenhuan and 
Zhang Yunyu. They studied with the technical staff and improved 
the reliability by adopting local reinforcement and better 
folding methods. 
  On 5 June, the official hydrogen bomb was readied by the 
Northwest Weapons Development Base. Various components of the 
hydrogen bomb were repeatedly inspected for quality before it 
left the plant. On 8 June, the hydrogen bomb arrived at the base 
assembly shop. The crate was opened and the components of the 
bomb were found to be in sound condition. 
  On 12 June, the Central Special Committee heard a briefing 
by 
Luo Shunchu [5012 5293 0443] about the completion of the test 
preparations. Zhou Enlai pointed out that the strength and 
normal opening of the parachute were crucial to the safety of 
the test and should be treated carefully. He ordered Zheng 
Hantao [6774 3352 3447] and relevant people in the Third 
Ministry of Machine Building to the base and make one more 
inspection of the parachute. He also ordered an overall 
inspection of the hydrogen bomb after the comprehensive preview 
on 13 June. Zhou asked Nie Rongzhen to supervise the test and 
specific tasks were supervised by Zhang Yunyu, Zhang Zhenhuan, 
Li Jue, Yuan Xuekai, and Deng Yifei. 
  At 9 o'clock on 13 June, an all-site comprehensive preview 
was conducted. The Hong-6A dropped a "cold" bomb with a 
detonation control system but without a nuclear payload. The 
reliability of key components was evaluated and various 
operators further practiced their skill. 
  After the comprehensive rehearsal, the base dispatched 
personnel to the three settlement points within 150 kilometers 
of the test zone to organize protective measures for the 
residents. Leading cadres also went to key positions to look for 
oversights and to anticipate preventive activities. Preparations 
were again thoroughly checked. They also formulated a test zone 
safety and protection plan for a surface nuclear explosion. 
  Heeding Zhou Enlai's request, Luo Shunchu and the General 
Staff studied the safety and protection problem in case of an 
accident. They formulated detailed plans and Zhou approved them. 
A safety protection group was formed with people from the 
General Staff, the General Logistics Department, the central 
health department, the chemical defense troops, the General 
Staff weather bureau, and the Defense Science Commission. The 
group was responsible for unified command of emergency 
activities in case of an accident. The Lanzhou Military Region 
assigned one leader for the unified command of safety and 
protection in the Gansu, Shaanxi, and Ningxia region. The Health 
Ministry, the General Logistics Department, and the chemical 
defense troops formed a joint technical group and began working 
under the direction of the Lanzhou Military Region. The Lanzhou 
Military Region established command posts at Dunhuan and other 
places to direct safety and protection tasks. For emergency 
evacuation of residents, the Railway Ministry organized four 
trains to stand ready between Yumen and Hami at zero hour. The 
General Logistics Department and the Defense Science Commission 
have also grouped more than 300 motor vehicles to stand ready in 
the Dunhuan region. The health department, and the General 
Logistics health department drafted 50 medical personnel and 
formed a medical team. The team traveled from Beijing to 
Dunhuan, Xi'an, and Hongliuyuan region on 16 June. Meanwhile, a 
backup medical team was also on call in Beijing. 
  On 16 June, Nie Rongzhen arrived at the nuclear test site to 
supervise the test. Nie discussed with Zhang Yunyu and Zhang 
Zhenhuan and officially made 8 o'clock of 17 June zero hour. 
  At 8 o'clock on 17 June, the Hong-6A piloted by Xu Keijiang 
flew over the target to drop the bomb. Because of nervousness, 
the pilot missed one move and the bomb did not drop. The plane 
requested a repeat. The Air Force ground commander ordered: "Fly 
by again, be calm and don't be nervous." The Hong-6A flew over 
the target again and dropped the hydrogen bomb. The parachute 
opened according to the program. At 8:20, the hydrogen bomb 
exploded 315 meters from the bull's eye at an altitude of 2,960 
meters. Suddenly, the blue sky was filled by an intense flash 
and a giant fireball appeared in the sky, obscuring the rising 
sun behind it. A spectacular mushroom cloud was then formed. 
After the explosion, the Hong-6A flew safely back to its base. 
The solid rocket and sampling aircraft acquired radioactive 
particle samples. The effects experiment obtained a great amount 
of data. Based on a comprehensive analysis of a variety of 
experimental data, the power of the hydrogen bomb was determined 
to be 3.30 million tons of TNT equivalent. China's first 
hydrogen bomb air burst was thus successfully conducted. 
  Personnel inside and outside the test zone were all safe. 
After the explosion, the Health Ministry surveyed radioactive 
precipitants in eight regions within the smoke and cloud track. 
Sampling and monitoring of water, soil, grains, vegetables and 
fodder did not reveal any contamination. 
  China's successful hydrogen bomb test was another leap 
forward in China's nuclear weapons development. It was the 
foundation for the development of strategic thermonuclear 
warheads and nuclear weapon-equipped troops. 
<H5>  Section 6. Test of Injurious and Destructive Effects of </H5>
Nuclear Weapons 
  The explosion of a nuclear weapon causes severe damage to 
personnel and structures. The five injurious and destructive 
effects are shock wave, light radiation, early nuclear 
radiation, radioactive contamination, and nuclear 
electromagnetic pulse. Tests of the characteristics and changes 
of such effects serve as basis for combat application of nuclear 
weapons and for protection against nuclear weapons. On 2 
November 1964, Zhou Enlai pointed out after hearing a 
comprehensive report of China's first nuclear test that China 
should not strive for many nuclear tests but that each test 
should yield as much information as possible. Future tests 
should include military tactical exercises. In the subsequent 
atmospheric tests of nuclear weapons, there have been tests on 
injurious and destructive effects ("effects tests") conducted by 
military and civilian units. The effects tests of the second 
nuclear test were conducted by the military training department 
of the General Staff Headquarters. 
  To study the injurious effects of nuclear weapons on 
personnel, the Health Ministry and the General Logistics 
Department placed monkeys, rabbits, and dogs at different 
locations and distances [from the blast]. Different protective 
methods were used to test the effects. Tissue damage and 
pathological changes were observed for the different destructive 
factors under different conditions. Through tests, the 
destructive power at different distances and in different 
directions was investigated. Preventive medications and 
treatment for acute radiation exposure were developed. Based on 
these results, protective methods for personnel against nuclear 
weapons were designed and radiation medicine was advanced. 
  The railway troops built a section of 1:1.5-scale simulated 
two-way tunnel and a section of 1:1-scale simulated two-way 
tunnel at the test site to evaluate the protection against 
nuclear weapons for the Beijing subway that was under 
construction at the time. In seven nuclear tests, data were 
collected at the top, bottom, wall, posts, exits, entrances, 
front, middle and rear sections and at the gates of the 
simulated subway. The test results showed that the subway was 
well protected and interior vibration was small. The subway was 
protected against early radiation. Even for a surface nuclear 
explosion, the anti-shock and ventilation systems remained sound 
and the animals inside the tunnel were unharmed. 
  Military and civilian units, including the Engineers, tested 
the endurance and protection of permanent structures, 
entrenchments, and buildings against nuclear explosions. 
Weaknesses were found and improvements were made in engineering 
design. 
  Effects tests were also conducted for the fast patrol boats, 
ships' compartments, aircraft, guns, armored vehicles, motor 
vehicles, light weapons, ammunition, and mines. Through these 
tests, the destructive characteristics and destructive radius 
for the various weapons were determined. Feasible protection and 
measures to regain rapidly combat capability were devised for 
field fortifications and weapons. These tests results were 
invaluable for combat training and for weapons development. 
  The General Logistics Department also conducted effects 
tests 
for uniforms, coverings, food, oil, medicine, and health items. 
The Ministry of Agriculture conducted effects tests for grains, 
seeds, seedlings, and soil. Through experiments, contamination 
characteristics and effective radius for protection were 
determined. In addition, animal tests were also carried out for 
irradiated food and seeds. Valuable data were obtained. 
  The General Staff communications troops conducted effects 
tests on aerial wires, underground cables, communications 
facilities, and radio communications equipment. Important 
understandings were gained for organizing communications under 
nuclear explosion conditions. 
  The General Logistics Department and the chemical troops 
monitored radioactive contamination of the ground surface and 
the personnel and material in all the nuclear tests. They gained 
understanding of the spread and attenuation of the radiation and 
the effectiveness of the various decontamination methods. This 
knowledge played a guiding role for organizing nuclear 
protection in wartime. 
  To explore combat experience and troop training under 
nuclear 
conditions, the General Staff organized team tactical exercises 
during nuclear tests. In the nuclear test on 26 September 1976, 
an Army division commander of a certain military region led 
3,000 soldiers in a tactical exercise 90 minutes after the 
explosion. In the exercise they attacked the "blue team" as it 
was still recovering. These were exploratory activities for 
gaining experience in command and troop movement under nuclear 
explosion conditions. Combat troops and chemical troops were 
trained in the nuclear tests. The General Staff Headquarters and 
the Defense Science Commission also organized learning sessions 
at the nuclear test site for senior and middle level commanders 
in the armed forces, leading cadres in the State Council and 
various departments and committees, and protection cadres in the 
state, provinces and municipalities. These sessions increased 
their cognizance and tempered their ability to organize and to 
lead combat and to conduct various other activities. 
  China conducted a total of 23 nuclear tests in the 
atmosphere. A total of 100,000 people [people-times] 
participated in the effects tests at the nuclear test site. 
These people came from the following units: the General 
Logistics Department, the Navy, Air Force, artillery, the Second 
Artillery, armored units, the engineers, railway troops, General 
Staff communications troops, General Staff chemical troops, the 
State Science Council, the Chinese Academy of Sciences, the 
Ministry of Commerce, the Ministry of Light Industry, supply 
cooperatives, the Ministry of Agriculture, the Ministry of 
Foodstuffs, the Ministry of Public Health, the Ministry of 
Chemical Industry, the Ministry of Textile Industry, the 
Ministry of Construction, the Ministry of Materials, the 
Ministry of Communications, the Ministry of Water Conservancy 
and Electric Power, the Ministry of Petroleum, the Ministry of 
Railways, the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications, the 
Ministry of Public Security, the Bureau of Broadcasting, and the 
First, Second, Third, Fourth, Fifth, Sixth, and Seventh 
Ministries of Machine Building. Aircraft flew 98 sorties. The 
tests involved 5 fast patrol boats, 248 armored vehicles, 479 
cannons and guns, 21 surface-to-surface missiles, 786 pieces of 
radar and wired and wireless communications equipment, 91 motor 
vehicles, 104 permanent entrenchments, 66 personnel 
entrenchments, 407 field entrenchments, 58 bridges, and 35,000 
animals. Other materials used in the effects tests included 
railroad rails and rolling stock, factory buildings, civilian 
buildings, light weapons, ammunition, fuel, crops, foods, drugs, 
and clothing. A large amount of information and valuable 
experimental results were obtained. 
  Following the order of the Central Special Committee and the 
Central Military Commission, the Defense Science Commission 
worked with the General Staff Headquarters and conducted two 
extensive reviews of the large amount of technical data from the 
effects tests of the late 1960s and early 1970s. They compiled 
15 volumes (20 million words) of technical data on basic nuclear 
explosions, radioactive contamination, and protective effects. 
Based on these results they published the document "Injurious 
and Destructive Effects of Nuclear Weapons and Their Protection" 
for the training of troops and for engineering construction and 
personnel protection. Based on test data and theoretical 
research results, Cheng Kaijia, Sun Ruifan, Xin Xianjie, and 
Qiao Dengjiang [0829 4098 3068] compiled the "Handbook of 
China's Nuclear Effects Tests." The General Staff Headquarters, 
the General Logistics Department, the armed services, and the 
Ministry of Public Health also compiled teaching material, 
protection handbooks and engineering design materials for troop 
training and population education against atomic bombs. These 
technical data and information filled a void in China and 
provided valuable experience in training the troops, use of 
nuclear weapons, protection against nuclear weapons, improving 
the weapons, building military and civil defense facilities, 
waterworks, and agricultural production. It also provided real 
data for improving the design of nuclear weapons and for 
promoting the development of nuclear weapons and experimental 
technology. 
<H5>  Section 7. Safety and Protection in Nuclear Test </H5>
  The destructive effects of the shock wave, light radiation, 
early nuclear radiation, and nuclear electromagnetic pulse take 
place mainly within 1 minute of the explosion; they are 
instantaneous destructive effects. Radioactive contamination, on 
the other hand, acts over a long time and spreads over a large 
area; it can cause considerable damage to personnel. Therefore, 
the first thing to consider in atmospheric nuclear tests is the 
protection against radioactive precipitation and radiation. It 
not only affects the acquisition of test results and safety of 
personnel in the test zone, but also involves the safety of the 
Chinese people and the people of neighboring countries. The 
Chinese Communist Party Central Committee and the Chinese 
government pay a great deal of attention on it. 
  China has carefully studied the safety problem ever since 
the 
survey of the nuclear test site. The Lop Nur area is in the 
immense Gobi Desert and has no settlements. The reason that Lop 
Nur was chosen as the nuclear test site was that its distance 
from cities prevents and minimizes radioactive precipitation 
hazards to personnel. 
  Every time the Defense Science Commission arranges an 
atmospheric nuclear test, it organizes specialists and technical 
staff to make exhaustive studies of test safety and to formulate 
the test plan and protective measures. The mode of testing was 
carefully chosen. The mode was generally air burst, and at the 
highest altitude possible. The dust column from the explosion on 
the ground and the cloud should not be connected. This would 
greatly reduce the amount of radioactive particles in the cloud 
and the degree of radioactive contamination in the test site and 
in the downwind areas outside the test site. When the test mode 
had to be surface explosion or tower explosion, the number of 
tests and the explosive power were carefully controlled. 
<H5>  (1) Safety and Protection at the Test Site and Its Vicinity </H5>
  In China's first nuclear test, the test party committee 
formulated safety and protection regulations and took strict 
measures for safety. For example, when the nuclear explosion 
took place, all the test personnel gathered in a safe zone to 
observe. After the explosion, the number of people entering the 
contaminated zone was strictly controlled. Personnel entering 
the contaminated zone had gone through difficult and rigorous 
training before the test. Personnel and equipment leaving the 
contaminated zone were carefully inspected in a designated area 
and thoroughly de-contaminated. These practices ensured the 
successes of the first nuclear tests and have been strictly 
adhered to and improved upon in the following tests. 
  When high-power nuclear explosion tests were conducted in 
the 
atmosphere, the Nuclear Test Base sent personnel to nearby 
settlement points to organize safety protection and to conduct 
dosage measurement. Since all the tests were conducted with 
westerly winds near the earth surface of the test site, the 
living quarters and assembly areas west of the test site and 
up-wind regions nearby were basically not contaminated. 
  Investigations were made to ascertain whether the 
radioactive 
materials released in the nuclear tests had caused local 
environmental contamination and whether they posed a health 
hazard to local residents. From 1982 to 1987, a 6-year study was 
made in residential regions near the test site and in control 
regions. These studies were made by 40 scientists from the 
following units: the health and protection station of the 
Xinjiang radiation medicine office, the Hami region immunology 
station, the Altay region immunology station, and the Nuclear 
Weapons Institute. The region of investigation near the nuclear 
test site refers to the nearest villages from the Lop Nur test 
site in different directions. The nearest one was 120 km and the 
farthest one was 400 km. The rest of them were about 200 km 
away. The control regions were located at about 700 to 1,000 km 
from the test site. The environments of the investigation region 
and the control region were basically the same except for the 
degree of contamination by the nuclear tests. After 
comprehensive, careful, and exhaustive investigation, the 
following conclusions were reached: the nuclear tests did not 
cause noticeable local contamination of residential areas and 
the tests had no detrimental effects on the health of the 
residents. The radioactivity level of foodstuffs produced in the 
region near the test site was within safe limits. 
<H5>  (2) Safety and Protection Downwind from Test Site </H5>
  While paying attention to safety in the test site and the 
surrounding area, China also paid great attention to the safety 
areas in the downwind direction outside the test area. In 
China's first nuclear test on a tower in October 1964, the 
explosion time was chosen to be in the afternoon so that it 
would be deep into the night when the radioactive cloud drifted 
over settled areas downwind from the test site. This way, direct 
contact with the radioactive dust particles by personnel and 
animals could be avoided. Aerial sampling and surface monitoring 
of the radioactivity after the explosion showed that there was 
slight radioactive fallout in areas under the radioactive cloud, 
but the value was still within the safety threshold and no harm 
was done to local residents. Even so, Zhou Enlai was still 
concerned. On 2 November 1964, after hearing the report of the 
first nuclear test, Zhou ordered an escalation of the monitoring 
of radioactive fallout outside the test site. He also pointed 
out that: "There should be more surface sampling points for 
radioactive fallout between 20 degrees north latitude and 60 
degrees north latitude. Monitoring stations should be placed at 
Lhasa, Chengdu, Wuhan, Guangzhou, and Shanghai in the south, 
Urumqi, Yumen, Hami, Lanzhou, Baotou, Hohhot, Chengde, Jinning, 
Zhangjiakou, Baichengzi, Harbin, Manzhouli, Hailar, and Mishan 
in the north, Liaodong Peninsula, Shandong Peninsula, and along 
the Yalu River in the middle. In the air, samples should be 
taken along three lines in the East, the Southeast, and 
Northeast. Other samples should be taken for fresh water, sea 
water, vegetables, plants, and fruits." The Defense Science 
Commission thoroughly implemented Zhou's instructions. 
  To ascertain the direction of cloud movement, development 
trend, and radioactivity dosage, the Defense Science Commission 
detected, sampled, and measured the radioactive cloud outside 
the test zone with aircraft equipped with self-recording 
micro-Roentgen meters and with radiation-monitoring weather 
balloons. This monitoring was done with the participation of the 
General Staff weather bureau, the General Staff chemical troops, 
the Air Force, and the Atomic Energy Institute. In each of the 
nuclear tests, they followed the forecast of radioactive cloud 
movements and acquired samples along three lines in the East, 
Southeast, and Northeast. Samples were taken at three altitudes. 
In the 23 atmospheric nuclear tests China conducted, the Air 
Force flew a total of 485 sorties using 283 aircraft of six 
different models. Beginning in 1967, weather stations in regions 
passed by the radioactive cloud deployed radiation weather 
balloons according to the direction and speed of the clouds. 
  To reduce the radioactive fallout in regions downwind from 
the test site, the Defense Science Commission also agreed to 
have the General Staff weather bureau enhance the forecast of 
cloud movement and made precipitation in regions passed by the 
cloud one of the considerations in deciding a test date. For 
example, the large atmospheric nuclear explosion that took place 
on 29 September 1969 was originally scheduled for 26 September. 
However, in the morning of the 26th, the weather changed. 
Forecasts had the radioactive cloud moving along the border and 
into a neighboring country as it moved in the downwind 
direction. At 6 AM, Zhou Enlai heard the report of leaders of 
the Defense Science Commission and decided to conduct the test 
on a different date in order to assure the safety of residents 
in a neighboring country. The decision was first reported to Mao 
Zedong and his approval was obtained. 
  To assess the dust fallout situation in China after the 
nuclear tests, the Ministry of Health established the Industrial 
Hygiene Institute as a national center and built 46 
environmental radiation monitoring stations around the country. 
In each nuclear test, these stations measured the amount of dust 
fallout, radioactivity concentration in near-surface air, 
radioactivity in rain water and water sources, the degree of 
contamination of vegetables and gamma ray dosage at the ground 
surface. 
  To study the long-term effects of radioactive contamination, 
the Ministry of Health made two large-scale surveys, in 1975 and 
1977, respectively, on the radiation exposure and health 
situation of residents in Dunhuan and Jiuquan. The surveys were 
conducted by the Industrial Hygiene Institute of the Ministry of 
Health, the Industrial Hygiene Institute of Gansu, and chemical 
troops in the Lanzhou Military Region. In June 1979, these units 
made a comprehensive analysis of the monitor data and residents 
health data collected in the various nuclear tests. The 
conclusion was that radiation exposure of the residents was 
minor; it was less than the natural radiation background of the 
region and also less than the limit set in the "Radiation 
Protection Regulation." In comparison studies, there was also no 
evidence that the residents' health had been affected by the 
dust fallout of the nuclear tests. 
  China has acquired a great amount of data on aerial 
radioactive clouds and radioactive dust fallout outside the test 
zone in its many atmospheric nuclear tests. It has learned the 
movement behavior of radioactive clouds and the characteristics 
of radioactive fallout. It has also found empirical calculation 
methods for forecasting the path and concentration of 
radioactive clouds and the contamination of ground, air, and 
rain water by fallout. These findings were crucial for the 
protection of troop movements and residents' safety. Based on 
the measured data and analysis of radiation dosage in downwind 
areas, it was concluded that China's nuclear tests posed no 
danger to the population of neighboring countries in the 
downwind direction. 
  Because China paid so much attention to the health and 
safety 
of the population within and without China and worked so hard on 
safety and protection, all its 23 nuclear tests were conducted 
safely. 
<H5>  Section 8. Underground Nuclear Tests </H5>
  In underground nuclear tests the nuclear device is buried at 
a certain depth underground and then detonated. Generally there 
are two types of underground tests: tunnel nuclear tests and 
shaft nuclear tests. Compared to atmospheric nuclear tests, 
underground tests require a higher degree of technology, more 
construction work, and a higher cost; however, they have certain 
unique advantages. Such tests not only contain the radioactive 
products underground, which is desirable in terms of 
environmental protection and secrecy, but also facilitate the 
collection of radioactive product samples. In particular, 
physical diagnostic measurements may be carried out very close 
to the nuclear device. Results of underground tests are useful 
for improving nuclear weapon design and for studying the linear 
destructive effects of radiation. These data are indispensable 
in the theoretical research and design of nuclear weapons. The 
move from atmospheric tests to underground tests was 
necessitated by the objective needs of nuclear weapons 
development. 
<H5>  (1) Tunnel Test </H5>
  In a tunnel test a specially designed long tunnel is dug 
into 
a mountain. The nuclear device and various probes are installed 
in the tunnel. After the tunnel is filled and sealed in a 
special way, the nuclear device is detonated. 
  Following instructions from Zhou Enlai, the Second Ministry 
of Machine Building and the Defense Science Commission made a 
preliminary investigation of the underground nuclear testing 
problem. Later, the Defense Science Commission followed the 
decision of the Central Special Committee and organized the 
Nuclear Test Base to formulate a plan for nuclear tests in 
tunnels and in shafts. To this end, Zhang Yunyu, Zhang Zhishang, 
and Zhang Ying did a careful site selection for underground 
nuclear testing and proposed that the site for the tunnel test 
be chosen at Nanshan in the Nuclear Test Base. The proposal was 
approved by Zhou Enlai. In early 1965, an extensive study was 
organized by the Defense Science Commission and the site of the 
Nanshan underground test was finalized. The study was conducted 
by the Defense Engineering Design Institute of the Engineers, 
the Geology Institute of the Chinese Academy of Sciences, the 
Ministry of Petroleum, and the Ministry of Geology. The study 
investigated the geology, the hydrogeology, the rock chemistry, 
and the mechanical properties of rocks. Later, the Nuclear 
Weapons Institute conducted theoretical calculations for the 
propagation of shock waves in rocks and for the self-sealing 
mechanism of the tunnel. Simulation tests were performed for 
chemical explosives and the theoretical parameters were unified 
and revised. These activities were the technical preparation for 
the underground nuclear tests. 
  China originally planned to conduct its first underground 
test using a tunnel in May 1966. Later, the plan was temporarily 
halted by the Central Special Committee because China wanted to 
come up with a flight-tested warhead as soon as possible, and to 
concentrate resources on the technological breakthrough of the 
hydrogen bomb. After the first successful air burst test of 
China's hydrogen bomb in 1967, the Defense Science Commission 
held detailed discussions with experts, including Wang Ganchang 
and Cheng Kaijia, in October and November regarding the 
objectives, test items, and engineering requirements for China's 
first underground test. It was decided that the principal 
objective of China's first tunnel nuclear test was to explore 
the characteristics of China's underground nuclear tests and to 
conduct near-field physical measurements of the nuclear bomb in 
order to provide data for improving nuclear bomb design. In May 
1965 the construction and progress of the various tasks were 
coordinated at the Nuclear Test Base. 
  After redefining the tasks, the construction for the 
underground test continued in the spring of 1969. Because of 
technical requirements, there were a number of modifications. 
The tunnel construction involved extensive engineering, complex 
technology, limited working surface, and high risks. In view of 
these characteristics, the Nuclear Test Base organized an 
engineering command, a technical guidance command, and a tool 
and materials supply command and established a sound 
construction procedure. Workers were fearless and worked around 
the clock in the hot and stuffy tunnel. Together, they improved 
the technology and completed 54 experimental engineering 
projects in June, according to plan and meeting quality 
standards. Testing and scientific experimentation were arranged 
by the Nuclear Weapons Design Academy and the Nuclear Weapons 
Institute. After 2 months, they completed the installation and 
testing of 400 pieces of equipment in early September. 
  To assure safety, the Defense Science Commission met at the 
test site in April 1969 and worked on technical measures that 
would prevent mishaps in the test such as "blowing the top," 
"jumping the gun," "misfire," and "dud." 
  In the evening of 10 August, the Central Special Committee 
heard the report of Deputy Commander Zhang Ying of the Nuclear 
Test Base regarding the preparation of the test site. Zhou Enlai 
stressed that the test must be done safely so that accidents 
such as "blowing the top" and leaks of radioactive materials 
could be avoided. The Nuclear Test Base again calculated the 
resistance and wave absorption in the tunnel and analyzed the 
various external environment factors, and they were sure that 
the preventive measures taken would prevent "jumping the gun." 
On 15 September, the nuclear device was placed in the explosion 
chamber and the tunnel was subsequently sealed. At 0015 on 23 
September, China successfully detonated its first tunnel nuclear 
test. The tunnel's self-sealing mechanism worked and there were 
no "blowing the top" or "jumping the gun" incidents. The yield 
of the nuclear explosion was basically in agreement with the 
design. 
  To understand the characteristics of tunnel nuclear tests, 
and to verify the agreement between the theoretical design and 
the actual explosion, the tunnel and explosion chamber were 
excavated from 1970 to 1971. The height and the size of the 
"chimney" caused by the explosion were measured and the 
effectiveness of the self-sealing and filling function were 
investigated. Three cores were drilled to collect the 
radioactive material generated by the explosion. First-hand data 
of these investigations showed that the self-sealing technology 
and the specimen core technology were successful. The 
theoretical understanding of the fluid mechanics of an 
underground nuclear explosion was basically in agreement with 
reality. Diagnostic measurements made near the nuclear bomb 
yielded important data and pointed to new directions in the 
development of near-field physical measurements. Through this 
test, understanding of underground nuclear test was validated 
and enhanced and major interference problems were revealed in 
the near-field physical measurements. Because the test was 
conducted in limestone, it generated a great amount of carbon 
monoxide and carbon dioxide, which were detrimental to the 
safety of radiation chemistry analysis. It was not desirable to 
conduct underground nuclear tests in limestone. The Nuclear Test 
Base therefore moved the test site to the granite Beishan [North 
Mountain] underground test site. 
  To gain more experience in underground nuclear testing, to 
improve the weapon design and to test new nuclear principles, 
five more tests were conducted from 1975 to the end of 1988 at 
the Nanshan and Beishan test sites. In the second tunnel nuclear 
test on 27 December 1975, important data were obtained in the 
near-field physical diagnostic measurements. These data helped 
solve the technical problems in tunnel self-sealing, rapid 
sample acquisition, and electromagnetic interference in 
near-field physical measurements. In the third tunnel nuclear 
test on 17 October 1976, new advances were made in rapid sample 
acquisition, and new understandings were gained in nuclear 
explosions in granite and anti-interference technology. In the 
fourth nuclear tunnel test on 4 May 1983, rapid sample coring 
was achieved for the first time. Abundant high-quality solid 
samples of radioactive materials for chemical analysis were 
obtained in the first drill. Meanwhile, major advances were made 
in near-field physical measurement technology. On 19 December 
1984, the fifth nuclear tunnel test was conducted. The test was 
made for a new principle in nuclear weapons and the experiment 
was a success. China had made a major breakthrough in new 
nuclear weapons technology. 
<H5>  (2) Shaft Nuclear Test </H5>
  In a shaft test the nuclear device and various sensors are 
lowered to the bottom of a large-diameter well, the well is then 
filled and the nuclear device detonated. Due to the depth 
limitation of a tunnel test, most mountains cannot satisfy the 
experimental requirements. This is particularly true for 
high-power explosions. In a shaft test, there is usually no 
limit to explosive power. As long as the underground rocks are 
suitable for testing, a shaft can be drilled to the depth needed 
for the particular explosive power. For this reason, the shaft 
test mode has become the principal method for underground 
nuclear testing. 
  In April 1967 China chose the Xinge'er region northwest of 
Lop Nur for the shaft test site. After years of effort, a 
complete experimental facility and living quarters were 
established and various equipment developed. The necessary 
conditions for conducting the test were basically provided. 
  A shaft nuclear test requires a well with a large diameter 
and a certain depth. Drilling such a shaft required a large 
drilling rig. In October 1966, the Nuclear Test Base, the 
Nuclear Weapons Institute and engineering departments surveyed 
coal mines, oil fields and machinery departments and submitted a 
proposal to the Defense Science Commission to develop a 
large-diameter hard-rock drilling machine. On 9 May, the Central 
Special Committee approved the proposal and decided that the 
drilling task should be the responsibility of the Ministry of 
Coal Industry (later the Defense Science Commission took charge) 
and the machining task should be given to the First Ministry of 
Machine Building. Other participating units included the Nuclear 
Test Base, the Coal Institute, the Lanzhou Petrochemical Plant, 
the Luoyang Institute of Mining Machinery, the Shanghai 
Institute of Coal Mining Machinery, and the Beijing Institute of 
Mining. In October 1967, work began on design planning. In 1971, 
the drilling machine was assembled at the Lanzhou Petrochemical 
Plant and moved to the Nuclear Test Base. The development of the 
large drilling machine was the key to shaft tests of nuclear 
weapons. In 1973, the drilling began at the test base. By April 
1975, the first granite shaft 300 meters deep and 2.5 meters in 
diameter was drilled. Later, several other shafts were drilled 
and drilling techniques gradually improved. 
  In April 1975, the Nuclear Test Base submitted the proposal 
for the underground shaft nuclear test to the Defense Science 
Commission. Extensive discussion and deliberation were then made 
by the Nuclear Test Base, the Nuclear Weapons Design Institute, 
and the Engineering Design Institute of the Defense Science 
Commission. In March and April 1977, the Defense Science 
Commission reviewed the general plan for conducting the first 
underground shaft nuclear test and coordinated the technical 
tasks of engineering, testing, and nuclear device. A 
200-meter-deep granite shaft was chosen for the test. The main 
goal of the test was to learn the skills for shaft testing and 
to gain experience in adopting engineering techniques, test 
safety, and nuclear device testing techniques to the underground 
shaft environment. The engineering design and the design of 
nonstandard equipment were assumed by the Engineering Design 
Institute of the Defense Science Commission. The Nuclear Weapons 
Institute was responsible for the design and development of the 
enclosure for the nuclear device and the sealing of the 
explosion chamber. 
  The construction of the shaft began in April 1977. Since the 
flooding rate of the shaft was 9.3 tons per hour, the sealing of 
the nuclear device and test safety were jeopardized. To counter 
this problem, the flooding was reduced by sealing and 
reinforcing the shaft wall. The Daqing oil field on more than 
one occasion sent people to the test site to advise the pumping 
of water. The technology team of the test base sealed the water 
by spraying grout and by grout injection. After 15 months of 
tireless work, the shaft construction was completed. The 
flooding rate was reduced to 2.5 tons per hour, basically 
satisfying the test requirement. 
  In July 1978, hoisting and installation began. To be 
fail-safe, a test hoisting was done first. After gaining some 
experience in hoisting, the official hoisting was done in late 
September. When the official hoisting was performed, the nuclear 
device was placed in a special sealed container. Measurement 
probes and the sealed nuclear device were then placed in a 
special sealed explosion chamber. Tubes were used to connect the 
container, the probes, and the cables into an integrated whole, 
which was slowly lowered to the bottom of the shaft. The 
hoisting of the assembly was tricky and its procedure needed 
rigorous control. The installation personnel of the test base 
adhered to a position responsibility system and safely lowered 
the device to the bottom of the shaft. The shaft tube 
back-filling began on 2 October. Back-filling was performed 
while the water was being pumped. After 12 days of hard work, 
1,400 cubic meters of space was back-filled and the quality was 
completely in keeping with requirements. The difficult task of 
constructing and filling the shaft was done by the 1st Company, 
6th Battalion of the technology team of the Nuclear Test Base. 
This courageous company was awarded the title of "New Long March 
Commandos" by the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist 
Youth League. 
  To ensure a safe and successful test, the work to eliminate 
errors and duds was firmly grasped. The Nuclear Weapons Design 
Institute repeatedly inspected the detonation system and the 
operating procedures. Static electricity tests were performed 
for the detonation cable and lightning strike prevention was 
implemented. After the nuclear device was lowered to the bottom 
of the shaft, the water level and the temperature and humidity 
in the sealed container were monitored day and night. Extensive 
safety measures were made for the test cable and the detonation 
cable. Emergency reaction plans were also formulated. 
  At 9 o'clock on 14 October 1978, China successfully 
conducted 
its first shaft nuclear explosion. The test achieved total 
closure. Three hours after the explosion, radioactive gas 
samples were obtained. On the 16th day radioactive solid samples 
were acquired. Satisfactory results were obtained in safety, 
engineering, measurement, and sampling. 
  Starting in 1981, China moved its atmospheric nuclear tests 
underground. To advance new principles of nuclear weapons and to 
improve test technology, four more shaft tests were conducted by 
1988. In the second and third test, the water level was low, the 
container size was small and grout sealing and submerged pumping 
were done manually. More items were tested than the first test. 
The third test used an inclined shaft with a maximum tilt of 6.1 
percent (the two previous tests used 2 percent or so). The 
lowering of the explosion chamber was done with the aid of steel 
pipes. Experience was gained in tilted shaft construction and in 
lowering. The shaft for the fourth test was constructed using 
steel-sleeved pipes and the dry shaft method. A measurement 
frame was used for the first time. Through this test, the design 
and construction of a dry shaft using the telescopic tube method 
were mastered. Experience was gained on near-field measurement 
and electromagnetic interference prevention, and new 
breakthroughs were made in measurement technology. 
  Because of the high groundwater level, flooding was more 
severe. Using a shallow-water test mode, the construction was 
difficult, the construction time was long, the cost was high and 
it was unsafe for the workers to work in the shaft. To find a 
better and more economic method, on 5 June 1987, China tested a 
nuclear device of greater explosive power using a medium shaft 
depth and an all-water-level mode. Meanwhile, experience was 
gained in measurement, anti-interference, cable sealing for high 
pressure, and shaft back fill. This signified China's new 
development in shaft test technology. 
  The main issue in ensuring safety in underground nuclear 
tests is to prevent radioactive material from emerging from the 
ground. In China's five shaft tests the back-filling and sealing 
of the shafts ensured safety. Experience had been gained in 
theoretical calculations, engineering designs, and construction 
techniques. 
  China's shaft nuclear tests covered the range of water 
levels 
and well depths. Pronounced improvements have been made in the 
development of large-scale equipment, and in engineering design, 
drilling, shaft construction, hoisting, back-filling, and sample 
drilling. In terms of measurement techniques, China went from a 
small container to a large container, test scaffolds, multiple 
tubes and near-field physical measurements. In near-field 
physical measurements and radiochemistry measurements, 
theoretical and practice were investigated to a greater depth 
and weapons physics was studied for weapons design. This showed 
that China's underground nuclear test capabilities have improved 
greatly. China is further developing its underground nuclear 
tests, investigating new measurement techniques, and improving 
current equipment. 
  From 1964 to 1989, China conducted a total of 34 nuclear 
tests, of which 23 tests were in the atmosphere and 11 were 
underground. Compared to the 800 nuclear tests in the United 
States and the 600 tests by the former Soviet Union, China's 
number of nuclear tests was quite small. Since a nuclear test is 
a scientific activity, it naturally has a dual possibility. Even 
though three of China's tests did not succeed, the success rate 
and efficiency are still quite high. By following Zhou Enlai's 
policy of "serious, detailed, stable, and reliable," China has 
achieved a great deal. In research and nuclear weapons 
development, the results provided important information on the 
use and protection of the nuclear weapons. China has not only 
built a modern nuclear test base complete with various 
measurement modes, but also a team of experienced nuclear test 
personnel. 
  China is conducting necessary but limited nuclear tests in 
its nuclear weapons development program for defense purposes. 
China's nuclear tests will continue to improve its nuclear 
weapons. Such tests will not only help to achieve the 
established development goals, but also protect the national 
security and contribute to maintaining world peace. 
<H5>  Chapter X. Nuclear-Powered Missile Submarine </H5>
  Powered by a nuclear reactor nuclear powered missile 
submarines can stay submerged for extended periods of time and 
have battle capabilities far superior to those of conventional 
submarines. They can also operate in a much greater range. 
Equipped with guided missiles, they can conduct anti-submarine, 
anti-ship and, land target attacks; they also possess the 
"second strike" advantage that land-based strategic weapons do 
not have. China decided to develop nuclear submarines in 1958. 
By 1988, China had developed the nuclear torpedo submarine and 
nuclear-powered missile submarine. Nuclear submarines are a 
major breakthrough in China's ship building technology. 
<H5>  Section 1. Nuclear Submarine </H5>
<H5>  (1) Development in Two Steps </H5>
  In 1958, shortly after the Central Committee approved the 
development of the nuclear submarine, the Navy Building and 
Maintenance Department formed a nuclear submarine group to study 
the general design of a nuclear submarine. In 1959, the Navy 
proposed the concept of an overall plan for nuclear submarines. 
Due to temporary economic hardship and lack of research 
resources, the Central Special Committee approved a plan in 
March 1963 to concentrate resources on key issues in nuclear 
power and submarine hulls. 
  In the mid-1960s, the national economy improved and China 
succeeded in copying and independently developing the 
conventional submarine. A preliminary design of the nuclear 
device was completed and progress was made on major components 
and materials of the nuclear reactor. On 20 March 1965, the 
Central Special Committee approved the resumption of the nuclear 
submarine project. At this time, Director Yu Xiaohong [0060 4562 
5725] of the Seventh Academy in the Sixth Ministry of Machine 
Building and expert Huang Xuhua recommended that the nuclear 
submarine development project be done in two stages. The first 
stage was to be the development of a nuclear torpedo submarine 
and the second stage was to be the development of a guided 
missile submarine. The reason was that the technology for the 
submarine-to-land guided missile and other weapon systems was 
extremely complex. In addition, there was also the need for many 
technical problems for the nuclear submarine itself and for key 
components for the guided missile. These problems were very 
difficult and required a longer time to solve. By first 
developing a nuclear torpedo submarine, China could not only 
solve the technical difficulties step and step, but also make 
use of some of the same materials and equipment to speed up the 
process. The Sixth Ministry supported the recommendation and 
made a report to the Central Special Committee in July 1965. The 
plan was approved. 
<H5>  (2) Nuclear-Powered Torpedo Submarine </H5>
  While approving the above recommendation, the Central 
Special 
Committee also demanded breakthroughs in nuclear power and its 
associated installation technology. It set a date of 1972 for 
underwater testing of the nuclear submarine. To this end, 
Laboratory 719 was established in the Seventh Academy to work on 
the design of the nuclear submarine. The new laboratory was 
headed by Xia Tong [1115 2717] and was based on the capabilities 
of laboratories 701 and 715. The leader of the new laboratory, 
together with its technical staff Huang Xuhua and You Ziping 
[1429 1311 1627], organized a study while the group was being 
staffed and proposed a preliminary plan for the overall design 
and major equipment of the submarine. The second task was 
technology assignment and coordination. The State Planning 
Commission, the State Economic Commission, the Defense Science 
Commission, and the Office of DefenseIndustries jointly summoned 
the participating departments for a briefing of the preliminary 
design, equipment system, and major key technologies. They 
studied the coordination of engineering tasks in the submarine 
project. Subsequently, the Office of Defense Industries 
organized a technology transfer from a number of departments to 
laboratories 719 and 715. These departments included the First, 
Third, Fourth, Fifth, and Seventh Ministries of Machine 
Building, the Ministry of Metallurgy, the Ministry of Chemical 
Engineering, the Chinese Academy of Sciences, the Ministry of 
Higher Education, the Ministry of Petroleum, the Ministry of 
Building Materials, the Ministry of Textile, the Ministry of 
Railways, the National Oceanographic Bureau, and the Ministry of 
Health. Later, full-fledged efforts proceeded in submarine hull 
design, major subcomponent and special equipment development, 
and material development. The third task was to build the 
manufacturing plant for the submarine. The Sixth Ministry 
Machine Building drafted nearly 3,000 workers from shipyards in 
Dalian, Shanghai, and Wuchang to participate in the construction 
of the manufacturing plant and the production of the vessel. Mao 
Zedong signed two telegrams authorizing the assignment of 
military personnel to the construction effort. With the joint 
military and civilian effort, the plant was built in less than 2 
years. China's first anti-submarine nuclear submarine was 
equipped with an acoustic guided torpedo and employed a teardrop 
profile and single shaft propulsion. The submarine had 
self-sustaining power for tens of days and diving depth and 
underwater speed were comparable to that of foreign submarines 
of the same class. The vessel has seven compartments and the 
control room was in the second, where the periscope and various 
antenna gear were located. From a distance, the exterior of the 
submarine resembled a great gray whale. 
  The nuclear submarine technology is extremely complex. 
First, 
there must be a compact and reliable powerplant and a body 
profile good for high-speed underwater navigation. Then there 
must be air conditioning, air regeneration, and purification 
systems, underwater navigation and positioning systems, 
long-distance secure communications systems, underwater 
long-distance warning, search, surveillance, communications and 
target-positioning sonar systems. Finally, there must also be an 
anti-submarine torpedo weapons system compatible with the combat 
mission of the ship. 
  The equipment systems chosen had a direct impact on the 
fighting ability of the submarine, the development time and 
cost, and the success or failure of the project. They were the 
first major issues to be addressed in the discussion of the 
overall proposal. Different understandings and opinions were 
aired in the discussion. Some were concerned that, with both 
conventional and nuclear power, the development of too much new 
equipment for the first nuclear powered submarine could prevent 
the project from achieving a timely completion. Others believed 
that advanced equipment under development and to be developed 
should be employed in China's first nuclear submarine in order 
to catch up and overtake the world standard. To unify the 
various views, the overall plan was analyzed specifically by the 
participating departments. Different views were unified on the 
basis of two principles approved by the Central Special 
Committee. These principles were: first, to develop the nuclear 
submarine based on practical and domestically available 
technology, and, second, China's first nuclear submarine should 
have the character of an experimental vessel but at the same 
time possess the major tactical and technical capabilities of a 
warship. It was decided that, in addition to the nuclear 
powerplant, the submarine should have the following new systems 
in order to ensure combat capability. These were the 
anti-submarine torpedo and the associated command control, 
launch, and inertial guidance systems, high-power transient 
transmitter, comprehensive sonar system, and an integrated air 
conditioning system. Other systems should employ mass-produced, 
domestic conventionalsubmarine equipment wherever possible. To 
meet the needs of submarine development, the Seventh Academy, a 
primary organization for the project, started a series of new 
specialties and organized a number of research laboratories. 
After several years of concentrated hard work, there were 
breakthroughs in seven key technologies and the anticipated 
goals were basically realized. 
<H5>  Decision on Body Profile </H5>
  China's first nuclear submarine adopted the teardrop profile 
for high-speed underwater cruising. It was a new technology at a 
time when China did not have complete facilities for fluid 
dynamics tests. Workers of Laboratory 719 broadly surveyed 
domestic and foreign data and conducted theoretical analysis and 
investigation to select the optimal plan and parameters. They 
also conducted extensive experimental testing with Laboratory 
702 and other units to study the basic rules for controlling a 
teardrop shaped vessel. Experimental verification was conducted 
for the chosen design in wind tunnels, rotating arm water tanks, 
and wave- resistance water tanks. Laboratory 719 also built a 
special experimental turntable for studying the submarine 
control and for simulating the control functions. Actual 
navigation tests showed that the teardrop profile had superior 
maneuverability and achieved an underwater speed greater than 
that of the conventional profile. China had achieved a big 
success in developing the fluid dynamic properties of the 
nuclear submarine. 
<H5>  Design of a Large-Diameter, Pressure-Resistant Hull </H5>
  The, teardrop profile was stubby and had a low aspect ratio. 
It also increased the water displacement. The diameter of the 
pressure resistent hull was about twice that of a conventional 
submarine. Part of the structure was based on a conical shell 
design. Conventional design codes and computational methods 
proved inadequate. The safety and reliability of the 
pressure-resistant submarine had a life-and-death importance. 
Scientists engaged in structural research applied short shell 
plastic stability theory and explored new methods of 
computation. They also investigated different parts of the 
structure with scale models and conducted simulated strength 
tests for the welding of the pressure-resistant method. These 
tests showed that the hull design met deep dive requirements. 
<H5>  Development of Integrated Air-Conditioning System </H5>
  The air-conditioning system is crucial to the well being of 
the crew and normal operation of the various mechanical, 
electrical, and electronic equipment. In collaboration with 
other plants and laboratories, Laboratory 718 of the Seventh 
Academy developed an oxygen generation device, a C0[.sub]2[/] 
removal device, a hazardous gas burning device, various 
purification filters, and cabin air-conditioning analysis 
monitors. Working with Chongqing General Machinery Plant, they 
have also developed large capacity refrigerators for submarine 
use. These systems underwent on-land simulation tests, enclosed 
performance reliability tests, and crew endurance tests in a 
simulated submarine environment created by the Navy Medical 
Research Institute. Satisfactory results were obtained in all 
tests. With the sophisticated air-conditioning system and the 
reliable radiation shield and protection, cabin environment was 
safe and more comfortable than that of a conventional submarine. 
<H5>  Development of Nuclear Powerplant </H5>
  The nuclear powerplant is a key component in the development 
of a nuclear submarine. The Nuclear Power Engineering Research 
Institute worked with other units and built a land-based reactor 
to simulate the submarine nuclear powerplant. The land-based 
simulation power device consisted of the reactor compartment, 
the main engine room, the auxiliary engine room, and the shaft 
system. The operation and function of the system were the same 
as that aboard a submarine. The land-based model reactor 
followed the principle of full simulation and provided valuable 
and reliable test data for the installation, testing, and 
operation of a submarine nuclear powerplant. In the development 
of the nuclear submarine, workers rigorously implemented the 
procedure set by the Central Special Committee, which was: 
"First bring the land reactor to criticality and then install 
the submarine reactor. First bring the land reactor to full 
power and then launch the submarine." By following this 
procedure, the nuclear reactor was successfully installed on the 
submarine in the first trial. 
<H5>  Development of underwater sound, navigation, communications </H5>
and torpedo weapon system 
  The development of advanced underwater sound, inertial 
guidance, communications, and torpedo systems was conducted by 
four laboratories (706, 722, 707, and 705) of the Seventh 
Academy and by units in the Fourth Ministry of Machine Building. 
The long-range noise detection station used a large array and a 
number of new techniques. An ultra-long-wave receiver and a 
high-power, ultra-fast short-wave transmitter ensured submarine 
activities at sea. A number of technical difficulties were 
overcome in the development of the electric dual plane, the 
acoustic anti-submarine torpedo, the deep-ocean torpedo 
launching device, and the digital torpedo firing command. After 
persistent research, the development of the inertial guidance 
system also reached the goal set in the plan. 
  The development of a nuclear submarine was a complicated 
systems engineering project. There were more than 2,600 meters 
and instruments on the submarine, 46,000 parts, 90 kilometers of 
cables and 30 kilometers of pipes. Equipment density was very 
high. The hull design for the nuclear submarine had to allow a 
sensible layout of the complicated system in order to satisfy 
the combat requirements. The design also had to ensure sound 
working and living conditions for the crew. To solve this 
difficult problem, Laboratory 719 worked closely with the 
nuclear submarine manufacturing plant and built a full-size 
plastic model by spending more than a year of time. The 
designers, installation crew, and navy personnel conducted 
simulated installation and operation. They discovered and solved 
numerous problems in installation and maintenance. After 
repeated adjustment and modification, they finalized the layout 
of the equipment and meters, the path of pipes and cables, and 
the location of more than 1,000 openings in the 
pressure-resistant hull. These activities ensured that the 
general design was successful in the first attempt. 
  Construction began in 1968. In order to stay on schedule as 
approved by the Central Special Committee, Laboratory 719 
organized two design meetings and completed more than 700 design 
drawings in a short period of time. Half of the scientists and 
technical staff pitched in to help with the construction. The 
submarine plant divided the work into two tasks: submarine hull 
construction and equipment installation. Under difficult working 
and living conditions, the technical staff, workers, and cadres 
all joined in to improve the technology and equipment and made 
the scheduled launching possible. 
  Tests on the nuclear submarine began in April 1971. Electric 
power was generated on the nuclear reactor in July and 
preliminary evaluation was made for the main machinery and the 
power train. On 15 August, China's first nuclear submarine 
sailed toward the test zone for the first time. By April 1972, 
the submarine had undergone more than 20 test runs and logged 
several thousand nautical miles. Most of the tests were 
completed. From January to April 1974, the submarine made 
inspection test runs. It was delivered to the Chinese Navy on 1 
August. 
<H5>  (3) Nuclear-Powered Missile Submarine </H5>
  Research and development of China's nuclear-powered missile 
submarine began shortly after some results were obtained in the 
development of the anti-submarine nuclear torpedo submarine. In 
June 1967 the Navy proposed that the development of the 
nuclear-powered missile submarine should be a two-phase process. 
The first phase was to develop a nuclear-powered missile 
submarine on the basis of the nuclear torpedo submarine but the 
performance requirements should not be set too high. The second 
phase should be building a better submarine based on the first 
one. The proposal was evaluated and discussed. A decision was 
made that the emphasis for the first guided missile submarine be 
placed on the submarine-to-land guided missile weapon system and 
the technology for underwater launching of the guided missiles. 
Most of the systems on the torpedo submarine were retained, with 
the exception of the guided missile weapon system and some items 
that had to be redesigned because of the increased water 
displacement, crew size, and safety requirements. The main 
difference between the two types of submarines was the guided 
missile module. The missile module contained a number of launch 
tubes and their associated power systems, underwater hatch 
openings and pressure equalization system, air conditioning and 
temperature control system, water injection system, and 
equipment for missile inspection, aiming, and launch control. 
Equipment requiring development and improvement represented 
about 15 percent of the total. 
  The key technologies for the guided missile submarine were 
the underwater launching of the submarine-to-land guided 
missiles and the precise navigation and positioning of the 
submarine. Underwater launching of the missile required that the 
missile be launched from a depth of several tens of meters and 
that the missile have adequate "muzzle velocity." The missile 
had to maintain a normal stable attitude as it emerged from the 
water and this had to be achieved in the presence of waves, 
currents, and fluctuation of the submarine. The degree of 
difficulty was therefore much greater than a surface launch. For 
this reason, the development plan required testing on a 
land-based launch pad and launch tube before the underwater 
launch test on a submarine. Laboratory 713 of the Seventh 
Academy assumed the duty of research and design for the launch 
device. Led by Wei Naiwen [7614 0035 2429], tests were performed 
and a combustion-powered cold launch plan was adopted. In 
October 1972, an underwater launch test was conducted using a 
full-scale-model missile on a modified conventional guided 
missile submarine. The intended goal was achieved and the key 
technology of underwater launch was attained. 
  The nuclear-powered missile submarine required a highly 
accurate navigation and positioning system. It not only had to 
ensure safe underwater navigation of the submarine, but also 
determine the position accurately so that the missile could 
accurately hit the target. Laboratory 707 worked extensively on 
this technology. Their hard work finally resulted in the 
inertial guidance system and the star and satellite guidance 
system for China's first nuclear-powered missile submarine. 
  In September 1970, construction began on the nuclear-powered 
missile submarine. In September 1979, the Defense Science 
Commission and the Office for Defense Industries named Peng 
Shilu as the chief designer for the nuclear submarine and Huang 
Weilu, Zhao Renkai, and Huang Xuhua as deputy chief designers. 
Overall supervision and coordination of thenuclear submarine 
project were strengthened. With a lot of hard work by the 
participating departments, China's nuclear-powered missile 
submarine was launched on New Year's eve 1981. In August 1983, 
it was put into service in the Navy. 
<H5>  Section 2. Nuclear Submarine Powerplant </H5>
  The nuclear powerplant of the submarine consisted mainly of 
the reactor, the primary circuit, the secondary circuit, and the 
shaft system. Compared with land-based nuclear reactors, the one 
on the submarine was more compact, lighter, more 
impact-resistant and vibration resistant, tilt tolerant, 
versatile, and reliable. The nuclear powerplant was the key to 
the nuclear submarine and its development was a complex and 
difficult system engineering task. 
<H5>  (1) Research on and Design of Nuclear Submarine Powerplant </H5>
  Independent research of the submarine nuclear powerplant 
began in 1958. At that time an experimental heavy water reactor 
was built with Soviet help and put into operation the Atomic 
Energy Institute. The first group of nuclear reactor technicians 
was trained and ready for preliminary study of the submarine 
nuclear powerplant. However, there were numerous difficulties in 
the independent development of a submarine nuclear powerplant 
and extensive research and testing were needed. 
  The early phase research and design of the nuclear 
powerplant 
was assumed by the Atomic Energy Institute, the Navy, and the 
First Ministry of Machine Building. The Atomic Energy Institute 
was responsible for the research and design of the reactor and 
its primary circuit. The Nuclear Submarine Laboratory was 
responsible for the research and design of the body, the 
secondary circuit system, and the shaft system of the vessel. 
  In October 1958, there were some 200 technical staff in the 
Reactor Laboratory of the Atomic Energy Institute. Deputy 
Director Li Yi [2621 3015] of the Institute and Meng Gefei [1322 
2047 7236] and Lian Peisheng [6647 1014 3932] of the Reactor 
Laboratory led the study of reactor physics, reactor design, 
fuel elements, thermo- and hydrodynamics, and automatic control. 
In March 1960 the Defense Science Commission put forth a policy 
that stressed that the reactor development should be followed 
immediately by the development of the vessel, the machinery, and 
the electrical missile systems. This directive moved the 
research and design forward at a faster pace. In June of the 
same year, Zhao Renkai, Han Duo [7281 6995] and Li Lefu [2621 
2867 4395], under the supervision of Peng Huanwu [1756 2719 
2976], repeatedly investigated, calculated, and deliberated the 
problems before proposing the "Nuclear Submarine Power Device 
Design (Draft)." This proposal contained the initial design 
concepts of the nuclear reactor type and the principal technical 
parameters. However, some controversy arose about the 
thermodynamic parameter in the August 1960 evaluation conducted 
by the Defense Science Commission and in the March 1961 meeting 
called by the Second Ministry of Machine Building. Departments 
responsible for equipment development felt that the parameter 
was set too high and could not be produced in China. Other 
departments were for maintaining the advanced nature of the 
submarine design and were opposed to lowering parameter values. 
After a 2-month investigation conducted by the nuclear submarine 
leadership group, it was decided that the design of the power 
device must be practical and the thermodynamic parameter should 
be set according to the actual technical level of the industry 
in China. In the meantime the nuclear submarine laboratory began 
collecting materials and started the design task. At the end of 
1961, they proposed the initial design of the secondary circuit 
system and the shaft system. Later, based on the Central Special 
Committee decision to temporarily put the nuclear submarine 
project on hold, the Atomic Energy Institute and thenuclear 
submarine laboratory kept a few dozen technical staffers to 
continue the reactor physics, thermodynamics, and hydraulics 
under the supervision of Peng Shilu and Li Lefu. Also, after 
several years of hard work, two swimming pool type experimental 
reactors were completed at the Atomic Energy Institute and at 
Qinghua University. Research on the nuclear fuel elements, 
material and shielding began shortly after that. 
  In August 1963, the Central Special Committee approved a 
merger between the submarine nuclear power research and design 
office in the Atomic Energy Institute and the nuclear submarine 
technology research laboratory in the Seventh Academy. The 
combined unit became the new Submarine Atomic Power Research 
Institute (or "Nuclear Power Institute" for short), under the 
Seventh Academy in the beginning and later moved under the 
Second Ministry of Machine Building. Led by Director Zhou 
Shengyang [0719 5110 3152], Peng Shilu, and Huang Xuhua, 
technical personnel began laying out the overall plan for the 
nuclear submarine powerplant. They compared a number of 
different designs. A design plan was then completed. Beginning 
in early 1965, this institute resumed the preliminary design of 
the nuclear powerplant. In the meantime, industrial departments 
have also made progress in the test fabrication of major 
components and materials for the nuclear reactor, which made 
resumption of the project possible. 
<H5>  (2) Development of Nuclear Fuel Elements </H5>
  Nuclear fuel elements are the heart of a reactor. They 
consist of the fuel core, the cladding, and the structural 
components. Properties of the fuel elements have a direct impact 
on the safety and reliability of the reactor. They are therefore 
a key component of the nuclear submarine powerplant. As early as 
1958, the Atomic Energy Institute began the exploration of fuel 
elements for a nuclear submarine reactor. In the early 1960s, 
Shenyang Institute of Metallurgy of the Chinese Academy of 
Sciences made a systematic study of the fuel element technology. 
In March 1963, the Second Ministry of Machine Building decided 
to establish a fuel element laboratory at the Baotou Nuclear 
Fuel Element Plant. The resources and equipment for studying 
fuel elements in the Atomic Energy Institute were also moved to 
the Baotou laboratory to begin research on fuel elements. 
Subsequently, with close cooperation between the Shenyang 
Institute of Metallurgy and the Baotou Fuel Element Plant, many 
technical problems were overcome and test elements meeting the 
technical standards were developed. Component tests and single 
rod irradiation tests were conducted in both the experimental 
heavy water reactor and the swimming pool reactor. The tests 
were successful. 
  The fuel rods needed by the model reactor had to be produced 
on an industrial scale. In August 1967 the fuel element plant 
began the construction of a fabrication shop for nuclear reactor 
fuel rods. To speed up the production, the plant made do with 
old equipment and buildings, and produced fuel rods by a 
make-shift chemical method. Although the equipment was crude and 
labor intensive, the manufacturing process ensured a smooth 
production. 
  The structure of nuclear submarine reactor fuel elements 
complex is complex and require sophisticated manufacturing 
technology. The quality of the fuel elements have a direct 
impact on tactical performance and safety of the crew. There 
were very specific quality and technical specifications on 
incoming raw material, intermediate products, and the finished 
product. Inspections were carried out rigorously. Under the 
supervision of nuclear materials expert Zhang Peilin [1728 3099 
7207], the technical staff worked with technicians and cadres, 
and the research staff worked with the design and production 
staff. The fuel rod fabrication shop was completed and the first 
batch of fuel elements produced in April 1970. After operating 
for 9 years in the land-basedmodel reactor, the quality of the 
fuel element has proved to be excellent. 
<H5>  Fuel Element Cladding Technology </H5>
  Zirconium has a small absorption cross section for neutrons 
and can withstand high temperature, high pressure, and water 
corrosion. It is a good cladding material for reactor fuel rods. 
The machining of zirconium is an important task in fuel element 
production. In 1959 the Nonferrous Metals Research Institute 
produced a number of zirconium alloy materials using 
high-impurity industrial zirconium sponge. These materials were 
tested by the Atomic Energy Institute for still water corrosion 
characteristics. Zircalloy-2 was found to have good corrosion 
resistance. Later they produced high-quality zircalloy-2 ingot 
and developed machining methods for zircalloy-2 tubes. In 
September 1964, the first batch of fuel elements clad with 
zircalloy-2 were produced. At the same time, the Shanghai 
Nonferrous Metals Institute produced zircalloy-2 tubes. The 
Central Military Commission issued a special letter calling for 
timely completion of the nuclear submarine project. After 
receiving the letter, the Ministry of Metallurgy constructed a 
complete zirconium tube production line in its Baoji nonferrous 
metal processing plant. By 1972, zircalloy-2 materials of 
different specifications were produced by the Baoji plant, the 
Shanghai Institute of Nonferrous Metals and the Beijing 
Institute of Nonferrous Metals. These materials met the 
requirements of the nuclear reactor fuel elements. 
  The control rod of the nuclear submarine reactor was made of 
cadmium. Cadmium, a rare element, occurs together with zirconium 
in nature. Its extraction is very difficult. Cadmium has a large 
absorption cross- section for thermal neutrons and can withstand 
strong irradiation. Since the cadmium-zirconium separation 
technology was already in hand, cadmium was chosen as the 
principal material for the reactor control rod. In 1966 the 
Beijing Institute of Nonferrous Metals produced China's first 
cadmium ingot. After that, the ingot was extruded into tubes at 
the Luoyang Copper Processing Plant and rolled into high-quality 
cadmium tubes by the Shanghai Steel Institute. The task of 
producing cadmium tubes was later assigned to the Baoji 
Nonferrous Metals Plant. 
<H5>  (3) Construction of Land Prototype Reactor </H5>
  Meeting the 1970 target date set by the Central Special 
Committee for completing the land-based model reactor first 
required a design for the nuclear powerplant of the submarine. 
The proposal by the Nuclear Power Institute had a layout that 
placed the nuclear powerplant in three: compartments the storage 
room, the auxiliary machine room, and the main machine room. The 
proposal by the Qinghua University Nuclear Energy Technology 
Institute had a unitary layout for the power device. After 
extensive discussion and consultation with experts Qian Sanqiang 
[6929 0005 1730] and Qian Xuesen [6929 1331 2773] and with 
industrial departments, the distributed layout plan was chosen. 
The plan was approved by the Central Special Committee in July 
1965. Subsequently, the Atomic Energy Institute quickly obtained 
results in reactor physics, thermodynamics and hydraulics, 
material irradiation and corrosion. These results served as 
reliable data for the design. After completing the preliminary 
design of the nuclear powerplant, the Nuclear Power Institute 
began the design of major components of the reactor core. 
Construction engineering design also proceeded quickly at the 
Second Design Institute of the Second Ministry of Machine 
Building. Tasks on equipment and material fabrication in units 
under the First, Second, and Sixth Ministries of Machine 
Building and under the Ministry for Metallurgy quickened their 
pace. In the second half of 1965, construction, design and 
research personnel moved to the building site of the model 
reactor and began construction. Shortly after that, the "Great 
Cultural Revolution" began and the construction effort suffered 
severe disruption. Two years after the beginning of 
construction, only 15.1 percent of the total project had been 
finished. None of the ten major laboratories planned for the 
project had been built. These disruptions severely hampered the 
timely completion of the land-based model reactor. 
  In order to turn the situation around, the Central Military 
Commission issued a "Special Memo" in August 1967 to the whole 
country regarding the assurance of progress in the nuclear 
submarine development. Nie Ronzheng also stressed repeatedly 
that the nuclear submarine project can only move its completion 
date forward and not backward. On 18 July 1968, Mao Zedong 
ordered the military services to participate in the construction 
of the land-based model reactor. These emergency measures played 
an important role in ensuring the completion of the 
construction. Participants of the project included the Chinese 
Academy of Sciences, colleges and universities, the Navy, the 
First, Second, and Sixth Ministries of Machine Building, the 
Ministry of Metallurgy, the Ministry of Chemical Engineering, 
Sichuan Province, Heilongjiang Province, and the municipalities 
of Shanghai and Wuhan. These departments and regions, under the 
leadership of the State Council and the Nuclear Submarine 
Leadership Group of the Central Military Commission, assumed and 
completed research, equipment, and material tasks. The Nuclear 
Submarine Engineering Leadership Group, under Office Director 
Chen Youming [7115 0671 6900], effectively organized and 
coordinated many productive tasks. A number of coordination 
meetings were held jointly by the Defense Science Commission and 
the Office of Defense Industries for the research, equipment, 
and material of the nuclear powerplant. Major technical problems 
were timely coordinated and resolved by the nuclear submarine 
engineering equipment technology leadership group. The group 
consisted of the Navy, the First, Second, and Sixth Ministries 
of Machine Building, and the Ministry of Metallurgy. 
  To speed up the construction of the reactor, the Defense 
Science Commission and the Office of Defense Industries decided 
to enhance the chain of command. He Qian [0419 6197] of the 
Second Ministry of Machine Building was appointed the commander 
and Zhang Zhixin [1728 1807 0207] of the Seventh Academy was 
appointed the political committee member. The Second Ministry of 
Machine Building shifted a number of key staff members to the 
project to strengthen the management of on-site construction. 
Teams of capable construction workers were drafted from other 
locations to reinforce the project. The Nuclear Power Institute 
of the Seventh Academy formed a design team of more than 100 
people to work at Laboratory 719. Together they completed the 
construction design of the model reactor and the technical 
design of China's nuclear-powered submarine. Meanwhile, the 
Seventh Academy appointed Peng Shilu to be in charge of the 
overall design of the nuclear submarine and the land-based 
reactor, Zhao Renkai to be in charge of the technical design and 
construction of the main building of the land-based model 
reactor, Fu Defan [4569 1795 3972] to be in charge of production 
preparation, testing and post-construction operation management 
of the land prototype reactor, and dispatched a task force led 
by Xia Tong [1115 2717] to assist the command department in 
solving technical problems encountered in the construction. More 
than 800 technical staff from the Nuclear Power Institute moved 
from Beijing to the nuclear reactor design base in the Sanxiang 
region to participate in the installation, testing, and other 
experimental efforts before the startup. In addition, a 
full-size, zero-power experimental device and a nuclear power 
control system testing laboratory were also built for full-scale 
physics experiments and research. In the installation and 
testing process, design, testing, and operation personnel, 
working together to double-check the design, discovered and 
solved a major technical problem of high residualreactivity. 
With pride and a sense of responsibility, the 8,000 military and 
civilian personnel working at the construction site endured the 
harsh environment of high mountains, a crowded construction 
site, heat and rain, and pushed the project forward. The 
Southwest Seventh Construction Office of the Second Ministry of 
Machine Building and the third engineering region of No. 26 
Company finished their respective construction tasks for the 
main building roof and water supply ahead of schedule. After 
more than a year of hard work, the ground construction of the 
land-based model reactor was basically completed at the end of 
1969. The Shenyang Water Pump Plant, the Harbin Electric Motor 
Plant and the Shanghai Boiler Works were responsible for the 
closed pump of the main facility and the construction of the 
evaporator. These plants all sent people to the construction 
site to arrange for equipment installation. After 4 months of 
hard work, the equipment installation was completed ahead of 
schedule in April 1970 and the quality of the work was good. 
<H5>  (4) Start of Land Prototype Reactor and Life Cycle </H5>
Operational Test 
  The reactor began its test run on 1 May 1979. Problems 
encountered in the first run were solved by engineers and 
workers from the First, Second, and Sixth Ministries of Machine 
Building, the Ministry of Metallurgy, the Navy, and the 17 
plants under the Seventh Academy. Test runs went smoothly and 
test results showed that the engineering quality was superior 
and the reactor was ready for startup. 
  The land-based model reactor was an extremely complex, high 
precision nuclear power system consisting of 26,700 components 
and equipment. Its quality must be evaluated by actually running 
the reactor. In order to uncover the problems and to make timely 
corrections for the benefit of gaining experience in building 
China's first nuclear submarine, Zhou Enlai approved the startup 
of the reactor. On the day before the startup, Zhou was twice 
briefed by on-site leaders and key technical personnel. He also 
ordered an expert task group to the testing site to guide the 
work and to stand by for potential problems. The expert group 
also made specific requests to the test personnel. 
  The reactor began ramping up its temperature and pressure on 
16 July 1970. At 2 the next morning, the power test began. The 
reactor was shut down safely at 10:53 in the evening on 30 July 
1970. During the test period Zhou made several telephone calls 
to check on the test situation, asking repeatedly that the test 
be done carefully and that all the data be acquired. The testing 
crew worked day and night for 15 days and tried out the various 
systems of the reactor. They conducted 131 measurements for the 
physical, chemical, thermodynamic, hydraulic, shielding, dosage, 
stress, vibration and noise characteristics of the reactor. All 
the necessary data were obtained. Test results showed that the 
quality of the design, manufacturing and installation was 
excellent. The reactor also performed well in control safety, 
stability, and protective adjustment. 
  A second stage power up experiment was then conducted to 
further evaluate the design power of the reactor and the design 
horsepower of the main turbine, to improve the shielding 
structure, and to characterize the dynamic performance. The 
second stage test lasted for a total of 27 days. Test results 
showed that China's first nuclear submarine reactor was a 
success. The reactor and its power components can not only be 
operated safely in stable conditions, but can also assume heavy 
load variation in a battle situation. The movement performance 
was superior and met the tactical and technical requirements. 
These tests served as a sound foundation for the navigation test 
of China's first nuclear submarine. In the meantime, 
shortcomings were found in the power device, which served to 
improve thedesign of future submarines. In the 9-year operation 
of the land-based model reactor from July 1970 to December 1979, 
a total of 530 tests were conducted. The main performance 
characteristics of the nuclear powerplant were thoroughly 
understood and a complete set of data was acquired for the 
reactor core over its service life. The reactor was shut down in 
December 1979 and the cover was removed to inspect and evaluate 
the reactor. The operation and inspection results showed that 
the first nuclear submarine power device designed and built by 
the Chinese themselves was a success. Reliable data were 
collected for the design of a new generation of nuclear 
powerplant. The test also produced valuable personnel training 
and accumulated a vast amount of experience. 
<H5>  (5) Construction of China's First Nuclear Submarine </H5>
Powerplant 
  The performance specifications of China's first nuclear 
submarine power device were identical to those of the land-based 
model reactor. They were designed and built simultaneously. This 
approach was very important to the success of the first attempt 
in building and installing the submarine nuclear reactor. 
However, because of the tight schedule, there were a certain 
amount of exploration in the design and manufacturing of nuclear 
powerplant. The procedure specified by the Central Special 
Committee was rigorously followed; that is, installation of the 
reactor on the submarine began only after the land-based model 
reactor reached full power operation. To ensure proper 
installation, a full-scale wooden mock-up was designed, built, 
and installed jointly by the Nuclear Submarine Manufacturing 
Plant, Laboratory 719, and the Nuclear Power Institute. By so 
doing, problems in the manufacturing and transportation of the 
installation equipment were discovered and resolved at an early 
stage. The nuclear reactor was successfully installed on the 
submarine on 26 December 1970. The success was a result of a 
joint effort by the technical staff, workers, and cadres in the 
research, design, and installation departments and by the Navy 
commander. 
  Dock tests of the first nuclear submarine began in April 
1971. Test procedures similar to those used on the land-based 
model reactor were followed in the cold run of the primary 
circuit auxiliary system of the nuclear powerplant. The same was 
done for the water pressure test of the main heat carrier system 
and the second circuit test run. At the end of April the active 
zone of the reactor was hoisted into the pressure vessel and the 
reactor body and top components were installed. At the end of 
May the reactor safely achieved cold critical state. The hot 
critical state was reached at the latter part of June. Some 
malfunctions occurred in the process of raising the temperature 
and pressure of the reactor and the primary circuitry but these 
malfunctions were quickly eliminated. On 1 July, the reactor 
power was raised, the steam generator started the system 
auxiliary and the gas turbine began generating electricity. This 
was the first time that a nuclear reactor had produced 
electricity on a Chinese submarine. The reactor performance met 
the design target and satisfied the service requirement of the 
submarine. The nuclear reactor was capable of propelling the 
submarine. 
  The series of dock tests for China's first nuclear submarine 
was completed on 23 August 1971. This was followed by navigation 
tests. The equipment and systems were found to function properly 
during the navigation tests. 
  On 3 February 1972, in the 16th cruise test, the steam 
generator of the main unit malfunctioned upon switching from low 
speed to high speed. Technical staff and workers risked high 
temperatures and radiation overdoses to enter the reactor module 
for repair. They showed fearless dedication. Engineer Li Yichuan 
[2621 1355 0278] of Laboratory 719, after falling ill due to 
exhaustion, died of a heart attack at a young age at the reactor 
site. To explore the cause of the malfunction and toevaluate the 
reliability of the submarine and its systems, Chairman Mao 
signed a telegram on 12 August to authorize a long cruise test. 
In the last run of the navigation tests, the steam generator 
malfunctioned again. The submarine was then serviced in the 
plant. The water quality control system was improved while the 
steam generator was being replaced. The navigation tests resumed 
in January to April 1974, for exploratory runs. The nuclear 
submarine went through 20-odd navigation tests, the reactor 
logged several thousand hours of operation, and the accumulated 
mileage was thousands of nautical miles. The entire ocean 
navigation test showed that China had succeeded in developing 
its own nuclear submarine power device. 
<H5>  (6) Long Cruise Test </H5>
  The long cruise test was conducted after the submarine was 
delivered to the Navy and put into service. The purpose was to 
test the reliability of the submarine and the equipment on board 
on long cruises in the ocean. In early 1980, a long cruise test 
was planned by the Defense Science Commission, the Office of 
Defense Industries, and the Navy. The test was divided into two 
steps: first there would be a 31-day cruise followed by a longer 
one. 
  The primary concern in the long cruise was the quality of 
such equipment as the stream generator. In preparing for the 
extended cruise, the Navy organized a joint on-board inspection 
of the quality of the steam generator. The inspection was 
conducted by the nuclear submarine fleet, the nuclear submarine 
manufacturing plant, Laboratory 719 and the naval representative 
stationed at the plant. In mid-1980 a team of experienced 
specialists rushed to the test site and made a rigorous 
inspection of the submarine after a few hours of high capacity 
sailing on the ocean surface. They concluded that the steam 
generator functioned normally and could continue to run. 
  At 7 AM on 16 November 1981, Captain Li Jinkui [2621 6855 
1145] started the nuclear submarine under the command of Deputy 
Commander Qu Zhengmu [2575 2182 3664] of the North Sea Fleet. 
This test lasted 31 days and covered several thousand nautical 
miles. The cumulative underwater sailing was 25 days, or 80 
percent of the entire journey. The longest submerged sailing was 
330 hours over a distance of 1,000 nautical miles. The test 
showed that the main power system functioned reliably and the 
steam generator functioned without any problem. All the major 
electrical components operated normally. The two main converter 
units successfully pulled back after five intentional reactor 
shut-downs. This ensured the safe startup of the reactor in 
emergency situations. The integrated air conditioning system 
worked well and ensured normal living conditions for the crew. 
Underwater maneuverability was very stable. From 25 November 
1985 to 18 February 1986, the nuclear submarine conducted the 
maximum self-sustainability test. The purpose of the test was to 
conduct a general evaluation of the tactical and technical 
performance of the submarine, the reliability of the systems 
over extended periods of time, and the ability of the submarine 
to handle long periods of underwater activity. This test was 
directed by Deputy Commander Yang Xi [2254 3886] of the Navy 
Submarine Base and submarine commander Sun Jianguo [1327 1696 
0948], and was conducted in the Yellow Sea and East China Sea 
training ground, as specified by the General Staff. The nuclear 
submarine sailed in deep water for 10 days and traveled a 
distance equal to the perimeter of the earth at the equator. 
Most of the time the submarine was under water and the longest 
continuous underwater journey lasted 25 days. The experience was 
described as the "underwater long march." This test set a number 
of records in Chinese submarine history, including the longest 
navigation time, the longest submerged navigation, the longest 
range, and the highest underwater sailing speed. With the 
exception of the torpedo launcher and the rescue system, all the 
mechanical devices on the submarine were tested. Following the 
test plan, 63 evaluation tests were conducted and a complete set 
of data was acquired. The tests proved that most of the 
mechanical devices on the submarine functioned reliably. The 
main power device ran for a total of several thousand hours and 
the reactor's cumulative full-power days numbered several tens. 
The reactor, the main pump, and the main turbine system 
functioned smoothly and reliably without any problems. There 
were no leaks in the primary circuit. The electrical system 
worked well. The two gas turbine generators were generally run 
in parallel to assure electricity supply. The main converter 
unit, the intermediate-frequency units and the 200 electrical 
devices all worked reliably. The startup was readily implemented 
and the timely switch-over ensured emergency electricity supply. 
Dosage monitoring results of the cabin space showed that 
radiation dosage and pollution remained in the standard 
allowable range. The long cruising test was not only the 
ultimate test for the equipment systems, but also the ultimate 
test for the stamina and willpower of the crew. For several tens 
of days under the sea, the crew endured high temperature, high 
humidity, noise, polluted air, fatigue, insomnia, and anorexia. 
In the last 2 days of the journey, a number of crew members went 
into shock due to extreme fatigue, but they all persevered and 
miraculously created the "underwater long march." 
<H5>  Section 3. Depth Test of Nuclear Submarine </H5>
  The depth test of the nuclear submarine was mainly an 
evaluation of the overall performance and battle ability of the 
submarine. The test included a deep dive, underwater full speed, 
and torpedo launch in deep sea. The scale of the test was large 
and involved many aspects. The organization of the test was 
complex and the difficult test carried a certain level of risk. 
It was a comprehensive examination of the research, design, 
construction, and crew operation of the nuclear submarine and 
its weapons systems. 
  In 1979 the State Council and the Central Military 
Commission 
issued the depth-testing order for the nuclear submarine. To 
fully prepare for the test, the Navy worked with the China 
Shipbuilding Company and made in-depth investigation of the 
depth test. Issues addressed included project coordination, 
organization and leadership, division of work assignments, and 
budget allocation. After the project was reviewed by the General 
Staff Department and the Office of Defense Industries, a 
proposal entitled "Depth Test of the Nuclear Submarine" was 
submitted to the State Council and the Central Military 
Commission. On 16 November 1987, the proposal was approved and 
the depth test of the nuclear submarine entered the 
implementation stage. 
<H5>  (1) Test Preparations </H5>
  In June 1987, a nuclear submarine deep-water testing 
leadership group (or depth-test leading group) was formed. The 
group was led by Deputy Commander Zhang Lianzhong [1728 6647 
1813] of the Navy and was under the direct supervision of the 
General Staff Department and the Defense Science and Technology 
Commission. Other members of the group were the State Planning 
Commission, the State Economic Commission, the Defense Science 
and Technology Commission, the China Shipbuilding Company, the 
Ministry of Nuclear Industry, the Guangzhou Military Region, and 
the Guangdong Province. 
  The depth test leading group adhered to a meticulous and 
careful approach to guard against political or technical 
incidents that could lead to loss of life or the vessel during 
the test. Safety was the top priority. The group reviewed test 
plans, test items and the primary network plan. The various 
departments have also established or improvedcorresponding 
organizations and formulated secondary network plans for their 
respective assignments. The tasks and responsibilities were 
clearly assigned and the effort was a cooperative one. Based on 
the primary network plan, the various specialty groups reviewed 
the design and construction quality of the submarine and 
prepared for the testing, monitoring, maneuvering, rescuing and 
logistic protection. 
  The following measures were taken to make sure that the 
vessel left port without any problem or potential risk. 
<H5>  A. Quality Review </H5>
  Comprehensive reviews were conducted by Laboratories 719, 
703, 704, 705, and 725, and by the First Academy of the Ministry 
of Nuclear Industry. Review items included the overall 
performance of the submarine, the strength of the submarine 
structure, the systems installed on the submarine, the design 
criteria and parameters, standards, and codes for the reactor 
and the main frame. Also reviewed were design calculations, 
technical conditions, construction charts, modifications and 
discrepancy handling records. Technical problems revealed in the 
review were resolved. Starting from raw materials, the Nuclear 
Submarine Manufacturing Plant and the military liaison at the 
plant conducted ultrasonic and X-ray flaw detection for the weld 
seams of the submarine hull and for the valve and tank systems. 
The inspection and flaw detection were repeated for the external 
pressure tank and for the pump systems. Electrical equipment and 
onboard systems were re-checked. Manufacturing quality problems 
revealed by the inspection were resolved. For problems 
discovered in the evaluation, the diving test leading group made 
its decisions based on the principle of upholding technical 
quality and also taking into account practicality. For example, 
there were more than 70 rubber shock-absorbing tubes in the 
seawater system in the submarine. These tubes were manufactured 
before 1981 and had exceeded their service life. They were 
therefore considered a safety hazard for the diving test but to 
replace them would require 800,000 yuan and 6 months' time. To 
resolve this problem, the technical group inspected all the 
tubes along with the pump pressure of the seawater system and 
conducted on-land simulation of pump pressure for adverse 
conditions. The results showed that quality was assured and a 
decision was made to continue their use. Another problem was the 
switch- in time of the auxiliary pump when the main pump loses 
power. This problem was investigated by Chief Designer Zhao 
Renkai, Deputy Chief Engineer Chen Weiben [7115 4850 2609] of 
the First Academy of the Ministry of Nuclear Industry, and other 
reactor engineers. They inspected the control rod position and 
the technical status of the reactor, and performed extensive 
analysis using the experimental data obtained on the land-based 
model reactor and the first submarine. They concluded that the 
reactor safety would not be jeopardized if both pumps lost Power 
and an auxiliary pump was switched on within 1.8 seconds. 
<H5>  B. Nuclear Submarine Maintenance </H5>
  On 22 December 1987, the test submarine entered the yard for 
some modification and equipment addition. Strain gauges were 
installed on the submarine hull and some scheduled maintenance 
was performed. The workers had to complete 497 jobs in freezing 
temperature under a tight schedule. The Nuclear Submarine 
Manufacturing Plant adjusted the production line for civilian 
items and moved the submarine indoors for better working 
conditions. With appropriate measures, the schedule was met. The 
technical staff, workers, and cadres worked consciously and paid 
attention to every detail to ensure a smooth depth test for the 
submarine. 
<H5>  C. Preparation of the Testing and Monitoring Systems </H5>
  The preparation was conducted by Laboratories 702, 719, and 
705, the Navy's South Sea Depth Testing Site, and the First 
Academy of the Ministry of Nuclear Industry. Measurement and 
monitoring systems prepared for the submarine included 
stress-strain monitoring systems, acoustic positioning and 
velocity measurement systems, nuclear radiation dosage 
monitoring systems, noise measurement systems, submarine motion 
measurement systems, torpedo launch pressure and muzzle velocity 
measurement systems, and torpedo trajectory measurement systems. 
Scientific data were accumulated for evaluating the safety and 
performance of the submarine. 
<H5>  D. Crew Training </H5>
  Following standard regulations, the submarine base trained 
the crew for underwater accidents, emergency surfacing, 
emergency reverse, and reaction to longitudinal inclination. 
Chief Electrician Yao Jinquan [1202 2529 3123] organized a mock 
exercise on the simulator in Laboratory 719 for deep dives and 
high-speed cruising. Preparation for incidence and reaction to 
various incidence were made. This training formed a good 
foundation for proper operation and safe testing of the 
submarine. 
<H5>  E. Rescue and Protection Exercise </H5>
  The Navy navigation and protection department organized the 
rescue departments of the North Sea, East Sea, and South Sea 
fleets and the Naval Medical Institute to formulate rescue and 
medical protection plans, prepare rescue equipment, form rescue 
teams, and conduct rescue exercises. 
  In addition, the No. 750 test site of the China Shipbuilding 
Company and the Navy's South Sea depth test site and other units 
also made extensive preparations in the areas of torpedo, 
torpedo technology base, target, measurement systems, and 
communications. 
<H5>  (2) Implementation in the South Sea </H5>
  In March 1988, the depth test leading group inspected the 
preparations, assigned the duties for the South Sea 
implementation, and named Deputy Commander Qu Zhengmu of the 
South Sea Fleet as the chief commander. Four deputy commanders 
were named: Deputy Naval Chief of Staff Shi Tianding [4258 1131 
1353], Deputy Manager Huang Pingtao [7806 1627 3447], Deputy 
Chief of Staff of the North Sea Fleet Wang Shouren [3769 1343 
0088], and Deputy Director of Naval Logistics Wei Bochang [7614 
2679 7022]. Commander Yang Xi of the submarine base was named 
the commander of the submarine. 
  In April 1988, the submarine arrived at Zhanjiang harbor. 
Shortly thereafter support vessels and personnel also arrived. 
The various specialty groups made arrangements for their 
respective testing tasks. An action plan, an implementation 
plan, communications procedure and a signal chart were organized 
and formulated under Deputy Chief of Staff He Chunlian [0149 
2504 6647] of the South Sea Fleet. These documents specified 
implementation procedures and methods. The technical group led 
the participants in a re-check of the technical condition of the 
submarine and readied the mechanical equipment and monitoring 
apparatus. The political group and the logistics group, with the 
help of naval bases in Guangzhou and Zhanjiang, the Guangdong 
Province, and the municipality of Zhanjiang, took care of 
security, water, electricity, and other matters. All pre-sailing 
preparations were completed in 2 weeks. 
  The deep dive test was to find out the deepest dive depth of 
the submarine; it was the heart of the three depth tests and was 
also the riskiest. In order to ensure safety, the leadership 
group decided to take a step-by-step approach. 
  Stage I was a 180-meter preparatory dive. At 1600 hours on 
20 
April, the nuclear submarine left the harbor and sailed 210 
nautical miles to the test zone. At 900 hours on 21 April, the 
submarine dived to a depth of 193 meters. The preparatory dive 
was handled properly and the equipment worked well. Data were 
collected by all six monitoring stations. The test revealed 
excessive strain readings on the strain gauge exterior to the 
broadside. The malfunction was eliminated by using shielding and 
compensating measures. 
  Stage II was a deep dive test. Because of the risks 
involved, 
it was decided that a crew of 176 would participate. Deputy 
Commander Wang Shouren took command and Huang Xuhua, Wu Tingguo 
[0702 1656 0948] and Xu Binghan [1776 4426 3352] were in charge 
of technology. The submarine sailed on 28 April. While at sea, 
improper filling pressure of the adjustment water tank caused 
damage to the seal of the hatch cover. Team leader Xu Yong [1776 
0516] led workers into the dosage zone above the reactor and 
repaired the damage; the deep dive test proceeded normally. At 
0920 hours on 29 April, there were some problems with underwater 
acoustic communications after the dive. The submarine surfaced 
then to periscope depth. Wang Shouren and Shi Tianding, who was 
commanding the rescue ship, decided jointly that the submarine 
commander should decide whether to continue the dive if the 
communications were interrupted again. At 1113 hours, the 
submarine dived again. At a depth of 230 meters, 11 outbursts of 
noise were heard in the submarine and there were 19 leaks. Some 
support angle iron buckled. Commander Wang Fushan was coolly in 
command and the crew members all performed their jobs well. 
Inspectors carefully watched the vessel. When the submarine 
reached maximum working depth, the hull did not emit any more 
noise and the leaks did not worsen. The dive continued. At 1203 
hours, the depth gauge in No. 2 compartment indicated that the 
submarine had reached maximum depth and set a record for the 
Chinese Navy in deep diving. The deep dive test results showed 
that the submarine hull structure and connection systems were 
safe and reliable. All the mechanical devices functioned 
normally and the test was a success. 
  Stage III was a test for flank speed under water. Full speed 
was a severe test for the submarine's performance, the 
mechanical devices on-board, the technical level of command and 
control, and the ability to deal with emergencies. To ensure 
safety, it was decided that the following people would be in 
charge of technology: Zhao Renkai, Chen Weiben, Wang Daotong and 
Deputy Director Zhang Jinlin [1728 6855 7792] of Laboratory 719. 
When the reactor was started up to generate steam while the 
vessel was docked, deputy team leader Dong Youjing [5516 2589 
4842] of the Nuclear Submarine Manufacturing Plant discovered 
that the discharge valve under the evaporator malfunctioned. 
Upon inspection it was discovered that the threads of the bolt 
connecting the valve body and the valve seat were severely 
damaged. The connection was quickly welded and an accident was 
averted. 
  The submarine left harbor on 12 May and conducted high-level 
baseline tests while sailing toward the test zone. When the 
propeller speed was increased from 125 rpm to 183 rpm, the 
control panel started to vibrate vigorously, but all the 
mechanical devices, nuclear powerplant, and instruments and 
meters worked normally. At 0701 hours on 13 May, the submarine 
entered the test zone. At 0951 hours, the submarine dived to the 
starting position and began speed measurement tests after two 
practice runs with support vessels. When the propeller speed was 
increased to 198 rpm, the submarine reached full power and 
continued to function normally. At this time the reactor power 
was less than 90 percent and there was still some power in the 
main unit intake. After some discussion, the experts on-board 
and the commander decided to increase the speed by 2 rpm. When 
the chief electrician reported 200 rpm, the captain once again 
ordered steady operation and mechanical checks; the speed was 
then reduced. At 1316 hours, the test was concluded and the 
monitor stations acquired real-time data. The speed of the 
nuclear submarine reached the design value and the main unit had 
some spare power. The reactor power still had considerable 
reserve. The overall thermal efficiency of the power device was 
higher than the design value by 2 percent. The test was a 
success and proved that the nuclear powerplant, the 
electromechanical devices on board, and the equipment and meters 
all functioned reliably. The reactor shielding met expectations 
and ensured the safety of the crew. 
  Stage IV was a torpedo launch test at deep depth. Supporting 
vessels participating in this test numbered 12 and the diving 
submarine had a crew of 192. The organization and command of the 
test were complex and the requirements on hydraulics and weather 
were high. It was the largest test involving the most personnel 
and equipment in China's history of submarine torpedo launch. As 
the departure date approached, the weather deteriorated. 
Overcoming great difficulty, personnel of the South Sea naval 
depth test field successfully deployed the measurement systems. 
The test commander made a bold decision to finish the test 
before the arrival of the storm. The fleet arrived at the 
experimental zone at 0515 hours on 25 May. The command ship, 
measurement ship, sound source ship, and support ships all took 
up position and practiced with the submarine. At 1059 the first 
torpedo was launched, followed by three more launches. Test 
results showed that the torpedo launching device and other 
systems functioned normally and safe launch at great depth was 
ensured. The torpedo weapon system met the precision 
requirement. After the auto-guidance system captured the target, 
it tracked the target automatically. The torpedo was also 
capable of relocating and re-tracking the target. 
  The success of the depth tests indicated that China had 
completed the research and development of its first nuclear 
submarine. These tests proved that the development was a 
success, the construction quality was sound, and operating 
skills were superior. The submarine was now combat-ready and had 
generated vast scientific data and valuable experience for 
nuclear submarine warfare and for the development of the 
next-generation nuclear submarine. It was an important chapter 
in China's naval weaponry development. 
<H5>  Section 5. The Submerged Launching Test of Submarine-Surface </H5>
Missile 
  The underwater launch test of a submarine-to-land guided 
missile is a three-stage process. First, a submerged launching 
test is conducted from a conventional submarine, then, the test 
is conducted on a nuclear submarine, and a final test is 
conducted on a nuclear submarine. 
<H5>  (1) Advance Preparation </H5>
  To meet the needs of testing a submarine-surface missile on 
a 
nuclear submarine, the Central Military Commission decided in 
the late 1960s that the Naval Test Base should be in charge of 
building the submarine-to-land missile test range. The general 
staff and the Defense Science Commission organized relevant 
personnel in the Navy and in industrial ministries in March 1968 
to conduct field surveys and site selection. The activity was 
led by Deputy Commander Bing Ye [0393 6851] of the Naval Test 
Base. In 1971 the Central Military Commission approved the 
southern Liaoning test site. After 8 to 9 years of hard work, 
China built the technical position, the launch position, the 
test command post, the safety control center, the optical, 
radar, and remote-sensing stations, the communications facility, 
the dedicated railroads, docks, cranes, and hydraulic and 
meteorological facilities. The target zone in Gansu was also 
built. While building the test site, a submarine-surface missile 
testing department was established in March 1977. The department 
was under the leadership of the Naval Test Base and was led by 
Commander Yang Honggui [2799 3163 6311] and political committee 
member Sun Liu [1327 0362]. 
  A closely coordinated effort ensued, with participation by 
the Defense Science Commission, the Navy, and the development 
departments. After years of work, various measurement and 
monitoring facilities were developed, modified, and put into 
service. A communications and signal transmission problem was 
encountered in the course of the test in the early 1970s. To 
solve this problem, Niu Shunchang [3662 7311 7022] of the test 
base worked with Fan Chunsheng [5400 2504 3932] of Laboratory 19 
of the Seventh Academy and developed a simple, convenient and 
practical communications raft. A wind-resistant raft equipped 
with special antennas and a tracer tube frame served as a 
carrier. Communications with the submarine were conducted 
through sealed electrical cables attached to the steel cable. 
After repeated submerged launching tests and continuous 
improvements, the unique communications raft has become an 
effective means for solving communications between the 
submarine, the coast base, the ocean surface, and the air. Its 
main functions were to transmit timing signals and the countdown 
data of the launch so that land-based equipment could have 
aiming data and could estimate the approximate position of the 
submarine underwater. 
  In 1980 China established its deep-water survey fleet and 
acquired the ability for surface monitoring of the re-entry 
section of the carrier rocket and recovery of the data capsule. 
In the meantime, safety concerns of important cities along the 
westward launch path of the submarine-to-land missile was also 
considered. The Defense Science Commission and the Navy 
thoroughly investigated the problem and, with approval of the 
Central Military Commission, decided to change the launch 
direction. The target zone in northwest China was scrubbed and 
the end zone task was assigned to the survey ship base. 
Necessary modifications of the head zone monitoring system were 
made for the launch direction change and for the communications 
and measurement facility. After 3 years and many obstacles, test 
preparations were completed. 
<H5>  (2) Launch Test of Submarine-Surface Missile From </H5>
Conventional Submarine 
  China's first submerged launching of a submarine-surface 
missile was conducted on a modified conventional submarine. The 
difficult test involved many units and backup forces. To enhance 
the leadership organization and the coordination of the task, an 
ocean test leadership group was established in 1980. The group 
leader was Navy Deputy Commander Yang Guoyu [2799 0948 1342] and 
the deputy group leader was Deputy Director Ma Jie [7456 2212] 
of the Defense Science Commission. The leadership group formed 
an office, which was headed by Deputy Director of the Navy 
Equipment Technology Department. In 1981, a system of chief 
engineer for testing was established. The chief engineer was 
Huang Weilu [7806 4885 4389] who was the chief designer for the 
submarine-to-land guided missile. Deputy chief engineers were 
Huang Xuhua [7806 2485 5478], Shen Rongjun [3088 2837 7486], and 
Xie Guolin [6200 0948 3829]. Huang was the chief engineer for 
the submarine, Shen was the deputy director of the measurement 
and communications laboratoryof the Defense Science Commission, 
and Xie was the chief of staff of the naval submarine-to-land 
missile test department. In March 1982, commands were 
established for the head and end zones. Commander of the head 
zone was Tian Zuocheng [3944 0155 2052], commander of the naval 
test base. Deputy commanders were Zhou Cheng [0719 6134], Ma 
Lixin [7456 4539 2946], Huang Weilu, Huang Xuhua, Yang Honggui 
[2799 3163 6311], and Li Wenfa [2621 2429 4099]. Zhou was deputy 
commander of the naval test base, Ma was the deputy commander of 
Lushun base, Huang Weilu was the chief designer of the missile, 
Huang Xuhua was chief designer of the submarine, Yang was 
commander of the end zone, and Li was the submarine dispatch 
leader. Commanders of the end zone were Tian Zhenhuan [3944 2182 
3883], Jin Min [2529 2404], Liu Honglu [0491 3163 7120], and 
Meng Xiancheng [1322 2009 6134]. Tian was the survey ship base 
commander under the Defense Science Commission, Jin was the 
deputy chief of staff of the East Sea Fleet, Liu was the deputy 
commander of the Zhoushan base, and Meng was the deputy chief of 
staff of the survey ship base. To ensure successful execution of 
the test, the Second Academy organized a test team, which was 
headed by Wang Zhaoqi [3769 0340 7784] and was sent to the test 
site. 
  The test was organized and commanded by the command office 
of 
the Defense Science Commission. Communications and information 
exchange between the head zone and the end zone were implemented 
by the General Measurement and Communications Office of the 
Defense Science Commission. The Weinan monitor and control 
center was responsible for the signal exchange between the head 
and end zones. 
  Preparation in the head zone proceeded simultaneously on 
four 
fronts: technical position, launch position, control and 
communications, and rescue and alert. The technical position was 
led by Zhou Ganlin [0719 3227 2651], director of Laboratory 201. 
Zhou came up with a staggered procedure which allowed the 
testing of three fires instead of two. The technical position 
formulated detailed operating procedures, checked and calibrated 
hundreds of ground testing equipment, solved technical problems, 
ensured the quality of the missile and completed the test 
mission. 
  The test mission was organized and conducted by the 
submarine 
commander Shi Zunli [4258 1350 4409] and other participating 
units, including the submarine-surface missile test field. The 
following tasks were completed in the test: submarine crew 
training, experimental submarine test run, calibration of 
instruments, installation and adjustment, compatibility testing, 
communications raft testing, departing with missiles, launching 
exercise, coordination exercise, and underwater rescue training. 
The control and communications equipment was stretched out over 
a very long distance. It was a formidable task to put 
measurement, guidance, remote control, computer hardware and 
software, communications and data transmission equipment 
together and form a real-time measurement and processing system. 
The technology was very complex and the time constraints were 
stringent. In the end, difficulties were overcome and the 
missions were accomplished owing to the hard work of many 
technical and operating staff under the leadership of Deputy 
Commander Gu Shouren [7357 1343 0088] of the test field. 
  In carrying out the test mission, the test field also 
organized flight calibration of the measurement system, 
communications and transmission joint exercises, interference 
tests, and signal conditioning for the head and end zones. After 
16 dynamic calibrations, the accuracy and reliability of the 
measurement system was verified and the entire system was 
adjusted to its optimal state. Deputy Secretary Zhang Aiping of 
the Central Military Commission inspected the system calibration 
and expressed his compliments to the skill of the crews in a 
plaque penned by himself. 
  The Lushun base was mainly responsible for providing 
coverage 
of the ocean with 58 vessels for surface security, escort, 
rescue, and protective missions. The crews carefully studied the 
implementation plan, made specific assignments, and repeatedly 
practiced the rescue exercises. 
  In the early morning of 7 October 1982, the test proceeded 
in 
a tense but orderly fashion based on the regional command 
procedure. In the command post, Command Group Leader and Deputy 
Chief of Staff Wang Huike [3769 1920 1952] of the test base, 
announced "battle stations" and each post carried out the 
pre-launch preparations. At 1500:14:01, the first 
submarine-surface missile was launched. The launch was normal 
but the missile tumbled out of control shortly after ignition 
and self-destructed in the air. Chief Designer Huang Weilu led 
the technical staff in the investigation of the cause for the 
self-destruction and took preventive measures for the second 
firing. At 1500:00:01 on 12 October a second missile was 
successfully launched. Congratulatory telegrams came from the 
Party Central Military Committee, the State Council, and the 
Central Military Commission. The successful launch of China's 
submarine-surface missile was a major accomplishment for the 
technical personnel engaged in submarine and missile technology. 
<H5>  (3) First Launch Test of Submarine-Surface Missile From a </H5>
Nuclear-Powered Missile Submarine 
  Submerged launching of a model missile was conducted on a 
nuclear submarine. This test was conducted after a series of 
land-based tests and submerged launching of model missiles from 
a conventional powered submarine. The main purpose was to test 
the launch controllability of the guided missile, the real-time 
operation accuracy and reliability of the launch system, and the 
stability and reliability of the nuclear reactor during the 
launch. This test was organized by the naval test base and 
participated in by more than 20 units, including 49 sorties by 
various vessels and three helicopter sorties. The technical 
leader and coordinator was Laboratory 19 of the Seventh Academy. 
The test began on 8 March 1984 and ended 28 April 1984. A total 
of four model missiles were launched in the Bohai region. Test 
results showed that the launch system was designed properly and 
functioned successfully. The controllability of the submarine 
was excellent and satisfied the launch requirements. The command 
was accurate and the operation was skillful. The entire test was 
conducted according to the master plan. The only exception was 
that hydraulic and meteorological conditions at the time did not 
allow testing under high wave conditions. A complete set of test 
data was acquired and the anticipated goals were met. 
  The first submerged launching of a submarine-surface missile 
had been made from a nuclear powered submarine. The main purpose 
of the test was to evaluate the overall performance of the 
entire weapon system and to assess the tactical and technical 
level of the system. 
  The test was characterized by the broad participation of 
units and personnel. Stringent requirements were set for the 
safety of the missile flight zone. When a missile is launched 
from under water, aiming and target acquisition are very 
difficult. The water and weather conditions are constantly 
changing. High accuracy is essential for underwater positioning 
and aiming, and for real-time transmission of signals and 
count-down data. The underwater stress environment is very 
complex and the space in the submarine is very cramped. Compared 
with land-based launch tests, this test had its unique 
complexity and difficulties. 
  In May 1985 the Defense Science Commission and the Navy 
heeded the decision of the Party Central Committee, the State 
Council, and theCentral Military Commission and issued an order 
to participating units to conduct submerged launch tests for 
guided missiles from a nuclear submarine. A test organization 
was formed and tasks were assigned. Command posts were 
established in the head zone and end zone. The head zone formed 
a chief engineer group that consisted of Huang Xuhua, Zhao 
Renkai and Zhang Ganlin and led by Huang Weilu. Under the 
unified leadership of the command department, the chief engineer 
group was given the responsibility of research and coordination 
of major technical problems. 
  There were 139 units directly participating in the test 
mission in the head zone. There were 42 major pieces of 
measurement equipment, 24 pieces of postprocessing equipment, 
245 communications devices, 48 vessels, and three aircraft. 
  In mid-September, final preparations were completed by the 
technical position, launch position, monitoring system, the 
Navy, and the Air Force. The effort was led directly by the head 
zone command department. 
  On 28 September, the guided missile nuclear submarine 
conducted its first underwater launch. The missile broke surface 
and climbed, but before long tumbled in the air and 
self-destructed. Two more missiles were launched subsequently 
and both failed. Although the test failed, the submarine and the 
powerplant functioned satisfactorily. Complete data were 
acquired for further study of the underwater stress environment 
experienced by the missiles. These data were very valuable. 
  After the test, a series of malfunction analysis meetings 
and 
special topics conferences were held by the Defense Science 
Commission, the Navy, the Ministry of Aerospace, the China 
Shipbuilding Company, and the Ministry of Electronics. Together 
with analysis, the Ministry of Aerospace also conducted 
simulation experiments to reconstruct the malfunction. Tests 
were made to assess the stress experienced by the instruments on 
the missile. Vibration tests were conducted for the instrument 
module, and compression ratio tests were also made for the 
underwater separation of the tail cone. In addition, with the 
approval. of the Defense Science Commission and the Navy, a 
second submerged launch test was conducted with a model missile 
from the nuclear submarine. With a series of studies and tests, 
the cause of the malfunction was basically understood. Effective 
and comprehensive measures were taken for the next test. 
<H5>  Volume II </H5>
<H5>  Chapter XVI. Anti-Ship Missiles </H5>
  Anti-ship missiles are guided missiles launched against 
surface vessels from the water surface, under water, air, and 
land. They include ship-to-ship, submarine-to-ship, air-to-ship 
and shore-to-ship missiles. An anti-ship missile is comprised of 
a missile, fire control system, launch pad and ground equipment. 
Because of advantages such as high maneuverability, accuracy, 
penetration capability, and high destructive power, the 
anti-ship missile has become an important weapon at sea. China 
began to develop anti-ship missiles in the late 1950s. The 
development has gone through several stages, such as 
duplication, modification and design of shore-to-ship and 
air-to-ship missiles, as well as the development of 
second-generation anti-ship missiles. Technologically, it has 
advanced from subsonic to supersonic, from liquid fuel engines 
to solid fuel engines and ram engines, and from single parameter 
guidance to multiple parameter guidance. The second-generation 
anti-ship missiles developed in the late 1980s are approaching 
or are at world class level in terms of major strategic and 
tactical characteristics. 
<H5>  Section 1. Construction of R&amp;D Institutions and Test Base </H5>
<H5>  (1) Construction of R&amp;D Institutions </H5>
  On the basis of the instruction of the Chinese Communist 
Party to strengthen defense and to meet the need of the Navy of 
the Chinese Liberation Army, China began to establish research 
organizations and construct test bases for the development of 
anti-ship missile systems. 
<H5>  I. Establishment of R&amp;D Development Organizations </H5>
  In December 1959, on the basis of an agreement between China 
and the USSR, the latter supplied a number of sample anti-ship 
missiles, along with some technical data, to the Chinese Navy. 
As the Fifth Research Academy of the Ministry of Defense had 
just been established, it did not have the capability to develop 
guided missiles. The government decided to let the design 
department of the Fifth Research Academy in charge of the 
overall technology to duplicate the missiles in factories under 
the jurisdiction of the Ministry of Aerospace Industry and other 
relevant organizations. Under the coordination of the Office of 
Defense Industry and the National Defense Science Commission, 
the entire country was organized to duplicate anti-ship missiles 
by combining research, design, and production. Technology 
associated with research, design and production was rapidly 
obtained through this duplication effort. Since the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company had successfully copied several Russian 
aircraft, in order to speed up the development of anti-ship 
missiles, in March 1960 the First Machine Building Ministry 
decided to set up the 40th Office at the Nanchang Aircraft 
Company to be responsible for the duplication of anti-ship 
missiles. It constructed the largest air-conditioned missile 
assembly and test facility at the time and it was China's first 
ship-to-ship missile production line. In April of the same year, 
the National Defense Science Commission decided to establish the 
Fourth Total Assembly Department at the First Branch of the 
Fifth Research Academy to be in charge of the research and 
design of anti-ship missiles. Its primary mission was to 
collaborate with various industries to duplicate and reverse 
engineer anti-ship missiles and to get a grasp of the design 
concept and method associated with these missiles. 
  In the early 1960s, the government was temporarily short of 
money. In order to concentrate our effort, the Central Military 
Commission decided to copy the "Po-15" [TN: Probably the Soviet 
SSN-2A Styx] ship-to-ship missile as the starting point of 
anti-ship missile development in China. The production was done 
at the Nanchang Aircraft Company. The Fifth Research Academy 
sent people to the Nanchang Aircraft Company to deal with 
problems associated with design and production techniques. 
  In January 1965, the Seventh Machine Building Ministry 
reorganized the Third Branch of the Fifth Research Academy to 
form the Guided Missile Design Academy (i.e., the Third Research 
Academy) to undertake the tasks of design, construction, and 
pilot production of complete missile assemblies and various 
sub-systems. The director of the academy was Lin Yi [2651 3015] 
and the Party Secretary was Yu Wenren [6735 2429 0117]. The 
establishment of the Third Research Academy was very helpful to 
the overall preparation and implementation of plans for the 
development of anti-ship missiles. Coordination of technical 
resources was better organized and advanced research was 
strengthened. However, our capability in prototyping and 
production was still lacking. In April of the same year, the 
State Council decided to pull a number of factories and research 
institutions from the Seventh, Third, Fourth and Fifth Machine 
Building Ministry and put them under the Third Research Academy 
to create an entity that combined anti-ship development with 
production. This laid down a solid foundation for the 
development of anti-ship missiles in China. Since then, in 
addition to completing the duplication of ship-to-ship missiles 
in collaboration with the factory, the Third Research Academy 
also began to develop new anti-ship missiles concurrently. 
  As the Third Research Academy was established, the Seventh 
Machine Building Ministry also began to build anti-ship missile 
development and production bases in third line areas such as 
Sichuan and Hubei. In 1970, the development and production 
facilities under the Third Research Academy and the third line 
were placed under the control of the Navy. The director was Yu 
Xiaohong [0060 4562 5725] and the political commissar was Gui 
Shaobin [2710 4801 1755]. 
  In November 1977, the Third Machine Building Ministry and 
the 
Eighth Machine Building Bureau approved the establishment of a 
ship-to-ship missile design institute at the Nanchang Aircraft 
Company. Its primary function is to provide technical guidance 
to the development of ship-to-ship missile assemblies and 
sub-systems. During this period, the Third Research Academy had 
gone through several organizational changes. However, 
considerable progress was made in its research organization and 
experimental facilities. By 1980, it had become an academy with 
considerable capability in the design, prototyping and pilot 
production of anti-ship missiles. It is an anti-ship missile 
development and production system centered in Beijing with 
facilities in Jiangxi, Shenyang, Sichuan, and Hubei. It has more 
than 10,000 employees and has developed more than 10 different 
models of anti-ship missiles. The development of anti-ship 
missiles in China followed the path of import, duplication, 
improvement, and innovation. By sticking to the basics, we 
continue to develop and improve existing models to enhance their 
capabilities. We work hard to track new technology to strengthen 
our technical reserve in order to maintain the momentum of 
continuous development. 
<H5>  (2) Construction of Test Facility </H5>
  In order to meet the testing requirements for development 
and 
production, there is a need to construct a national missile test 
range to test the quality of missile systems under near 
battlefield conditions. The test firing of anti-ship missiles 
involves a large number of models of different trajectory ranges 
and carrier rockets and requires coordinated action on land, 
air, and sea. It is more demanding in terms of organization, 
command, coordination, technical protection, and safety control. 
  In January 1958, the Central Military Commission appointed 
Vice Commander of the Navy Luo Shunchu [5012 5293 0443] to 
organize a team to survey different sites along the coast with 
some Russian experts. On 3 March of the same year, the 
Secretariat of the Chinese Communist Party approved the 
construction of an over-water test range in Liaoxi as a part of 
the Northwest Missile Test Range. In March and April, the 
Chinese and Russian technical team, led by Yang Guoyu [2799 0948 
1342] and Sun Liangping [1327 0081 1627], surveyed the site in 
Liaoxi to pinpoint the land launch sites, technical positions, 
test command center, optical measurement station, telemetry 
station, communications center, and test vessel port. After the 
Russian experts presented a proposal, the engineering design was 
completed by the Naval Engineer Department under the Special 
Engineering Corps Command. A construction team of more than 
1,500 people was assembled by deploying people from the Navy, 
Railway Corps, Jinan Military Command and Shenyang Military 
Command to build a railroad, construct test facilities, and 
erect measurement stations on top of steep hills. By the end of 
1963, the construction of an over-water test facility for 
shore-to-ship missiles was essentially completed. 
  In October 1958, the Ministry of Defense decided to change 
the name of the missile test range to the Navy Test Base to be 
primarily responsible for the testing of naval weapons such as 
anti-ship missiles. Zheng Guozhong [6774 0948 0112] was the 
commander and Wang Dahua [3769 1129 5478] was the political 
commissar. The base was set up to have a base command, political 
command, logistics command, scientific research department and 
over-water test team. In November of the same year, the first 
naval shore-to-ship missile battalion was established at the 
base. The first company of the battalion, under the command of 
company commander Dai Yuqiu [2071 7183 4428], with the 
assistance of Soviet personnel, studied the technical theory and 
conducted practical field training and launched a Soviet-made 
shore-to-ship missile for the first time in June 1959. This 
enabled the technical staff and missile launch force to acquire 
some basic skills required for the preparation and 
implementation of tests. 
  The testing of guided missile systems requires a 
well-trained 
technical test team. In the early 1960s, the Base formulated and 
implemented a technical training plan to provide training to 
supervisors, technical staff and operators in test theory and 
technology. By means of classroom instruction, self-study, 
school attendance on a short-term basis, and visits to factories 
and research institutes, special technologies such as missile 
testing, launching, data analysis, optical measurement, 
telemetry, synchronized timing, data processing, metrology, 
target ship remote control, geological survey, hydrology, and 
meteorology were covered in the training. This program laid down 
a solid foundation for future official tests. 
  The most important aspect in missile system testing is the 
equipment associated with measurement, timing, data processing, 
targets, navigation, and metrology. When the base was being 
built, the necessary organizations were set up, equipment 
purchased and personnel assigned. In 1960, the base combined 
several existing measurement offices and expanded it into a 
measurement department in order to speed up the preparation 
work. After the departure of Russian experts, the base commander 
completed the installation of a variety of test equipment 
independent of any assistance from any foreign power. The 
construction of China's first optical cinetheodolite observation 
station was soon completed. Immediately afterward, modifications 
were made to the cinetheodolite, radio measurement device, 
aerial camera, data processing and timing equipment. In 1966, 
the installation and tuning of three cinetheodolites was 
completed. Along with other equipment, they formed the early 
stage measurement system at the base. This enabled the Liaoxi 
Missile Range to begin testing anti-ship missiles. 
  In the late 1960s, through the joint efforts of relevant 
development units and the base, an improved cinetheodolite, 
high-capacity digitized telemetry equipment, infrared laser 
radar, clock coder, high-accuracy ballistic camera, 
airborne-fire-control accurate measurement equipment, and 
similar gear were put into use, enriching and enhancing 
ballistic measurement systems for missile testing. 
Simultaneously, to simulate real targets, the base and various 
development units cooperated to develop stationary, moving, 
radar, infrared, and television targets and a series of target 
aircraft and target missiles with different characteristics and 
applications. Special naval forces and auxiliary ships were 
created to assume the various tasks involved with this testing, 
including transmission, projection, image recording, laying, 
control, and transport of targets. By the end of the 1980s, the 
base had expanded the various testing facilities of the Liaoxi 
Missile Range, installed relatively advanced testing equipment, 
and completed a large number of scientific experiments and 
design-finalization tests to develop anti-ship missiles. 
<H5>  Section 2. Ship-to-Ship Missiles </H5>
  Ship-to-ship missiles are installed on board ships to attack 
enemy surface vessels. They have a longer range than guns and 
torpedoes and are more accurate and maneuverable. Because a 
missile is installed on board over a long period of time, heat, 
humidity and salt air attack its components. Rocking, vibration 
and noise also affect the launch and flight of the missile. In 
addition, its exhaust impacts on the equipment and personnel on 
board. Hence, it is situated in a highly complex and hostile 
environment which makes the development of the ship-to-ship 
missile a tall order. 
<H5>  (1) SY-1 (Shangyou-1) Ship-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  In 1959, China imported a few Po-15 missiles and some 
production information from the Soviet Union. The missile had a 
normal aerodynamic layout. It had a liquid fuel rocket engine 
and a solid booster. It had an independent control system with 
automatic guidance. The weapon system was comprised of the 
missile and an onboard fire control system that included a radar 
control panel and launch device. 
  In early 1960, following a decision of the Central Military 
Commission, the National Defense Science Commission and the 
National Defense Industry Commission went ahead to organize for 
the duplication of the Po-15. The Fifth Research Academy of the 
Defense Ministry was put in charge of the technology and had the 
responsibility of overall design. The Nanchang Aircraft Company 
of the Third Machine Building Ministry was the missile 
production unit. Other factories in the Third Machine Building 
Ministry were responsible for the duplication and production of 
accessories. In August, the Fifth Research Academy appointed Li 
Tongli [2621 0681 0500] as Chief Designer. To coordinate the 
duplication effort, a large number of technical people from the 
first and second branches of the Fifth Research Academy were 
sent to factories to learn and digest the information on hand, 
as well as to resolve design issues encountered. Soon after, the 
defense industry was reorganized. Progress slowed down. The 
technical staff at the Fifth Research Academy and the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company concentrated their resources on getting 
familiar with the information. By way of reverse engineering, 
they understood the theory and technical issues associated with 
the overall design of the missile and its various subassemblies. 
This created the conditions for us to duplicate the missile and 
served as a reference for future design of ship-to-ship 
missiles. In April 1963, the National Defense Science Commission 
held a special meeting on the Po-15 missile to resolve remaining 
issues in the duplication effort and to further clarify tasks 
and responsibilities. The Fifth Research Academy renamed Lu Lin 
[0712 3829] as Chief Designer. 
  In order to solve key technical issues in missile 
development, Chief Engineer Su Min [5685 2404] and Associate 
Chief Engineer Hua Yizao [5478 1942 5679] of the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company headed two separate teams to solve all the 
problems. The fiberglass reinforced plastic nosecone team came 
up with the warhead forming technique after close to 200 tests. 
A fiberglass reinforced foam plastic antenna cowling that met 
specifications was developed in July 1964. Later, a honeycomb 
sandwiched fiberglass warhead cone that is easier and cheaper to 
produce and still met the same specifications as the foamed 
plastic cone was developed on the basis of prior experience in 
the development of a honeycomb nose for aircraft. In order to 
solve key technical issues associated with extrusion of the 
aluminum wing, the Nanchang Aircraft Company put all its design 
and technical experts together and got help from the Shanghai 
Casting Institute. After repeated experimentation and 
verification, problems such as sheet forming, mechanical 
property, and thermal treatment shaping were solved. It filled a 
technical void as well. In addition, it also made progress in 
chemical milling of the rudder and aileron and in argon arc 
welding of the transformer ring Dewar, oxidant housing and 
incendiary agent housing. These key technical breakthroughs 
paved the way for the duplication of missiles. In October 1963, 
the Po-15 missile was in pilot production at the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company. In August 1964, the missile passed the static 
test. In November and December of the same year, under the 
command of Lu Lin and Vice Commander Bing Ye [0393 6851] of the 
Naval Test Base, the first land-based launch of a model missile 
took place at the Liaoxi Missile Range to evaluate the flight of 
the missile's booster section, the performance of the booster 
and the effect of the launch on the equipment and personnel 
onboard. The test was a success. 
  In 1965, two Russian-built missile boats were used in the 
Liaoxi Missile Range of the Naval Test Base to test wired remote 
controlled launch and shipboard launch of model missiles. Five 
missiles were launched and every one was a success. All missiles 
left the launching pad smoothly without coming in contact with 
any structure on board. The personnel, test animals and 
equipment in the sealed cabin were safe. However, it was found 
that the original design of the front cover of the launch 
cylinder on the missile boat was not strong enough. The missile 
was ignited at the rear. As it passed the front, the cover was 
distorted and the combustion gas entered the cylinder to tear 
the cylinder away at its seam. The front cover was torn off and 
went overboard. After development and test personnel took 
measures to reinforce the structure, tests were repeated and 
everything was normal. At the same time, the rocket engine, 
control instrumentation and final guidance radar were also 
successfully duplicated by the 111 Plant, 232 Plant, and 781 
Plant, respectively. 
  In May 1965, a shore-to-sea telemetry test was conducted at 
the Liaoxi Missile Range to evaluate the operating 
characteristics of various systems of the missile and to 
determine its accuracy. Three missiles were launched and all 
were successful. In this test, for the first time, radio 
telemetry equipment was used at the Liaoxi Missile Range to 
systematically record relevant data of the missile, providing us 
with the necessary internal trajectory data for analysis. In 
order to record the final stage of the missile, movie 
photographers risked their lives and waited on a small fishing 
boat in the test range to capture the scene when the missiles 
approached the targets. In June of the same year, telemetry 
tests were conducted again over water. Out of three missiles 
launched, two hit the target. By then, the testing of the Po-15 
missile in the development phase was completed. 
  In these tests, we found many discrepancies between the real 
object and the data provided by the Russians. In addition, we 
also uncovered some incompatibility problems between the ship 
and the missile. The Naval Test Base personnel analyzed these 
problems, checked with design drawings and took measures to 
solve them one by one. This ensured the successful completion of 
the development test. 
  In November 1966, design finalization tests were conducted 
on 
the missile. The National Defense Science Commission, the Navy 
and all relevant national defense industries put a great deal of 
emphasis on the design finalization test of the first 
ship-to-ship missile built in China. The test was conducted 
under the direction of base chief of staff Wang Jilu [3769 7139 
7627]. A total of 12 ships and two aircraft were deployed to 
launch the missiles, control the target, set up the target and 
patrol the area. A number of test systems, including optical 
measurement, telemetry and timing systems, were employed. All 
participants from various departments were rigorously and fully 
trained to accurately carry out the technical preparation and 
launch mission. The test involved fixed targets as well as high 
speed moving targets. Missiles were launched in single and 
double shot at different altitudes and ranges. The result was 
eight hits out of nine launches to successfully wrap up the 
design finalization test. In August 1967, the design of the 
first generation duplicated ship-to-ship missile, the Shangyou-1 
(SY-1), was approved by the special weapons design finalization 
committee of the State Council. 
<H5>  (2) SY-1A Ship-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  The Shangyou-1 used a diaphragm altimeter to control its 
altitude and had a large error. It used a conical radar scanner 
which had poor resistance to electronic and wave interference. 
In October 1973, specifically with reference to these defects, 
the Nanchang Aircraft Company replaced them with a 2-cm terminal 
guidance radar and a radio altimeter and successfully completed 
the flight test of the improved Shangyou-1. In May 1974, the 
Navy requested approval from the Central Military Commission and 
the State Planning Commission to start the development of the 
improved Shangyou-1. In July of the same year, the National 
Defense Office officially issued the mission to modify the 
Shangyou-1 and named it the Shangyou-1A. The Nanchang Aircraft 
Company was responsible for the modification work. Major 
improvements included the monopulse transistorized small radar 
developed by the 781 Plant, the radio altimeter developed by the 
232 Plant and the simplified engine developed by the 111 Plant. 
During this period, under the direction of Jiang Longtan [5592 
7893 6223], the 232 Plant designed an 
IC-operational-amplifier-based analog computer control system 
that met the requirements for the control of missile trajectory 
at ultralow altitude. Low altitude simulation tests conducted in 
the third quarter of 1975 showed that the missile was capable of 
tracking and capturing its target while skimming over the ocean 
surface. 
  Between 1977 and 1980, three design finalization tests were 
performed for the Shangyou-1A. Sometimes it hit the target and 
sometimes it failed. Besides malfunction of the radar and 
control on board, the technical staff at the Naval Test Base 
also found out that the characteristic frequency of the missile 
played an important role. They believed that the vibration 
environment of the missile was an important factor contributing 
to its failure. In order to understand this effect, a comparison 
test was performed by the Nanchang Aircraft Company using the 
Shangyou-1 versus the Shangyou-1A. It was discovered that the 
frequency of Shangyou-1A was lower. In February 1981, Vice 
Minister He Wenzhi [0149 2429 3112] of the Third Machine 
Building Ministry chaired a failure analysis and coordination 
meeting and decided to adopt stringent technical measures to 
ensure the quality of various components. A large number of 
tests were performed under the direction of director Peng 
Lisheng [1756 2980 3932] of the design institute at the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company. Shock absorbers were put in the radar 
compartment and measures were taken to reduce the instantaneous 
impact of the detonator on the radio altimeter. The 781 Plant 
adopted measures to reduce vibration and selected components 
that had "seven specialties" to improve product reliability. In 
1982, the fourth design finalization test of the missile was a 
success. In March 1984, the State Council and the conventional 
armament design finalization committee of the Central Military 
Commission approved the design of the Shangyou-1A. The 
successful development of the Shangyou-1A not only improved the 
interference resistance of the missile but also made ultralow 
altitude flight a reality. 
  As the Shangyou-1A missile was being developed, the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company continued its effort to study altitude 
reduction. In November 1979, two reduced altitude tests were 
conducted for the first time. It was an indication that the 
mismatch between the radar and the control system was 
essentially solved. In particular, satisfactory results were 
obtained from the study of the "multiple pointer" effect of the 
altimeter and the "multiple path" effect of the radar associated 
with altitude reduction. In 1983, the Shangyou-1A secondary 
altitude reduction missile passed an appraisal at the ministry 
level. This was an indication that the ultralow altitude 
behavior of the missile had reached an advanced level. 
<H5>  (3) HY-1 (Haiying-1) Ship-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  In order to strengthen the combat capability of the navy in 
long range convoy mission, the National Defense Science 
Commission decided to install the HY-1 shore-to-ship missile on 
board destroyers as a ship-to-ship missile system. The Third 
Research Academy of the Seventh Machine Building Ministry was in 
charge of the overall design and technology, as well as the 
development of missile fire control panel. The Nanchang Aircraft 
Company of the Third Machine Building Ministry was responsible 
for the development and production of the missile. The Seventh 
Research Academy of the Sixth Machine Building Ministry was 
responsible for the development of shipboard equipment. 
  In February 1968, the National Defense Science Commission 
held a proof of concept meeting for this ship-to-ship missile. 
The HY-1 is comprised of a missile and a shipboard fire control 
system. The key to the onboard fire control system was to 
develop a new control panel and a revolving launch device. The 
Third Research Academy was responsible for the development of 
the control panel. It employed a number of new technologies 
including integrated circuits, redundant operation, automatic 
switching and self-diagnosis and troubleshooting to improve the 
performance of the control panel. The triple load revolving 
launch device designed by the Seventh Research Academy of the 
Sixth Machine Building Ministry ensured that the revolving area 
of firing requirement is met. 
  In order to make the missile adapt to ship movement and meet 
more stringent temperature and humidity requirements, the 
Nanchang Aircraft Company made improvements on individual 
radars, control panels and electrical circuits. Moreover, launch 
tests were successfully carried out on board older destroyers, 
as well as on newly developed missile destroyers. 
  In September 1972, the first missile dynamic aiming test was 
conducted at the Liaoxi Missile Range and found the initial 
batch of shipboard equipment to be faulty. The calculated target 
velocity fluctuated in a random manner. After repeated testing, 
and by sending simulated radar course to the control panel in 
stead of using the actual ship movement data, it was discovered 
that the smoothing function of the computer was not adequate. 
After taking corrective measures, it was successfully tested 
again in 1973. The overall accuracy of the weapon system was 
found to meet our specifications. Associate Director Liang 
Shoupan of the Third Research Academy and Assistant Chief Wu 
Baochu [0702 1405 0443] of the Overall Design Department joined 
the leadership team to solve problems emerged during the test 
period. 
  In September 1973, the 051 destroyer missile system 
underwent 
its first flight test. Four rounds in single and multiple rounds 
were fired and all of them hit fixed or moving targets. The test 
was a success. Vice Chairman Ye Jianying [0673 0494 5391] of the 
Chinese Communist Party Central Committee was present during the 
test. He praised the outcome highly. In January 1976, the State 
Council and the conventional weapon development leadership group 
of the Central Military Commission approved the design of the 
HY-1 ship-to-ship missile. Later, at the request of the Navy, 
the Nanchang Aircraft Company modified the HY-1 to make it 
compatible with both land and shipboard installation. 
Furthermore, high and low sea conditions test, biologic test, 
electromagnetic test and weapon safety test were conducted. In 
June 1983, the State Council and the conventional product design 
finalization committee of the Central Military Commission 
approved the design of the HY-1 ship-to-ship missile and its 
shipboard weapon system. 
  In order to enhance the tactical performance of the HY-1, 
led 
by Chief Designer Peng Lisheng of the Nanchang Aircraft Company, 
a frequency agile radar was installed to improve resistance 
against electronic and wave interference, as well as to enhance 
its capability to penetrate enemy defense. A radio altimeter was 
employed to reduce the altitude of the missile and a new 
automatic pilot was used to enlarge the area of firing. In tests 
conducted in July to September 1985, four out of four of these 
modified missiles hit their targets. In February 1987, the 
modified HY-1 ship-to-ship missile passed its technical 
appraisal and was named the HY-1A ship-to-ship missile. 
  Since the 1960s, after more than two decades of hard work, 
progressing from imitation, independent design, to improvement 
and enhancement, China has developed a variety of ship-to-ship 
missiles with different performance characteristics. 
<H5>  Section 3 </H5>
<H5>  Shore-to-Ship Missiles </H5>
  A shore-to-ship missile is a defensive weapon that is 
launched from the shore against enemy surface vessels. Compared 
to land-based artillery, it has a longer range and is more 
accurate and destructive. Its ground equipment may be mobile or 
fixed. It is usually deployed along the coast or on an island to 
protect coastal cities or harbors, or to blockade a channel, bay 
or an area that is more susceptible to enemy attack. 
<H5>  (1) HY-1 Shore-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  At the end of 1963, as progress was made in the duplication 
of the SY-1 ship-to-ship missile, the Nanchang Aircraft Company 
proposed the concept of the HY-1 shore-to-ship missile by 
modifying the SY-1. After proof of concept and obtaining input 
from the navy, an official recommendation to design the HY-1 
shore-to-ship missile by modifying the SY-1 ship-to-ship missile 
was presented. In April 1964, in a strategic production meeting, 
Associate Chief Zhao Erlu [6392 1422 7120] of the National 
Defense Office delivered a message from Chairman Liu Shaoqi 
[0491 1421 1142] that we needed to have shore-to-ship missiles 
as soon as possible in order to deter the enemy at sea. 
Consequently, the development of this missile was accelerated. 
At the end of the year, the Nanchang Aircraft Company submitted 
an overall design scheme to the Third Ministry of Machine 
Building. During this period, the Fifth Research Academy of the 
Ministry of Defense also proved a concept of the shore-to-ship 
missile. 
  In April 1965, the National Defense Office and the Seventh 
Ministry of Machine Building held a meeting in which the 
shore-to-ship missile plan was reviewed by a group chaired by 
Qian Xuesen [6929 1331 2773]. After comparing the plans proposed 
by the Nanchang Aircraft Company and the Third Research Academy 
of the Seventh Ministry of Machine Building, it finally decided 
on using the SY-1 ship-to-ship missile as the basic model. The 
propellant container was enlarged, engine operating time was 
lengthened, and the auto-pilot and terminal guidance radar 
parameters were adjusted in order to raise its range and improve 
its performance. The modified model was renamed as the HY-1 
(Haiying-1) shore-to-ship missile. 
  The Nanchang Aircraft Company was responsible for the design 
and production of the HY-1 shore-to-ship missile. The Third 
Research Academy was in charge of the overall technology of the 
weapon system. At the same time, the development and production 
of the engine, autopilot, terminal guidance radar and combat 
gear and detonator were assigned to various organizations. After 
the development work was in full swing, the Nanchang Aircraft 
Company took advantage of the experience gained in the 
duplication process to modify and perfect the technical approach 
under the direction of He Wenzhi [0149 2429 3112] who was in 
charge of the overall project. He mobilized the entire staff for 
the development work. Vice Minister Liu Dingzeng [0419 7844 
2582] attended numerous briefings and helped solve some of the 
problems encountered in the development process. In addition, 
experts such as Associate Professor Zhao Zhenyan [6392 7201 
3508] of the Beijing Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics 
were also retained as consultants. 
  The HY-1 shore-to-ship missile had a longer range and it 
imposed new requirements on testing. Based on the capability of 
the weapon and testing requirements, the Naval Test Base 
selected and constructed two new launch sites and created a new 
test navigation zone. It also rearranged the locations of 
measurement stations and put in the necessary facilities and 
roads to ensure that the test could be completed on schedule. 
  The maximum range of the HY-1 shore-to-ship missile is twice 
as long as that of the SY-1 ship-to-ship missile. In addition to 
taking appropriate measures with the engine, the overall thrust 
had to be raised. The Third Research Academy and the 282 Plant 
of the Fifth Ministry of Machine Building completed the 
development of a high-quality engine on schedule. Other 
development efforts such as the engine at the 111 Plant, the 
autopilot at the 119 Plant, the terminal guidance radar at the 
781 Plant and the ground tracking radar at the 786 Plant were 
all pressing ahead under full steam. Because of well-coordinated 
collaboration between development and production departments, 
very rapid advances were made in the development of the missile 
and ground equipment. Two telemetry missiles produced by the 
Nanchang Aircraft Company were shipped to the Liaoxi Missile 
Range in December 1966. The two launch pads and fuel trucks 
built at the 437 Plant also arrived at the test site according 
to schedule. This ensured the flight test of the first missile. 
  In December 1966, the first flight test of the HY-1 
shore-to-ship missile took place at the Liaoxi Missile Range. 
The range was set at 70 km and the target was fixed. The flight 
altitude was 300 m. After launch, the attitude and trajectory of 
the missile were normal and the heading at the end of the 
automatic control segment and the longitudinal scatter were also 
within specification. However, after the missile finished its 
maximum range, the terminal radar did not capture the target. 
After that, three more flight tests were conducted. 
Nevertheless, the same problem persisted. In July 1967, the 
National Defense Science Commission and the National Defense 
Office held a meeting chaired by Qian Xuesen, Zhao Lianqing 
[6392 3425 7230] and Ma Xuelin [7456 1331 2651] to discuss this 
problem. It was concluded that the vibration of the missile 
caused the terminal radar to function intermittently. Associate 
Director Liang Shoupan of the Third Research Academy went to the 
test site to conduct an analysis. He recommended that the front 
of the launch guide rail be cut short by 1.2 m and the bottom 
plate of the exhaust trough be deflected downward so that it was 
almost parallel to the jet from the booster to minimize 
vibration. At the same time, at the Nanchang Aircraft Company an 
experimental study was done under the direction of Cheng 
Shaozhong [4453 4801 1813]. It was found that the projectile 
body was not rigid enough and the gap between the radar and 
projectile body was too small. After taking measures to reduce 
radar vibration and to thicken the skin of the projectile body 
to raise its rigidity the problem was solved. In October 1970, 
the design-finalization flight test was a success. The HY-1 
shore-to-ship missile went through 25 flight tests in the 
development phase. Its design was approved by the Naval Weapon 
Design Finalization Committee in August 1974. 
<H5>  (2) HY-2 Shore-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  In order to strengthen our defense against enemy from the 
sea 
as instructed by the Central Military Commission, the navy asked 
for the development of a long-range shore-to-ship missile. The 
Third Research Academy conducted some work to demonstrate 
several concepts. Associate Director Zhao Erlu and Bureau Chief 
Liu Zhengdong [0491 2973 2767] of the National Defense Office 
attended the discussion meeting held by the Third Research 
Academy and listened to the inputs from various sources. After 
an in-depth analysis, a scheme based on the HY-1 missile with an 
increased range was presented in June 1965. In August, the 
Central Special Committee included this model into the national 
plan and named it the HY-2 missile. 
  Under the leadership of Director Lin Yi [2651 3015], the 
newly-founded Third Research Academy was involved in 
construction, design and development at the same time. The proof 
of overall scheme and design work was done under the direction 
of Vice Chief Cao Bozhen [2580 2672 2823] of the total assembly 
design department and Chief Li Tongli [2621 0681 0500] of the 
total assembly office. The missile had to have a longer range 
and the same accuracy. This became the key technical issue in 
the development of the HY-2. In order to accomplish this 
objective, the Third Research Academy adopted a series of 
technical measures to lengthen the operating time of the liquid 
fuel rocket engine, improve the performance of the second stage 
rocket, solve the overheating problem in the cooling channel, 
use a force-bearing oxidant tank manufactured by chemical 
milling, and resolve the contradiction between force transfer 
and projectile rigidity due to increased volume, weight and 
length of the propellant tank. It developed a new navigation 
gyroscope that is more accurate, enlarged the search sector 
angle and auto-guidance range of the terminal guidance radar, 
redesigned the trajectory, reanalyzed the circuitry and altered 
parameters associated with the control and radar. A new command 
panel, coastal tracking radar launch pad and transport and 
fueling vehicle were also developed and constructed. 
  The pilot production of the HY-2 was also a key issue. The 
pilot assembly plant at the Third Research Academy was a small 
facility for machining non-standard equipment. The plant was 
small and inadequately equipped and staffed for this job. 
Moreover, there was a big gap in the level of technique 
available. In order to meet the deadline imposed by the Seventh 
Ministry of Machine Building to complete the pilot production 
using existing resources within one year, the Third Research 
Academy decided to send all technical people who were involved 
in the duplication effort in the past at the design department 
to the assembly plant to handle technical problems associated 
with the model construction and pilot production. The plant was 
responsible for solving equipment and technique related 
problems. With the support of the Nanchang Aircraft Company and 
the 211 Plant, the first static test missile was produced in 
August 1966. 
  Progress was also made in the development of onboard 
ancillary equipment and ground facility. Under the leadership of 
Chief Designer Kang Liansen [1660 5114 2773] and Assistant Chief 
Designer Wang Shusheng [3769 2885 5116], the 111 Plant and the 
31 Institute of the Third Research Academy modified the engine. 
After more than 20 individual tests and 14 hot-firing tests, 
they developed an engine that was qualified for prolonged 
operation. In addition, the autopilot jointly developed by the 
119 Plant and the 3rd Institute of the Third Research Academy 
and the terminal radar developed by the 781st Plant of the 
Fourth Ministry of Machine Building were delivered on time to be 
installed in the missile. Under the direction of Chief Engineer 
Zhang Xixiong [1728 6932 3574], a ground tracking radar that met 
both searching and tracking requirements was developed at the 
781 Plant of the Fourth Ministry of Machine Building by 
modifying the Model 864 coast artillery radar. Its design was 
furthered modified and simplified by the Shanghai 101 Plant and 
other production plants on the third line and its components 
were transistorized to improve its accuracy, interference 
resistance and reliability. On the basis of a computer developed 
at the 706 Institute, together with the optical coding dial 
developed by the 23rd Institute of the Second Research Academy 
and the A/D (analog-to-digital) and D/A (digital-to-analog) 
converter developed by the Metrology Station of the Second 
Research Academy and the 704th Institute of the First Research 
Academy, the Third Institute of the Third Research Academy 
developed a digital command panel. During road test, experts 
such as Zhang Zichang [1728 2737 2490] of the 706 Institute and 
Assistant Chief Wu Baochu [0702 1405 0443] were inside the test 
vehicle to obtain first-hand information on the test data. The 
Third Research Academy was in charge of the launcher and the 
transport and fueling vehicles. It was designed with the 
assistance from the Beijing Industrial College and Naval Test 
Base and manufactured at the Hudong Shipyard and the 349 Plant. 
The electric power generator vehicle was developed by the 
Zhengzhou Electric Appliance Factory and the Lanzhou 
Consolidated Electric Machinery Factory. The overall test 
vehicle and the pre-launch inspection vehicle were designed by 
the Third Ministry of Machine Building and manufactured at the 
general assembly plant of the Third Research Academy. Thus, the 
ground system that was comprised of several dozen vehicles was 
also ready on schedule. In November 1966, the entire ground 
system was tested as a whole. 
  From September 1966 to March 1967, the missile underwent 
static tests, vibration tests and engine test firings on the 
ground as a complete missile. The results indicated that the 
technical measures taken to increase the range of the missile 
and the design of the projectile body were stable and reliable. 
The precision of the fire control system affects the accuracy of 
the missile and the magnitude of deviation at the end of the 
flight in automatic control. It had to be checked out prior to 
any flight test. The technical staff of the Liaoxi Missile Range 
and the Third Research Academy jointly determined specific 
schemes including test routes, number of flights, and data 
acquisition and processing. After dozens of tests, the fire 
control system was found to meet design specifications. In 
addition, problems such as the computer smoothing system were 
resolved as well. 
  In September 1967, the first batch of telemetry missiles 
arrived at the Liaoxi Missile Range. It so happened that the 
HY-1 missile was also being tested at the test site. Problems 
such as radar failure and "short projectile" (missile falling 
into the water before completing its pre-determined flight) were 
discovered with the HY-1. In view of these problems, Liang 
Shoupan and Wu Baochu decided to adjust the return angle of the 
terminal guidance radar of the HY-2 to ensure the successful 
test launch of the first missile. On this basis, an automatic 
return mechanism has been added to the radar antenna of the 
HY-2. Afterward, three more missiles were successfully launched. 
The development flight test was competed with a 4-out-of-4 
record. 
  In August 1969, the design finalization flight test for the 
HY-2 was done at the Liaoxi Missile Range and the outcome was 4 
out of 5. In March 1970, the naval shore-to-ship missile unit 
simultaneously launched several missiles in a design 
finalization test. The sea was very rough on that day and the 
target vessel was light, rolling so violently that onboard 
personnel could not be evacuated. The commander was burning with 
impatience. However, in order to carry out the test mission 
successfully they insisted on proceeding and ignored their 
personal safety. Two missiles hit the target. By then, the 
design finalization test of the HY-2 was completed with an 
excellent record of 6 out of 7. 
  From the onset of development in 1985 to the completion of 
the design finalization test in 1970, it took 5 years to develop 
the HY-2. Thirteen missiles were used in ground and flight 
tests. A total of 11 missiles were launched and 10 hit their 
targets. This was a good beginning for the development of 
anti-ship missiles in China. Furthermore, we gained the valuable 
experience that a missile design must be advanced, stable and 
reliable and then needs to be fully validated and tested. This 
effort laid a solid foundation for the future. 
<H5>  (3) HY-2A Shore-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  In order to overcome the deficiency that the interference 
resistance of the terminal guidance radar of the HY-2 is 
relatively poor, and to improve its penetration power, it was 
decided to change its radar-guided head to an infrared-guided 
head and named it the HY-2A, or infrared missile. 
  In the discussion stage of anti-ship missile development in 
the 1960s, Qian Xuesen proposed to work on infrared guidance 
because the terminal guidance radar is more susceptible to 
interference. To employ infrared guidance in an anti-ship 
missile, problems such as high variability of the infrared 
characteristics of the target, difficulties involved in the 
automatic search, capture and tracking over a long range and 
complex background interference of the ocean must be resolved. 
The key is the infrared detector. An in-depth feasibility study 
was done under the leadership of Director Zhong Renhua [6988 
0117 5478] of the Infrared Laser Institute of the Third Research 
Academy. After a large number of tests, indium antimonide was 
chosen as the infrared detector. Researchers conducted a great 
deal of preliminary experiments on the infrared characteristics 
of the target and background and the infrared device, validated 
the design of the infrared guidance system and successfully 
developed the indium antimonide detector and the magnesium 
fluoride glass cover. Following six tests over the ocean, the 
development of the prototype infrared guidance head was 
completed. At the same time, the overall design of the HY-2A was 
validated under the leadership of Chief Missile Designer Xuan 
Ping [1357 1627]. It was obvious that the key issues were to 
resolve the profile of the missile head and the installation of 
the IR head. As a result of wind tunnel tests, a small spherical 
profile was chosen out of the five tested. The missile head was 
reinforced. The indium antimonide detector was cooled by 
purified air instead of liquid nitrogen. A zero adjustment 
mechanism was designed to control the relative position between 
the optical axis and the missile axis. These measures solved the 
key problems encountered in the development phase. 
  In 1974, a ground simulation test of the infrared head and 
the entire missile system was carried out at the Infrared 
Institute of the Third Research Academy to verify the overall 
performance of the missile. Technical problems such as 
instability in search and loss of target were resolved. 
Nevertheless, in two development flights in 1975 and 1977, the 
problem of intermittent target capture and loss of target 
resurfaced. Another technical team was organized. The control 
parameters were redefined and the connection with individual 
pieces of ground equipment was retested to solve this problem. 
At the same time, the Naval Test Base was also actively 
preparing for testing the missile with an IR guidance head. 
Technical staff of the target group, working in collaboration 
with designers of the Third Research Academy, developed a 
compact infrared target which simulated the heat source of a 
medium to large vessel. It could be installed on a fixed target 
vessel or a remote control vessel to meet the needs of IR 
missile testing. 
  In September 1980, the HY-2A underwent its design 
finalization flight tests. The first missile launched missed the 
target laterally. After a check by the development and testing 
staff, it was found that there was an error in the production 
drawing of the circuit plugged into the left of the launcher, 
causing the onboard gyroscope to unlock before the missile was 
launched. After correcting this error, the flight test resumed. 
It was successfully completed with a 5-out-of-6 record. In 1982, 
the State Council and the Conventional Weapon and Equipment 
Design finalization Committee of the Central Military Commission 
approved the design of the HY-2A missile. 
  In order to enhance the tactical performance of the missile, 
the technical staff of the Third Research Academy improved the 
infrared guidance head and the altimeter. They developed a new 
infrared guidance head, improved the modulation algorithm and 
expanded the effective attack target range. They eliminated the 
diaphragm micro barometer and installed a radio altimeter 
instead. They lowered the altitude of the missile to further 
enhance its penetration power. In 1984, in its validation test 
of the modified missile, the outcome was 3 out of 3 and all 
major strategic and tactical specifications were met. It was 
named the HY-2A-II. 
<H5>  (4) HY-2B Shore-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  In order to enhance the penetration power of the 
shore-to-ship missile, our development people continued to make 
improvements on the HY-2. A monopulse radar guidance head was 
installed to improve its interference resistance. A new 
altimeter was used to reduce the altitude of the missile to an 
ultralow altitude. The improved missile was named the HY-2B, or 
the reduced altitude missile. In 1975, under the direction of 
Chief Designer Cao Bozhen [2580 2672 2823] and Designer Yang 
Xinsheng [2799 2450 3932] of the Total Assembly Design 
Department of the Third Research Academy, the total assembly 
scheme was validated and designed. In order to ensure the 
accuracy of guidance, they chose the two monopulse terminal 
guidance radars developed by the 239 Plant and the Third Line 
Plant of the Third Research Academy to improve the performance 
of the guidance device. They selected the radio altimeter 
developed by the 558 Plant to improve the altitude measurement 
device and to lower the cruising altitude. They adjusted 
relevant control parameters to resolve the safety problem 
associated with the cruising of the missile after it completed 
its descent and the "short shot" problem in the self-guiding 
segment. During a test flight in 1977 it was found that the 
altimeter manufactured by the 558 Plant and selected by the 159 
Plant was on the high side. After adjusting the control 
parameters and through tests over a wave-making basin and over 
the ocean, our development personnel found the cause and took 
corrective action. In 1979, the HY-2B successfully completed its 
development flight test. In 1982, it passed its modeling fixing 
test with a 5-out-of-6 record. In January 1984, the design was 
approved by the State Council and the Conventional Weapon and 
Equipment Design Finalization Committee of the Central Military 
Commission. The radar guidance head has always been the key to 
the performance of the HY-2 missile. To this end, the third line 
base of the Third Research Academy developed a variable 
frequency head and was successfully tested in a missile in 1989. 
It was named the HY-2B-II. 
  The development of the HY-2 shore-to-ship missile began in 
1965 and was successfully completed in 1984. Four models were 
produced, including an infrared version and a reduced altitude 
version, to form a complete series. Our practice proved that it 
is a successful experience to continuously improve and develop 
new models on the basis of a successful base model. 
<H5>  Section 4. Air-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  An air-to-ship missile is launched from an aircraft against 
a 
surface vessel. An air-to-ship missile system is comprised of an 
aircraft, missile, airborne fire control system and ground 
testing and loading equipment. It has a long range, covers a 
large combat area and is highly maneuverable. It is a major 
weapon for naval air power. 
<H5>  (1) Concept Validation of Air-to-Ship Missile System </H5>
  In the mid 1960s, the Navy and the Air Force both proposed 
to 
equip H-5 and H-6 bombers with missiles. In 1966, the Third 
Research Academy of the Seventh Ministry of Machine Building 
established an air-to-ship missile research laboratory at the 
Third Design Department and appointed Yao Shaofu [1202 4801 
4395] and Yang Jingqing [2799 4842 0615] as technical leaders in 
charge of concept validation. The National Defense Office and 
the National Defense Science Commission reviewed the design in 
May of the next year and decided to modify the HY-2 to develop 
an air-to-ship missile. To this end, the Third Research Academy 
organized wind tunnel model missile launch tests to analyze the 
performance of the rocket engine in a high-altitude, 
low-temperature environment. An improvement plan was presented. 
However, due to the Cultural Revolution, the development was 
stopped. In September 1975, the Central Military Commission 
approved the resumption of air-to-ship missile development. On 
the basis of the original air-to-ship missile plan approved by 
the National Defense Office, following the principle to choose 
off-the-shelf items to the extent possible in order to arm units 
in the field with hardware as soon as possible, the Third 
Research Academy restarted the air-to-ship missile development. 
<H5>  (2) Development of YJ-6 Air-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  In 1975, under the direction of Lu Shiguang [6424 0670 0342] 
and Yang Jingqing, further validation of the air-to-ship missile 
was completed. It was also coordinated with the aircraft fire 
control system. It was made clear that air-to-ship missile must 
be developed based on existing technical accomplishments. 
Compatibility between different models and selection of general 
purpose ground equipment must also be taken into consideration. 
Materials and components chosen must be domestic and 
standardized. Because these guidelines were strictly obeyed, the 
design was continuously modified, and major problems were tested 
and resolved in time, these steps played an important role in 
perfecting the weapon system and shortening the development 
cycle. 
  Based on the tactical requirements of the air-to-ship 
missile, the design incorporated an active monopulse terminal 
guidance radar, that is capable of resisting interference from 
wave, clutter, asynchronization and drag distance, and a radio 
altimeter in order to improve its low altitude penetration, 
interference resistance and survival probability. A digital 
command mechanism was used so that the missile could issue 
various commands to switch its working condition accurately and 
reliably. A Doppler radar was added to overcome the deleterious 
effect of wind velocity variation at different altitude on the 
terminal point at the end of the self-guided segment. Trajectory 
heading control and longitudinal range control were implemented 
to enlarge the launching air space. An oxidant emergency 
discharge system and a gas filling heating system were added to 
satisfy special requirements and safety concerns for air-to-ship 
missiles. 
  In April 1977, the Third Ministry of Machine Building, the 
Fourth Ministry of Machine Building, the Fifth Ministry of 
Machine Building, the Eighth Machine Building Bureau and the 
Navy jointly reviewed the plan for the air-to-ship missile 
system and decided to modify the H-6 bomber to carry the 
air-to-ship missile. In addition, the Third Research Academy was 
put in charge of the missile system. The carrier bomber was to 
be modified at the Xian Aircraft Company. The aircraft was named 
the H-6D and the missile YJ-6. In October, the State Council and 
the Central Military Commission approved the "Development Plan 
of H-6D Bomber Carrying YJ-6 Missiles." All units immediately 
proceeded with the development. After repeated validation and 
experimentation, Chief Designer of the YJ-6 was Lu Shiguang and 
Assistant Designers Yao Shaofu, Yuan Jianying [5913 6015 5391] 
and Li Shipei [2621 0013 1014] believed that the key issue to 
address and resolve in the development of an air-to-ship missile 
is that the quality of all components must be very high because 
the missile will have to endure a variety of hostile 
environmental factors such as low temperature, low pressure, 
vibration and aerodynamic interference from the airplane and the 
missile itself. 
  Under the direction of Fan Yongqing [5200 3052 337], the 239 
Plant began to develop a monopulse terminal guidance radar in 
1977. After 2 years of effort, a prototype was constructed and 
put on test. In 1981, a new terminal guidance radar with a novel 
anti-jamming circuit was developed. Its anti-jamming behavior 
was tested in early 1982 and found to be satisfactory. It became 
a new generation of guidance radar at the time. 
  The 8357th Research Institute was responsible for developing 
the onboard digital command mechanism by placing small digital 
logic components in digital mechanisms. Through a large number 
of tests and numerous design modifications, an accurate, stable 
and reliable command mechanism was finally developed. It is 
capable of executing programmed commands and range control 
command based on logic determination. It is a good beginning for 
the digitization of onboard devices. 
  The Doppler radar in the missile was a joint effort between 
the 782 Plant of the Fourth Ministry of Machine Building and the 
missile design unit. It was developed by modifying an airborne 
Doppler radar. Technical breakthroughs were made to meet design 
specifications. 
<H5>  (3) Modification of H-6D Bomber </H5>
  The H-6D bomber is the carrier of the YJ-6 missile. It is 
equipped with an onboard missile fire control system, an 
automatic navigation bombing system, a missile heating system 
and an aerial radar system. The missile fire control system is 
the key in the development of the YJ-6 missile system. It 
employs a system that combines an airborne radar with a firing 
command panel. It can perform track-while-scan and is highly 
accurate and has a long useful range. The entire fire control 
system is installed on the H-6D bomber to search and track 
targets, determine target movement parameters, calculate missile 
firing parameters, perform automatic pre-launch inspection and 
control missile launch. In order to accelerate the pace of 
development, despite the hardship caused by the Tangshan 
earthquake, the 8357th Research Institute worked hard day and 
night in earthquake damaged buildings to conduct research and 
experiments under the direction of Director Li Shipei [2621 0013 
1014] and Chief Engineer Dai Weiling [2071 1218 1545]. Very 
quickly, they resolved key issues such as radar video signal 
control and post-quantization digital data processing. In 
November 1979, performance verification was tested in air and 
the results were found to meet design specifications. 
  In July 1983, in the development of the airborne fire 
control 
system, Lu Shiguang and Yang Jingqing proposed to incorporate an 
inertial guidance device. It was approved by the National 
Defense Science Commission. This measure improves the accuracy 
and reliability of the fire control system to ensure the 
probability of a hit. 
<H5>  (4) Testing of the YJ-6 Missile </H5>
  A series of flight tests was arranged in the development of 
the YJ-6 missile to check out the design and verify technical 
coordination in order to discover and solve problems. These 
tests were done over land and sea, respectively. 
  The test flight of YJ-6 is much more complicated than that 
of 
a shore-to-ship missile. First, it requires a large air space, 
usually over two provinces and three cities, covering two major 
military zones. It involves ships, aircraft, ground support, and 
technical personnel for measurement, control and protection. It 
is difficult to organize such a team. Second, a special target 
suitable for the onboard radar to detect is required when a 
missile is to be launched from an airplane at a high altitude 
from a distance to ensure the capture of the target. Third, it 
requires simultaneous tracking of the airplane, missile and 
target. It involves a large number of measurement and control 
stations scattered over a large area. The measurement work is 
highly complex. Fourth, during the test, development, design and 
test personnel cannot travel with the airplane to observe the 
operation of onboard equipment. These unique situations demand a 
rigorous organization and close coordination. 
  In 1978, the first test flight of YJ-6 took place at 
Yanliang 
Field in Shanxi. When the H-6D bomber took off with the missile 
for the first time, the aircraft vibrated violently. An analysis 
showed that it was caused by the bomb bay door that had been 
enlarged to accommodate the missile. As the aircraft picked up 
speed, the rigidity of the fuselage decreased. After making 
modifications to the doors, the aircraft behaved normally. 
Simulation of fuel dumping in mid-air was also successfully 
completed. The measurement of telemetric direction pattern in 
test flight is highly complex and difficult. Our flight crew had 
never done it before. To this end, the Third Division of Naval 
Aviation chose Assistant Chief of Staff Gao Fuchang [7559 4395 
2490] as the navigator and Assistant Battalion Commander Ma 
Baorui [7456 1405 3843] as the pilot. In order to acquire data 
reliably, four sets of equipment were used to record the data. 
Due to sufficient preparation and a well designed plan, the 
mission was accomplished after two flights. In the same year, an 
exploratory launch test of the YJ-6 was conducted at the 
air-to-air missile test base to investigate issues such as how 
missiles are to be carried on the aircraft, what is the glide 
path of the missile, and what kind of mutual interference there 
is between the missile and aircraft. Three automatic control 
missiles were launched in this test. However, the first two fell 
to the ground before assuming a horizontal flight path. 
Technical personnel analyzed various problems and discovered 
that the polarity of the pitch gyroscope was incorrectly 
connected. After eliminating the problem, the third missile 
launched glided normally, the engine was ignited according to 
program and the missile descended to 100 m and flew 
horizontally. The test was a success. 
  In 1981, the accuracy of the fire control system was tested. 
First, an avionics oscilloscope was used as a data recording 
device to conduct some simple accuracy tests. It was followed by 
conducting an aiming accuracy test at the Liaoxi Missile Test 
Range. This test requires an aerial measurement system to obtain 
data such as the attitude of the aircraft and the ground speed 
drift angle. Technical personnel at the Liaoxi Missile Test 
Range, including Zhao Peizhi [6392 1014 1807], worked on this 
project for years with the cooperation of the 630th Institute 
and 141st Plant of the Ministry of Aerospace Industry and 
finally completed its development. 
  In the accuracy test, the target ship, cruise area and 
measurement facilities were all deployed over the Liaoxi Missile 
Test Range. The aircraft took off from Shanhaiguan Air Base. The 
first step was to calibrate the airborne Doppler radar. After 
collecting a large amount of data during several dozen flights, 
the aiming accuracy of the airborne fire control system was 
found to essentially meet design specifications. In order to 
further improve its accuracy and to overcome the 
shared-frequency asynchronous interference problem of the 
Doppler radar, aerial inertial guidance and ground speed drift 
were introduced to the missile fire control system. The accuracy 
of this inertial guidance control system was tested and the 
result was apparent. This work laid a solid foundation for the 
design finalization test for the weapon system. 
  In July 1981, the National Defense Science Commission and 
the 
National Defense Office conducted a thorough experimental study 
on air-to-ship missile in order to determine task assignment and 
organization principle. A variety of test organizations were 
established. Tian Zuocheng [3944 0155 2052], Group Leader of the 
on-site test group and Commander of the Naval Test Base, was 
responsible for organizing the test work. 
  Developmental test flight of the YJ-6 over water began in 
late 1981. In order to verify the performance of missile 
equipment on board of an aircraft in the air, a simulation test 
was done in the early stage. This is an economic way to test the 
system. With the exception of not launching the missile after 
pushing the firing button, every step is carried out as if it is 
a real launch. After the aircraft returns to base, the control 
panel prints out various firing parameters to reveal all the 
relevant data. Through this simulated missile carrying test, 
major technical issues, such as aircraft vibration, were 
discovered and resolved. It also shortened the test cycle and is 
an innovation in the development of the YJ-6 missile. 
  Developmental test flights of the entire YJ-6 missile system 
over water began in early 1982. The primary objective was to 
evaluate the capability of the fire control system to track 
moving targets and the performance of the missile at various 
ranges when the aircraft is flying at an altitude of between 
1,000 to 9,000 meters. Those responsible for launching the 
missile and operating the fire control system were Ma Baorui, 
Vice Battalion Commander, Third Division of Naval Aviation, Di 
Xijie [5049 6007 2638], navigator Zhang Junde [1728 0193 1795], 
and the entire crew of H-6D bomber number 80334. Despite having 
participated in numerous simulated carry and launch tests, they 
still underwent a series of training exercises to ensure the 
success of the mission. The 7th Division of Naval Aviation and 
Shanhaiguan air base provided accurate direction and ground 
protection to the H-6D bomber. The Liaoxi Missile Test Range 
developed a special double-layer reflector target that reflects 
radar signals evenly and arranged test flights to check a 
variety of measurement equipment, calibrate the radar, conduct 
dynamic accuracy tests, inspect the inertial guidance system and 
simulate the trajectory. In every test, all participants arrived 
at Shanhaiguan air base ahead of time to provide sufficient 
preparation for the missile and onboard equipment. Comrades from 
superior organizations such as the National Defense Science 
Commission, National Defense Office, Navy, Air Force, and the 
3rd, 4th, 5th, 6th and 7th Ministry of Machine Building were 
also present to provide guidance to the test. 
  On 19 June 1982, the first missile was launched from an H-6D 
bomber at low altitude and the missile cruised normally and hit 
its target. Afterward, three additional missiles were launched 
from the H-6D bomber at different altitudes and they were all 
direct hits as well. This test was done to evaluate the 
performance of the missile at maximum and minimum altitude, 
maximum and minimum range with respect to either a fixed or 
moving target ship in both winter and summer conditions. The 
developmental test over water was a success. 
  In 1984, the YJ-6 missile underwent its design finalization 
test. Personnel from various organizations performed rigorously 
inspected and tested the missile and onboard equipment based on 
the test protocol to make sure the technical preparation is done 
well. Seven missiles were launched in this test at different 
altitudes from as high as 9,000 meters to determine the behavior 
of the missile at different cruising altitudes and extreme 
self-guidance range, as well as its resistance against 
shared-frequency asynchronous interference. Both fixed and 
moving target ships were used. The result was 4 out of 4 to 
conclude the design finalization test. In 1986, YJ-6 passed the 
national design certification. 
<H5>  Section 5. Multi-Mission Anti-Ship Missile </H5>
  Having successfully duplicated, improved and independently 
developed its own anti-ship missiles, China had the ability and 
resources to develop new anti-ship missiles. Because anti-ship 
missiles with liquid fuel rocket engines are difficult to 
maintain and use, the Navy requested the development of a low 
maintenance, compact, multi-mission, solid fuel anti-ship 
missile to enhance our combat capability. To this end, China 
began its development of a multi-mission anti-ship missile 
beginning in the late 1960s. 
<H5>  (1) Exploring the Way for the Development of a Small </H5>
Multi-Mission Anti-Ship Missile 
  In 1970, the Naval Aviation Command asked the Third Research 
Academy to develop a small supersonic missile for the Qiang-5 
torpedo bomber. Yao Shaofu et al. at the Total Assembly 
Department of the Third Research Academy initiated a preliminary 
feasibility study for the development of a small anti-ship 
missile. Director Yu Xiaohong of the Third Research Academy 
decided to organize all the resources to strengthen the 
development of a solid rocket anti-ship missile. After repeated 
validation, balancing out the requirements of the three major 
specifications, i.e., speed, range, and warhead size, and taking 
the needs of the troop and technical feasibility into 
consideration, it was determined that a multi-mission approach 
should be adopted. In terms of the development sequence, 
ship-to-ship comes first and air-to-ship follows, short range 
first and long range later. In 1973, the Third Research Academy 
submitted a small anti-ship missile development plan. In 
November 1975, the Navy held a review meeting on the overall 
design of a small anti-ship missile and the technical 
requirements of various sub-systems. In September 1977, the 
State Council and the Central Military Commission officially 
approved the small missile development plan and named it the 
YJ-8 missile. 
<H5>  (2) Preliminary Research on the YJ-8 Missile </H5>
  The YJ-8 missile is supposed to fly at an ultralow altitude 
and at a high subsonic speed. Moreover, it must have a certain 
range. It is necessary to develop a low-thrust, 
long-operating-time cruising engine. Back then, although China 
had some experience in the development of solid rocket engines, 
there was nothing of this caliber. There was nothing like this 
in the open literature abroad. A technical breakthrough in the 
operating time of the solid rocket engine was a key issue in the 
development of the YJ-8. In 1970, a group led by Ding Zhenzong 
[0002 2182 1350], Zheng Bingsen [6774 3521 2773] and Chang 
Jingji [1603 2417 1015] was formed to develop the solid rocket 
engine at the Third Research Academy. With a weak technical 
foundation and lack of information, they picked up knowledge as 
they went on. They found help from a variety of places, 
including the 508 Institute, Second Department and the Fourth 
Department of the 7th Ministry of Machine Building, the 845 
Plant of the 5th Ministry of Machine Building, the Northwest 
Rubber Research Institute and the Beijing Steel and Iron 
Research Institute. After numerous experiments, technical 
hurdles went down one by one. In October 1973, the first 
long-operating-time solid rocket engine was developed and 
underwent ground test. They summarized their experience and 
continued to make improvements by adjusting parameters. After 5 
years of hard work, a breakthrough in long-nozzle engine 
technology was made. 
  In the second half of 1977, the Third Research Academy 
formed 
a solid rocket engine laboratory. The development team was 
fortified and a test platform was constructed. After repeated 
tests, key technical problems such as the melting of the long 
nozzle and excessive ignition delay were also resolved. 
Propellant packaging technique was improved by tightening the 
procedure and strengthening the quality control in order to 
stabilize the pressure and thrust of the rocket engine. The 
development of this low-thrust, long-operating-time solid rocket 
engine was smoothly completed. 
  The advanced research on the high speed composite propellant 
booster was done by the 31st Institute of the Third Research 
Academy. A team led by Qiu Shanchang [6726 0810 2490] was in 
charge of concept validation. A high density charge design by 
wall casting with a star-shaped hole in the center was adopted. 
Nevertheless, during the prototype development stage, explosions 
that occurred in the production of the high-speed thiokol 
propellant forced them to abandon the approach. They then 
decided to use the high-speed butyl hydroxy composite propellant 
that was still under development in the laboratory. With the 
cooperation of the technical staff and workers at the 7013 Plant 
and the Changchun Institute of Applied Chemistry, the new 
propellant was successfully developed and loaded in the 
prototype engine. In February 1978, the internal ballistic was 
found to be excellent in a ground test. This effort provided 
considerable experience in the use of the butyl hydroxyl 
propellant for tactical rocket engines. 
  The YJ-8 missile needs a small, lightweight, compact 
autopilot. In 1977, Assistant Manger Yi Sheng [2496 3932] of the 
558 Plant of the Third Research Academy organized a group of 
young technical professionals such as Song Youshan [1345 2589 
1472] to address this issue. After an in-depth survey and 
validation, they decided to abandon the conventional control 
panel and to develop a small dedicated multi-functional analog 
computer to replace a part of the circuits. In the control 
module, active electronic differentiators, integrators, 
integrated circuits and amplifiers were used to replace certain 
electromechanical devices in order to improve performance and 
reduce volume and weight. This simplified the "hardware" of the 
control panel to make its downsizing a reality. 
  In order to fly at an ultralow altitude, it is necessary to 
develop a highly accurate, sensitive radio altimeter that is 
also not susceptible to wave interference. In the early 1970s, 
the 558 Plant and 239 Plant of the Third Research Academy 
simultaneously received the assignment to develop such a radio 
altimeter. A solid state FMCW radio altimeter and a solid state 
constant-beat servo slope radio altimeter were developed by 
respective parties. They were both capable of controlling the 
missile skimming over water surface. 
  In order to reduce the volume and weight of the control 
panel, and to overcome the deficiencies of the electric rudder 
and hydraulic (or pneumatic) servo motor, the 558 Plant 
successfully developed an indirect electric servo-mechanism -- 
the magnetic powder clutch rudder. This rudder structure is 
simple. It not only serves as a rudder but also is a part of the 
missile. It plays an important role in the downsizing and weight 
reduction of the control panel. 
  Developing a highly effective, small terminal guidance radar 
is a major technical issue in order to meet tactical 
requirements of the missile, as well as to reduce its volume and 
weight. Associate Director Tang Guofu [0781 0948 1381] and his 
technical staff at the 239th Institute of Radar Research broke 
away from the conventional structure and adopted an integrated 
design to make the radome and the radar an integral section of 
the missile body. The space available is fully utilized. All the 
radar components are rigidly fastened to the missile without the 
use of any shock-proof device. Its weight is approximately 
one-half that of a conventional radar. Furthermore, it solved 
the electrical inductance problem associated with the fact that 
the entire terminal guidance radar is installed inside the 
missile. In the area of interference resistance, technical 
breakthroughs were also made. Effective ways were found to 
improve resistance against clutter, range drag, shared-frequency 
asynchronous and other active interference and passive wave 
interference. After years of hard work and repeated testing, a 
fully transistorized, structurally integrated, monopulse, 
interference-resistant, single plane active terminal guidance 
radar was successfully developed. Its major tactical 
specifications are at advanced 1970 world-class level. 
  The YJ-8 employs a semi-armor-piercing warhead and a novel 
electrical delay fuse. This warhead penetrates a ship with its 
kinetic energy and then explodes. Its over-pressure effect is 
much larger than that of an external explosion. This enhances 
the power of a small missile despite a substantial reduction in 
weight and volume as a result of downsizing the missile. In 
September 1978, the Design Department of the Third Research 
Academy asked the 5013 Plant to develop this novel warhead. The 
Third Line Base Factory of the Third Research Academy was asked 
to develop the electromechanical delay fuse. In order to perfect 
the warhead design, the 5013 Plant conducted charge loading 
experiment, simulated warhead armor piercing experiment, 
environmental test, warhead static ground explosion test, and 
warhead-fuse combination static ground explosion test. The 
results obtained were found to meet our tactical requirements. 
In order to meet the technical requirements that two different 
points inside the warhead must be ignited within a few 
microseconds, the Third Line Base Factory of the Third Research 
Academy successfully developed a delay trigger fuse that has 
three independent levels of safety under the direction of Chief 
Designer Li Yinshan [2621 0603 1472]. The power of the warhead 
and the delay time of the fuse were found to meet our tactical 
requirements after a dynamic armor piercing test of the 
warhead/fuse assembly. 
<H5>  (3) Development of the YJ-8 Missile </H5>
  After the State Council and the Central Military Commission 
approved the YJ-8, the Third Research Academy began full-scale 
development work. In August 1978, the Navy, the 3rd Ministry of 
Machine Building and the 8th Bureau of Machine Building jointly 
reviewed the scheme for the weapon system involving using Q-5 
torpedo bombers to carry YJ-8 missiles and the specific plan for 
the missile. Technical coordination between the missile and the 
bomber was also made. Furthermore, the 239 Plant of the Third 
Research Academy was assigned as the main assembly plant for the 
missile. Various plants and institutes were given the 
assignments for the assembly of different subassemblies. 
  The design and validation of the YJ-8 was done under the 
direction of Wang Zuquan [3769 4371 0356], Assistant Chief of 
the Design Department of the Third Research Academy. In order to 
achieve high subsonic, ultralow altitude flight over water, a 
two-stage solid rocket engine with an "automatic control" and 
"self-guiding" guidance system was chosen. A small autopilot 
using a dedicated analog computer as its core component, a 
high-accuracy radio altimeter, a digital timer and an 
interference resistant monopulse terminal guidance radar were 
also employed. The warhead is of the semi-armor-piercing type 
with an electromechanical delay fuse. The launching device is a 
storage, transport, and launch container. 
  In 1978, the Third Research Academy reinstated the model 
design system. Bao Keming [7637 0344 494], Lu Shiguang and Yao 
Shaofu acted as chief designers of YJ-8 at different times to 
further strengthen the technical leadership of its development 
effort. 
  Since it undertook the YJ-8 project, the 239 Plant as a 
whole 
worked very hard to modify existing facilities to build a 
prototype production and assembly line. This effort not only 
saved a great deal of money but also took full advantage of the 
potential of an existing plant to assemble prototype missiles. 
Consequently, it accelerated the progress of YJ-8. After a 
2-year effort, it overcame technical difficulties associated 
with the construction of the wing, casting of the projectile 
body and testing of the full assembly. With excellent 
coordination among the primary and secondary development units, 
the first YJ-8 was completed in 1978. 
  Development stage flight tests of the missile were all 
conducted from the coast. Upon the successful launch of two 
missiles in 1978, it was decided to begin directly testing 
automatic control missiles. From November 1979 to November 1980, 
seven automatic control missiles were launched. With the 
exception of one failure due to booster ignition circuit 
malfunction, the others were a success. These tests not only 
validated the design concept but also verified the accuracy of 
the automatic control of the missile. In 1981, test flights took 
place for development purposes to evaluate the behavior of the 
entire weapon system, the safety and reliability of its launch, 
the coordination of various sub-systems, its guidance program, 
trajectory, and accuracy. In this test, five missiles were 
launched. Although the test was a success, it exposed a number 
of technical and quality issues such as inadequate missile 
rigidity, poor reliability of the booster fuse, loosening of the 
separation plug and the burning through of the booster. 
Superiors from the Ministry of Aerospace Industry, including 
Zheng Tianxiang [6774 1131 4382] and Lin Shuang [2651 3642], 
instructed the Third Research Academy to conduct a thorough 
search to pinpoint such quality and management problems by 
summarizing the experience of the YJ-8 test flight. To this end, 
the Third Research Academy underwent a quality reorganization. A 
comprehensive technical responsibility system was established 
and quality control regulations were revised. Problems surfaced 
in the development of the missile were solved one by one. A 
series of stringent and effective quality control tests, 
centered around the final assembly plant, was implemented to 
ensure the proper preparation for the design finalization test. 
  After successful launches of model and self-guidance YJ-8 
missiles, the design of its carrier Q-5 torpedo bomber was not 
ready. In order not to adversely affect the progress of the YJ-8 
weapon system, the 8th Ministry of Machine Building and the Navy 
agreed to test the YJ-8 on the Model 24 fast missile boats. In 
August 1981, the Office of Chief of Staff and the National 
Defense Office jointly approved the fast missile boats as the 
carriers for the YJ-8 and began the validation of the weapon 
system. The 8th Ministry of Machine Building and the Navy 
reviewed plans for the missile system and the modification of 
the boat. The 701st Institute of the 7th Ministry of Machine 
Building was in charge of the modification of the boats and 
related technical issues. In October 1982, the National Defense 
Science, Technology &amp; Industry Commission officially issued 
the 
assignment to retrofit the boats with YJ-8 missiles. 
  Based on the strategic and tactical requirements described 
in 
the order, the Third Research Academy initiated work to modify 
the missile and to develop a weapon system for the boats. Before 
the end of 1984, four missiles were successfully launched from 
the boats to evaluate the performance and coordination of the 
onboard weapon system. During this period, a meeting was held to 
prepare for the YJ-8 design finalization test. Technical 
conditions for finalizing the design of the missile were defined 
and a test outline was approved. All units began to prepare for 
the test to finalize its design according to this outline. At 
the Third Research Academy, its technical staff, workers, and 
leading officials worked hard night and day in order to speed up 
the development of the YJ-8. They pinpointed causes and 
eliminated problems to overcome numerous hurdles. Despite 
suffering from cancer, Assistant Manager Shi Fenglou [0670 7364 
2869] of the 239th Plant still insisted on conducting tests 
himself to set an example until the day he died. 
<H5>  (4) Development of YJ-8 Fire-Control System </H5>
  The design of the YJ-8 is such that it can either be carried 
by an aircraft or be launched from a vessel or a submarine on 
the surface. Nevertheless, a different fire control system is 
required when the carrier is different. The fire control system 
to be installed on the Model 24 boat had to be reliable yet had 
to be developed in a short period of time with limited funds. 
The command panel was the center of the control system. It was 
also a key piece of equipment for the Model 24 boat. On the 
basis of the existing electromechanical command panel, the 
design department of the Third Research Academy modified certain 
parts of the equipment. After going through a series of 
environmental tests, the command panel was successfully modified 
in time for installation on the boat. 
  The storage and transport container is an important 
component 
of the weapon system. By studying a variety of technical issues 
such as load, structural strength, storage conditions, control 
technology and rigidity coordination between the missile and the 
storage container, the 359th Institute of the Third Research 
Academy solved a number of problems, such as the exhaust of and 
protection from the combustion gas when the missile was launched 
from the container, transition from transport and launch 
attitude, and safety and reliability of the launch, to ensure 
the launch attitude and an excellent environment for missile 
transport. During the development process, Technical Director Lu 
Zuochen [0712 1563 5256] and his technical staff and workers of 
the institute worked as a team to improve the design and conduct 
repeated tests. It was the first storage and transport container 
successfully developed in China. 
  The main task to retrofit the boat was to remove the 
existing 
launch device and to replace it with the storage and transport 
container and support for the YJ-8, to install the necessary 
cable and equipment, and to inspect and repair the boat. Under 
the coordinated effort of the 4805 Plant, the 701st Institute of 
the Seventh Research Academy and the Third Research Academy, the 
boat was successfully retrofitted in 1982. After several launch 
tests, the plan to equip the Model 24 boat with YJ-8 missiles 
was found to be correct and all strategic and tactical 
specifications were met. 
<H5>  (5) Design Finalization Tests of the YJ-8 Missile </H5>
  In October and November 1984, design finalization tests of 
the YJ-8 installed on the Model 24 boat were conducted on water 
at the Liaoxi Missile Test Range. While the first missile hit 
the target, the fuse malfunctioned. The two missiles that 
followed fell in the water short of the target due to equipment 
failure on the missile. The test was temporarily halted pending 
an analysis of the cause. The failure analysis and proposed 
corrective measures received a great deal of attention from the 
National Defense Science, Technology &amp; Industry Commission. 
Commissioner Chen Bin [7115 1755] and Associate Commissioners 
Zou Jiahua [6760 1367 5478] and Nie Li [5119 0500] raise 
specific requirements. Science and Technology Commission Vice 
Minister Xie Guang [6200 0342] attended the failure analysis 
meeting at the Third Research Academy to find causes and failed 
components. Technicians at the Liaoxi Missile Test Range, such 
as Jia Jiali [6328 1367 3829] and Gu Xixia [7357 1585 7209], 
believed that poor component reliability and damage to control 
elements due to hostile operating environment were responsible 
for the failure. In addition, the overall missile design had to 
be thoroughly examined. They also made certain recommendations 
concerning the primary control algorithm. Since then, by way of 
modification and testing, five major improvements have been made 
to reduce vibration and eliminate potential interfering factors 
during stage separation. In April and May 1985, the modified 
YJ-8 missile was test-launched from a surfaced submarine at the 
Liaoxi Missile Test Range. The result showed that the 
improvements made were correct and the test was a success. 
  In September 1985, the design finalization test for the YJ-8 
on the Model 24 boat was reorganized at the Liaoxi Missile Test 
Range. It was primarily to evaluate the killing power of the 
warhead at long, medium and short range and with two 
simultaneously launched missiles and the performance of the 
onboard equipment and the entire weapon system during combat. 
All relevant departments were very much concerned about the 
outcome of this test. A very thorough deployment was arranged 
from organization to protective measures. Commander Wang Huique 
[3769 1920 1952] of the Naval Test Base was often on site to 
study and resolve problems encountered in the preparation. As a 
result of the combined effort of the team organized by Chief 
Designer Yao Shaofu and Assembly Designer Liu Qingmei [0419 1987 
2812], the preparation went well. In this test, six missiles 
were launched and all were direct hits. One warhead that made a 
direct hit on the target ship, an old frigate, penetrated the 
side and then exploded. The explosion tore up a portion of the 
deck and set the ship afire for over 10 hours. It later sank 
under tow. The successful completion of the design finalization 
test of the YJ-8 marked a new chapter in missile testing 
conducted by the Navy. 
  The YJ-8 was the second generation anti-ship missile 
developed by the Chinese. It employed advanced technologies such 
as solid rocket engines and launch container. It is capable of 
flying over water at an ultralow altitude, has a strong 
penetration power and high accuracy, can be deployed for a 
number of applications and is downsized. Its major 
characteristics are comparable to those of its counterparts 
worldwide. The design of the YJ-8 was finalized in 1987 and it 
was given the special national science and technology progress 
award in 1988. 
  In order to expand the combat range of conventional 
submarines and to acquire experience in order to facilitate a 
transition to underwater launch of missiles from a submarine, 
the Navy proposed to deploy the YJ-8 on conventional submarines 
to the Chief of Staff Command and the National Defense Office as 
early as 1977. In January 1981, the request was granted. The 
design was then validated at the Third Research Academy and a 
plan for the missile system was proposed. Based on the technical 
level at the time, it decided to use a 
medium-scale-integrated-circuit computer to simultaneously 
control the firing of missiles and torpedoes. After the plan was 
approved by the Seventh Ministry of Machine Building, the Navy 
and the Sixth Ministry of Machine Building, the submarine was 
launched in 1982 as a result of the hard work put in by all 
units concerned. The submarine-based YJ-8 missile system was 
then successfully flight tested. 
  In June 1982, the Chief of Staff Command and the National 
Defense Office decided to equip frigates with the YJ-8 as a 
shipboard missile system. The frigate was built by the Hudong 
Shipyard and the development of the onboard missile system was 
the responsibility of the Third Research Academy. In 1983, 
various units proceeded with the development work. A 
microcomputer-based general-purpose command panel was employed. 
It had the capability to launch across a sector to make the 
weapon system more effective. In 1985, the weapon system was 
placed on line for testing. In September 1987, a test launch of 
the frigate-based YJ-8 missile took place. Two missiles both 
scored direct hits to successfully wrap up the test of the 
ship-based YJ-8 missile. 
  The successful development of the small multi-purpose YJ-8 
missile enabled China to create a series of second-generation 
anti-ship missiles. Its advanced performance, flexibility and 
maneuverability in combat, ease of maintenance, reliability and 
wide range of applicability made it very popular among all units 
in the field. Since then, this missile has been continuously 
improved and modified to fit a variety of ships, aircraft and 
vehicles. 
<H5>  (6) The SY-2 Solid Propellant Ship-to-Ship Missile </H5>
  The Nanchang Aircraft Company began its development of the 
SY-2 liquid propellant rocket engine ship-to-ship missile in the 
early 1970s. After a few years of effort, two telemetry missiles 
were launched on land at the Liaoxi Missile Test Range and the 
overall design of the missile was found to be rational. In 
December 1975, on the basis of the request from the Navy to 
shift the development of the SY-2 toward downsizing, ultralow 
altitude capability, and solid rocket engines, the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company began its proof of concept work on the SY-2 
solid propellant ship-to-ship missile. 
  In August 1984, the National Defense Science, Technology 
&amp; 
Industry Commission included the SY-2 solid propellant 
ship-to-ship missile in the defense technology plan for the 
Seventh 5-Year Plan. Some experience gained in the development 
of the SY-2 liquid propellant rocket engine was applied to the 
development of the SY-2 solid propellant missile. Emphasis was 
placed on theoretical calculation and ground testing to produce 
a reliable design. In order to strengthen the responsibility 
system, a designer system was established with the approval of 
the Ministry of Aerospace Industry. Peng Lisheng was the chief 
designer and Zuo Chong [1563 6850], Zhang Ju [1728 3818], and 
Wen Yukun [3306 5148 0981] were the associate chief designers. 
  The main focus in the development of the SY-2 solid 
propellant missile was to improve the missile. Its ground 
equipment, fire control system and launch pad are compatible to 
those of the SY-1 and SY-1A. The fact that the three missile 
models must share the same equipment, system, and launch pad 
makes the development work that much more difficult. The 
longitudinal guidance algorithm for the SY-2 solid propellant 
missile was redesigned. Through coordination between the radar 
and the command panel to hit a pre-determined target, its 
accuracy was improved. Redundancy was used in a portion of the 
missile and its fire control system. In terms of the booster, by 
selecting an appropriate charge, the procedure was simplified 
and the precision of the thrust axis was improved. As for the 
engine, the use of a free loading charge improved its 
reliability and storability. More explosive is packed in the 
warhead to enhance its armor-piercing capability to allow it to 
destroy heavily-armored large and medium-sized surface vessels. 
  In August 1984, the design of the overall assembly of the 
SY-2 began. In 1988, the telemetry missile test was completed. 
In June 1989, the first design finalization was conducted. The 
test was terminated by the Navy due to repeated engine failure. 
A rigorous failure analysis was conducted by the Nanchang 
Aircraft Company. It adopted 12 improvements to enhance 
reliability and environmental adaptability. In October of the 
same year, the Ministry of Aerospace Industry and the Navy 
agreed to proceed with the second design finalization test. Vice 
Minister He Wenzhi [0149 2429 3112] provided valuable opinions 
on quality and organization related to the test and arrived at 
the test site in person to inspect the preparation work. In 
December 1989, the design finalization test for the SY-2 solid 
propellant missile was completed at the Liaoxi Missile Test 
Range of the Naval Test Base with a record of 5 out 7. 
<H5>  (7) Low-Altitude Supersonic Anti-Ship Missiles </H5>
  The transition from subsonic to supersonic anti-ship 
missiles 
is a giant leap forward. To develop a low-altitude, supersonic 
anti-ship missile, it is necessary to solve the problems 
associated with a high specific impulse ram engine. 
  A ram engine is simple in structure, has a high specific 
impulse, is lightweight and has no moving parts. It is an ideal 
power source for a low-altitude supersonic anti-ship missile. As 
early as April 1965, Qian Xuesen and Liang Shoupan suggested the 
development of a ram engine. Based on this suggestion, the 31st 
Institute of the Third Research Academy conducted some advanced 
research on a ram engine for an anti-ship missile. After 
repeated investigations and numerous ground tests over many 
years, technical issues such as low-temperature start-up, 
matching the pre-combustion chamber to the combustion chamber, 
combustion oscillation, melting of the flame stabilizer and 
matching the fuel supply system to the engine, were resolved. In 
1969, under the direction of Bao Keming and Liu Xingzhou [0491 
5281 3166], a ram engine was developed using the results of 
advanced research. They conducted over 600 ground tests to 
overcome technical hurdles to finalize the design for ground 
tests. Then, a series of products was developed to serve as ram 
engines for a variety of supersonic flying vehicles with 
different requirements. 
  In September 1971, the Navy approved the development of a 
ram 
engine for a low-altitude supersonic missile. This missile had a 
two-stage power device. The first stage consisted of two 
parallel solid propellant booster rockets. The second stage 
consisted of two ram engines on either side of the missile body. 
A small monopulse terminal guidance radar with excellent 
interference resistance was installed on board. The control 
system included both automatic control and self-guidance. The 
missile had a number of unique characteristics such as low 
altitude, supersonic speeds, high penetration capability, small 
size, light weight, strong hitting power, low cost, and a wide 
range of carriers. 
  This low-altitude supersonic missile was developed without 
much prior experience and without sufficient advanced research. 
It was also adversely affected by the "Cultural Revolution." The 
work was interrupted several times. Tests of automatic control 
missiles began in 1978. The two ram engines were successfully 
ignited in mid-air simultaneously. However, we encountered 
problems such as deviation from course and large pitch angle. 
Chief Designer Shen Shijin [3088 0013 6930] and Associate Chief 
Designer Huang Ruisong [7806 3843 2646] went to the test site to 
solve a large number of problems with the technical staff. For 
instance, a closed-loop radio altimeter was chosen to stabilize 
the flight of the missile at the same altitude. The unique 
patterns associated with a supersonic vehicle became known as a 
result of the tests. Furthermore, a great deal of work was done 
to perfect the aerodynamic profile, improve its structure and 
raise its reliability. The self-guidance missile test conducted 
in 1985 was essentially a success. In addition, the terminal 
guidance radar -- a weak link at supersonic speeds -- was 
replaced with a mono-planar terminal guidance radar. This was 
followed by two additional tests launched from land. Both 
resulted in direct hits. Thus, the ground test phase was 
successfully completed. This demonstrated that China had the 
technology needed to develop low-altitude, supersonic anti-ship 
missiles and had begun to apply it to develop both ship-based 
and airborne supersonic anti-ship missiles. 
  Since the late 1950s, China has successfully developed a 
variety of ship-to-ship, shore-to-ship and air-to-ship missiles 
and established a research, test, and production system for 
anti-ship missiles. A highly capable and experienced technical 
team has been established. In the development of anti-ship 
missiles, China has developed a way that combines research, 
design, prototype construction, testing and production of a 
specific series of missile. China will make full use of its 
experience, pick its own targets, keep track of key 
technological advances worldwide and develop a series of 
multi-purpose anti-ship missiles that meet its own needs. 
<H5>  Chapter XX. Naval Vessels </H5>
  The warship is the major weapon to execute combat and 
protection missions either on water or under water. It includes 
a variety of vessels such as the submarine, destroyer, frigate, 
torpedo boat, missile boat, subchaser and auxiliary vessels. The 
development of the modern warship and its weapons is highly 
sophisticated and complex in nature and is a large-scale system 
engineering undertaking. 
  Since the founding of the People's Republic of China, owing 
to the concern of the Chinese Communist Party Central, the State 
Council, and the Central Military Commission and the hard work 
over a period of four decades, a relatively comprehensive 
development and production system has been established for the 
development of naval vessels and weapons. It followed a path 
starting from manufacturing transfer, duplication, improvement 
and gradually to independent development. Finally, technical 
breakthroughs were made to provide significant contributions to 
the construction of naval equipment. 
<H5>  Section 1. Overview </H5>
<H5>  (1) From Manufacturing, Transfer, and a Preliminary </H5>
Foundation 
  In August 1950, the Navy presented a plan to rapidly build 
up 
a light combat force that was focused on naval aviation, 
submarines and torpedo boats, and then establish other services. 
To build naval vessels, the Ministry of Heavy Industry 
established the Bureau of Shipbuilding Industry in Shanghai. At 
the same time, the Navy also established its own shipbuilding 
department to oversee the repair and building of all naval 
vessels. On the basis of the technical assistance agreement 
signed by China and the USSR in June 1953, it also began the 
manufacturing transfer of five different types of vessels. 
  In 1954, the Bureau of Shipbuilding Industry Management 
established a branch office of ship design in Shanghai (it was 
renamed the First Prototype Ship Product Design Office in 1955). 
Xin Wei [6580 3837] was the office director and Li Siyao [2621 
0843 1031] was the chief engineer. This office was in charge of 
all technical issues associated with the manufacturing transfer 
of a frigate, a medium torpedo submarine, a mine sweeper, a 
large subchaser and a torpedo boat from the USSR. It was 
responsible for handling all problems encountered in production. 
In addition, the Bureau of Shipbuilding Industry Management was 
also responsible for the renovation and expansion of the six 
yards and two work sites engaged in the production of those five 
types of vessels. From 1955 to 1959, under the direction of 
Russian advisors, these yards assembled over 100 vessels. The 
manufacturing transfer of these five types helped China's 
shipbuilding industry train technical people, renovate its major 
shipyards, and lay a preliminary foundation for the development 
of military vessels. 
  Parallel to our effort to assemble Soviet vessels, we also 
began to organize research institutions and testing facilities 
for shipbuilding in order to meet future needs of the Navy. In 
1954, the First Ministry of Machine Building established the 
Ship Model Institute to be led by Xin Yixin [6580 0001 1800] and 
Fang Wenjun [2455 2429 0971]. In 1957, it was expanded to become 
the Institute of Ship Science under the First Ministry of 
Machine Building and the Ministry of Transportation. In 1958, 
the First Ministry of Machine Building established four research 
institutes including the Ship Design Institute and Ship Steam 
Turbine Institute. Jia Shengde [6328 4141 1795] was the deputy 
director of the Ship Design Institute and Sa Benxin [5646 2609 
1823] was its chief engineer. After 1958 the Navy established 
four research institutes for shipbuilding, surface weapon, 
sonar, and navigation. In 1959, the Navy established the 
Department of Science and Technology to direct all research 
activities associated with naval vessels and weapons. Yu 
Xiaohong [0060 4562 5725] was the department head and Jiang Yong 
[3068 0516] was its political commissar. Shipbuilding 
departments and naval weapon special fields were also 
established at higher learning institutions and military 
engineering institutes in Shanghai, Dalian, Xian, and Wuhan to 
provide professional training. 
  On 4 February 1959, China and the USSR signed the "Agreement 
To Assist the People's Republic of China To Manufacture Naval 
Vessels in China" (or the "February 4th Agreement"). The 
agreement allowed China to pay for the transfer of complete sets 
of technical drawings and data and the rights to manufacture 
certain equipment associated with a conventional missile 
submarine, an improved conventional submarine and two models of 
missile boats, as well as drawings and information needed to 
duplicate a hydrofoil torpedo boat and its weapon system. In 
order to grasp shipboard missile technology, in a report to the 
Central Military Commission, the Naval Party Committee proposed 
a policy to continuously upgrade conventional equipment with 
missiles and to focus on the development of submarines and other 
medium- and small-sized vessels. This clarified the direction of 
naval weapons development and accelerated the transition from 
imitation to independent development. In 1960, the Bureau of 
Shipbuilding Management was placed under the jurisdiction of the 
Third Ministry of Machine Building. The military vessel design 
laboratory of the Ship Design Institute was expanded into seven 
laboratories, and included subjects such as torpedo and 
navigation instrumentation. Furthermore, it began to construct a 
large ship model hydrodynamics test base at Wuxi to lay down a 
solid foundation for future technical work in shipbuilding. 
<H5>  (2) Successful Development of First Generation of Naval </H5>
Vessels, Weaponry, and Equipment 
  In August 1960, just as shipyards and factories were geared 
up for the production of the five vessel types and associated 
weaponry covered by the "February 4th Agreement," the Soviet 
advisors were withdrawn by their government, cutting off 
technical support and equipment supply. China was determined to 
establish its own research institutions to build its own ship 
technology and industry in order to independently develop its 
own naval vessels and weapons. In June 1961, the Chinese 
Communist Party Central approved the establishment of the 
Academy of Ship Research (the 7th Research Academy of the 
Ministry of National Defense, or the 7th Research Academy), 
based on the resources in the field of ship research and design 
at the 1st and 3rd Ministry of Machine Building and the Navy, to 
be responsible for the research and design of naval vessels, 
weapons and equipment and for solving technical issues 
encountered. Since the founding of the 7th Research Academy, a 
variety of institutes for total ship assembly, principles and 
performance, main machinery, auxiliary engines, nuclear 
submarines and weapons and equipment, as well as an overall 
design validation department, were created. In 1963, after the 
6th Ministry of Machine Building was created, research 
institutes for shipbuilding, engine construction, 
instrumentation, techniques and standards, and intelligence were 
established. The establishment of these research institutions 
and the construction of a number of large-scale test basins, 
laboratories and test facilities in the 1960s further provided 
the necessary conditions to permit China to produce those 
imitated ships and to develop naval vessels and weaponry 
independently. The 7th Research Academy concentrated 79 percent 
of its technical resources to work closely with factories to 
complete the assembly and imitation of torpedo boats, missile 
boats, missile submarines, and weapons such as torpedoes with 
domestic materials and production equipment. By the late 1960s, 
China was producing conventional submarines, torpedoes, and 
missile boats with domestic materials and equipment. Moreover, 
it also developed a number of mines, depth charges, shipboard 
guns and mine sweeping equipment. It independently designed 
several surface vessels, including an anti-submarine frigate. 
  In the mid-1960s, the 7th Research Academy of the 6th 
Ministry of Machine Building began to develop a number of 
first-generation vessels including a nuclear powered submarine, 
a long-range survey ship, a missile destroyer, a missile frigate 
and a medium torpedo submarine. It also began to develop a 
variety of weapons such as the self-guided torpedo, modern 
mines, rocket depth charges and shipboard guns. In order to meet 
the needs in the development of our own first-generation 
vessels, the government support the 7th Research Academy to 
continue its control over ship-related research. By the end of 
the 1970s, a complete system ranging from research, design and 
production, from total ship assembly to materials, equipment and 
weaponry, from testing to maintenance, together with a 
nationwide collaboration network, was built up to essentially 
complete the development of the first generation of vessels and 
weapons. 
<H5>  (3) Creating a New Stage for Naval Vessel Development </H5>
  In the early 1980s, in accordance with the national defense 
plan, the 6th Ministry of Machine Building arranged the 
development of all naval vessels and weapons. It insisted on 
sticking to the policy of shortening the development cycle, 
focusing on key programs, stressing research, and accelerating 
renovation. It started by improving the tactical performance of 
existing vessels and weaponry and then shifted the focus to the 
development of a new generation of highly automated vessels and 
weapons that are more resistant to air, submarine and missile 
attack and electronic warfare. It took full advantage of the 
open door opportunity to import the necessary technology to 
strengthen our advanced research activities in order to sustain 
our continuous development work. By the late 1980s, as the China 
Shipbuilding Industry Corporation completed the development and 
modification of the entire first generation of naval vessels and 
equipment, it began to organize the development of the second 
generation of vessels and weapons, proceeded with the testing of 
conventional and nuclear-powered submarines, and finished the 
major retrofitting of the "Wangyuan," a survey ship. This marked 
a new stage for the development of naval vessels and weaponry. 
<H5>  Section 2. Conventional Submarines </H5>
  A conventional submarine is a vessel powered by diesel 
engines and a series of batteries, that can move and fight under 
water. It can be well concealed, is able to launch a powerful 
surprise attack, is relatively self-sufficient and has a long 
cruising range. It is capable of conducting combat activities 
independently at sea for an extended period of time. It is a 
major combat vessel in the Chinese Navy. 
<H5>  (1) Manufacturing Transfer and Improvement of Conventional </H5>
Submarines 
  In 1953, manufacturing transfer of medium-size conventional 
Soviet submarines began at the Jiangnan and Wuchang shipyards, 
respectively. Work on the first submarine began in April 1954 at 
Jiangnan and it was launched in March 1956. In October 1957, the 
job was completed. Through this manufacturing transfer, our 
shipbuilding technology was advanced, a submarine production 
line was established, a technical staff and workers were 
trained, and organization and management experience was gained. 
It was the beginning of submarine production in China. 
  In 1959, China began to produce an improved medium-size 
conventional submarine and a conventional missile-carrying 
submarine transferred from the USSR. In order to speed up the 
process enabling the manufacture of these submarines 
domestically, particular attention was paid to the design 
drawings and information concerning major equipment on board the 
submarine. The importation of equipment and materials was 
minimized. Anything that could be built in China was no longer 
purchased abroad. After the USSR pulled its advisors and 
terminated its aid, China decided to compress other existing 
naval equipment development programs and concentrate its 
resources on the construction of these two submarines. 
Medium-sized conventional submarines were being built at the 
Jiangnan and Wuchang shipyards. The first submarine was 
completed in December 1965 at Jiangnan. Later, it was produced 
at the Huangpu and Peiling shipyards and became the largest 
number submarine model ever built in China. The conventional 
missile-carrying submarine built by the Dalian Shipyard was 
completed in August 1966. 
  Because the material and equipment provided by the USSR 
became even more incomplete with time, domestic materials and 
equipment were needed to build these submarines. To this end, as 
it organized the construction of the two submarines, the 
government also took charge of the production of the necessary 
materials and equipment to make sure that the need in subsequent 
submarine production could be met. In addition, major technical 
issues such as the welding of special steel, propeller 
cavitation erosion, and reinforcement of the hull structure were 
also resolved. By the early 1970s, the manufacturing transfer of 
the two submarines was successfully completed and all the 
onboard equipment and materials were produced domestically. 
Furthermore, there were improvements on items such as the 
missile launcher and air conditioning and refrigeration capacity 
on board conventional submarines. In 1976, under the leadership 
of Li Jianqiu [2621 1696 3808] and Yang Huansheng [2799 3562 
3932] of the 701st Research Institute, conventional submarines 
were redesigned to accommodate anti-ship missiles. Feng Longyun 
[7458 7893 0061] was in charge of the design of 
pressure-resistant missile storage containers. Modification of 
the launcher began at the Wuchang Shipyard in 1980. In 1985, 
missiles were successfully launched from submarines at sea. 
Since the mid-1980s, development personnel have lowered the 
noise level inside this model submarine by as much as 12 dB 
relative to its original level. This increased its 
concealability and expanded the effective range of its sonar. 
<H5>  (2) Independent Development of Conventional Submarines </H5>
  In 1967, the Central Military Commission approved the 
development of the first-generation medium-sized conventional 
torpedo-carrying submarine. The Navy imposed higher tactical 
technical specifications. The underwater speed was increased by 
40 percent relative to that of the duplicated Soviet submarine. 
Hence, the guiding principle in the development of the 
first-generation medium-sized conventional submarine was to make 
breakthroughs in key technical areas such as underwater speed 
based on the experience acquired in the duplication and 
improvement process and on our existing technology base. Under 
the leadership of Zhang Nanru [1728 0589 1172], Yang Huansheng 
and Li Lianyou [2621 6647 2589], the 701st Research Institute 
that was in charge of the design of this medium-sized 
conventional submarine consistently gave priority to ensuring 
and improving its underwater navigation characteristics. First, 
the profile of the submarine was improved to reduce drag. On the 
basis of a great deal of experimental work done at the 702nd 
Research Institute, a straight bow and sharp stern profiles were 
adopted, the aspect ratio of the submarine was adjusted, the 
valves and pipes on the upper deck were rearranged to reduce the 
size and width of the deck, and the shape and layout of the 
water holes were improved to minimize drag. Next, a high-power 
electric motor and its corresponding controls were designed by 
the 712th Research Institute and manufactured by Xiantan 
Electric Motor Factory. A medium-speed diesel engine built by 
the Shanxi Diesel Engine Factory was selected. Furthermore, the 
number of sets of batteries was increased to four to increase 
the output of the underwater power supply. In addition, a 
high-efficiency propeller was designed. Because these measures 
were taken in the overall design, with minimal increase in 
displacement as compared to that of the duplicated Soviet 
submarine, the new design doubled its underwater propulsion and 
battery storage capacity to ensure the speed of the submarine. 
  The first-generation medium-size conventional submarine was 
built at the Wuchang Shipyard. Under the leadership of Wei Xumin 
[7614 4872 3046], the construction of the first vessel began in 
October 1969. It was launched in July 1971 and was delivered in 
April 1974. The first vessel built at Jiangnan Shipyard was 
completed in November 1974. Afterward, Wuchang made design 
modifications to the second submarine based on problems 
encountered during the shakedown cruise of the first submarine. 
It significantly improved the performance of the second 
submarine. In December 1983, this independently developed 
first-generation conventional torpedo-carrying submarine was 
appraised at the national level. Its speed, maneuverability, 
seaworthiness, submerged cruising radius and submerged noise 
level were found to be considerably better than those of the 
improved model of the duplicated medium-size conventional 
torpedo submarine. The equipment on board was found to be 
essentially stable and reliable. 
  In order to meet the challenge of modern warfare, the 719th 
Research Institute again began to develop a new generation of 
conventional submarines. New technology was adopted to develop a 
more advanced wire-guided torpedo, a new torpedo launcher, and 
digital sonar and display equipment. 
  In addition, to meet sea rescue requirements, a 30-ton 
deep-sea rescue submarine was jointly developed by Wuchang 
Shipyard, Harbin Institute of Shipbuilding, Shanghai Jiaotong 
University, Central China Institute of Engineering and the Naval 
Institute of Medicine in the early 1970s. In 1980, the first 
vessel was launched at Wuchang Shipyard. It underwent five 
trials to conduct a variety of tests, including underwater 
docking dry rescue, open compartment wet rescue and great depth 
diving. The rescue submarine was found to meet all design 
specifications and is capable of performing a level-3 rescue 
mission. It filled a void in deep-sea rescue for China. 
<H5>  Section 3. Surface Ships </H5>
  Surface ships are an important part of naval vessels and 
weaponry. China primarily developed destroyers, frigates, 
subchasers, torpedo and missile boats, mine warfare vessels, and 
landing craft. 
<H5>  (1) Destroyers </H5>
  A destroyer is a powerful surface striking force, has a long 
cruising radius, and has substantial anti-submarine and 
anti-aircraft capability. Its primary mission is to attack enemy 
submarines and surface vessels, to support landing troops, and 
to provide escort. 
  (i) Development of the first-generation missile destroyer 
  The 7th Research Academy began to investigate the overall 
design of and to conduct advanced research on a missile 
destroyer in the late 1950s. In the mid 1960s, in order to 
provide escort and protection for ICBM testing over water, the 
Central Military Commission approved the development of the 
first-generation missile destroyer. The 701st Institute of the 
7th Research Academy was responsible for its overall design. Li 
Fuli [2621 1788 4409] and Pan Jinfu [3382 6975 5346] were in 
charge of the design work. A plan was chosen after validation, 
advanced research, and preliminary design. Its standard 
displacement is over 3,000 tons. A high-performance steam engine 
was selected. Its main weapons systems include two triple 
ship-to-ship missile launchers, 130mm and 57mm guns, and two 
rocket depth charge launchers with 12 tubes each. It was also 
equipped with a variety of observation and command and control 
equipment such as sonar, radar, and communications and 
navigation systems. 
  In June 1967, the State Planning Commission, the National 
Defense Office, and the National Defense Science Commission 
reviewed and approved the technical design for the 
first-generation missile destroyer. Construction design and 
equipment development ensued immediately after the plan was 
approved. In 1968, the construction of the first prototype ship 
began at Dalian Shipyard. Factories and research institutions 
under the jurisdiction of 22 provinces and cities and industrial 
ministries were involved in the supply of 732 items and 1,240 
pieces of equipment, including the development of over 110 
pieces of new equipment. Building a missile destroyer is a 
highly complex system engineering project. During the ship 
construction and equipment development, our personnel worked 
very hard to overcome numerous technical hurdles. 
  Solving onboard missile problems. 
  Several studies were conducted by the 701st Institute, 713th 
Institute and the Third Research Academy of the 7th Ministry of 
Machine Building to demonstrate the feasibility of mounting 
missiles on the ship. In December 1968, the research and design 
department, in conjunction with Dalian Shipyard, temporarily 
installed ship-to-ship missiles on an active destroyer to 
conduct a variety of tests to measure important factors such as 
missile attitude, surface noise spectrum, combustion gas flow 
pressure field, surface structure stress and ship movement. The 
data and experience obtained provided first-hand information to 
solve problems associated with mounting ship-to-ship missiles. 
The development department also did a great deal of work on the 
missile launcher. Based on Navy requirements and by comparing 
various schemes, a triangular triple launcher was selected. The 
missiles were to be directly loaded by crane. Xie Xianzheng 
[6200 2009 4545] and Yao Yuecong [1202 6460 3222] of the 713th 
Institute were responsible for its design. Furthermore, it broke 
from the tradition of separating the launcher from the loading 
device and adopted a design that is compact, easy to operate, 
and quick to reload. By way of the research and testing 
activities described above, key technical issues associated with 
installing missiles on board were also smoothly resolved. 
  The first prototype ship was delivered to the Navy by Dalian 
Shipyard in December 1971. In September 1973, the first missile 
flight test was conducted at the Naval Test Base. Both single 
and double missile launches were successful. In the mid-1970s, 
the destroyer missile launcher design was appraised by the Navy 
and the 6th Ministry of Machine Building after which it was 
modified based on Navy requirements. The missile storage 
environment and operating conditions were improved. It was made 
more adaptable to rough seas and more resistant to nuclear 
explosion. 
  Improvement of main boiler air intake and smoke exhaust. 
  The first-generation missile destroyer was fitted with two 
high-power steam turbines, four boilers, 18 auxiliary steam 
engines and 27 auxiliary electric motors. It was a difficult 
task to lay them out rationally in a crowded engine room and 
make them work in harmony. The initial air intake design had too 
much resistance and the blowers for the two turbines were too 
close to supply enough air to the boilers. The 20 fuel injectors 
could not burn completely. Hence, the main engine could not 
reach its rated maximum rpm and that affected the cruising 
speed. Despite numerous modifications made by technical staff at 
the Dalian and Zhonghua shipyards, the problem was not 
fundamentally solved. With the cooperation of Zhonghua Shipyard 
and Hangzhou Steam Turbine Factory, the 701st Institute 
fabricated several air duct models to conduct resistance tests. 
The diversion cap profile and blower spacing were altered to 
minimize vortex loss. Ideal results were obtained through wind 
tunnel tests. Then, tests were conducted at the blower factory 
using the actual duct to optimize the design. It solved the 
problem that both blowers are fighting for the same air to 
enable all fuel injectors to burn completely. The cruising speed 
of the ship also met design specifications. 
  Development of new acoustic and radar equipment. 
  The first-generation missile destroyer was equipped with a 
variety of special electronic devices. The technical staff at 
the 706 Institute, the 726 Plant and the 461 Plant jointly 
developed the SJD-11 long-range spherical nose bow detector 
sonar and the SJD-4 attack sonar. Eleven large-scale tests were 
done on the SJD-11 sonar. In 1971, in actual shipboard tests, 
this sonar was capable of effectively picking up enemy 
submarines in poor hydrological conditions at 18 knots. The 
coordinated action of the sonar, the rocket depth charge 
launcher and the command panel can execute the mission of 
searching for and attacking enemy submarines. After over a 
decade of effort, the 724th Institute of the 7th Research 
Academy made a breakthrough in dual beam planar array antenna 
and solid state forward wave transmitter technology. Using a 
computer-driven frequency agile and digital moving target 
display system, a new three-axis phase scanning air alert radar 
was developed. This radar had advantages such as high 
interference resistance, power, high efficiency, strong signal 
adaptability, and compact structure. It was at an advanced 
domestic level and was given a first-place national science and 
technology advancement award. 
  Wave endurance test. 
  In order to further evaluate the quality of the first 
medium-sized missile destroyers built by the Dalian, Guangzhou, 
and Zhonghua shipyards, on the basis of over 200 successful 
cruising tests in the North China Sea, South China Sea and East 
China Sea conducted by their respective shipyards, a 
5-hour-20-minute wave endurance test was conducted 450 meters 
deep in rough seas east of Hainan Island and north of Xisha 
Islands in December 1975. The maximum wave at the bow was 6 
meters. The tests were conducted under a variety of conditions, 
including different angles between the wave and the heading, 
different cruising speeds, and with and without using the fin. 
In a wave test, the ship was accelerated to 28 knots for a half 
hour. The bow was never under water and the propeller never 
broke the surface. Various electrical equipment and weapons 
passed the test. This series of tests proved that the first 
prototype ships were capable of meeting all design 
specifications. 
  Upon completion of the first prototypes of the 
first-generation missile destroyer, the 6th Ministry of Machine 
Building was organizing its resources to solve remaining issues 
while preparing for the production of the ship and engaging in 
the evaluation and design finalization of certain weapon 
systems. In 1975, the production design of the ship was 
finalized. 
  (ii) Improvement of the first-generation destroyer 
  To meet the challenge in modern warfare, with the approval 
of 
the State Council and the Central Military Commission, the 
first-generation destroyer was modernized and improved in the 
early 1980s as the first step to develop a new generation of 
destroyers. In 1983, the 7th Research Academy pulled resources 
from the 701st, 709th, 716th and 724th institutes to perform 
proof-of-concept studies to improve shipboard weaponry on the 
first-generation missile destroyers. The 701st Institute was 
designated as the leading institution responsible for all major 
technical issues concerning combat systems on the destroyer. The 
plan was to base the technical specifications of various 
electronic and weapons systems on the requirements of the ship 
and its combat system. Coordination of different weapons was 
stressed. It was a change from the past practice in which 
equipment was defined first and then combat information command 
system developed later. A system engineering approach was used 
in the development of the combat information and command system. 
With the help of all parties involved, the effort to improve the 
main equipment of the combat information and command system 
began in December 1986. It was successfully linked and tested on 
land and then installed on the missile destroyers. 
  In 1987, the modified version of the first-generation 
missile 
destroyer began to be built at Dalian Shipyard. Due to the two 
major technical measures mentioned above, the weaponry and 
living quarters on board were substantially improved. In 
particular, resistance against electronic warfare is enhanced 
and degree of automation of combat command is raised. The 
modified missile destroyer was completed and delivered to the 
Navy in December 1989. 
  (iii) Developing a new generation of destroyer 
  As the 7th Research Academy was engaged in modifying the 
first-generation destroyer, it began to develop a new generation 
of missile destroyer. Prior to this, the appropriate authority 
was considering modifying the first-generation destroyer with a 
foreign nation. Due to various reasons, the arrangement fell 
through. The Central Military Commission decided to switch the 
funds earmarked for the foreign deal to the appropriate 
department for development use. The National Defense Science, 
Technology &amp; Industry Commission later laid down a 
development 
plan with the China Shipbuilding Corporation and other relevant 
organizations. The new destroyer would be equipped with an even 
more automated and more responsive combat information and 
command system. The system had the capability to process data 
and information gathered by the shipboard long-range alert 
radar, sonar, electronic surveillance devices, and friend-or-foe 
identification detector on a real-time basis. Furthermore, its 
anti-aircraft, anti-submarine, anti-missile and anti-electronic 
warfare capability would be enhanced significantly. 
<H5>  (2) Frigates </H5>
  A frigate is a medium- to small-size vessel that is 
primarily 
armed with underwater weaponry, guns, and missiles. Its primary 
missions include convoy escorting, anti-submarine warfare, 
anti-aircraft warfare, deployment of mines, patrol, alert, and 
support of landing forces. 
  In the early 1950s, the Navy established the Department of 
Ship Repair and Construction to design the 53-A coastal patrol 
boat under the direction of Chief Designer Xu Xhenqi [1776 2182 
3825]. Later, the second product design office of the Bureau of 
Shipbuilding Industry designed the 55-A coastal patrol boat 
based on drawings supplied by Russian advisors. It was put into 
production at the Qiuxin, Jiangnan, and Hudong shipyards. These 
patrol boats played a vital role in the liberation of the 
coastal islands. Later on, in the 1960s, it designed the Model 
62 high-speed frigate with top speeds up to 30 knots to meet 
certain requirements. These frigates were the early surface 
combat vessels independently developed in China. 
  In 1962, the 701st Institute was in charge of the overall 
design of the Model 65 frigate. Under the leadership of Chief 
Designer Yu Boliang [0205 0130 5328], the ship adopted a design 
with a long forward section not only to have space for the main 
engines but also to have more room and a larger deck. In 
addition, it also provides more stability at large angles of 
inclination and better hull rigidity. In 1963, the first ship 
was built at the Jiangnan Shipyard. In 1965, construction of the 
second ship began at the Guangzhou Shipyard. Both vessels were 
completed and put in service in 1966. Over the years, the Model 
65 frigate has undertaken numerous long voyages and survived 
level-12 typhoons. It has safely sailed over 100,000 nautical 
miles. Its successful development improved the technical 
standard of surface vessels independently developed in China and 
laid a solid foundation for the development of missile frigates 
in the future. 
  In the mid-1960s, the 701st Institute began to develop a 
surface-to-air missile frigate. The objective was to attack 
enemy vessels at close and medium ranges with missiles and guns 
and defend against air attack at the same time. With the 
cooperation of all institutes and factories involved, the 701st 
Institute conducted design research of the vessel from the 
second half of 1966 through the first half of 1969. The combined 
steam and diesel power source was changed to an all-diesel 
system. In addition, ship models were tested and technical 
coordination between ship and equipment investigated. In 
September 1969, a consolidated design group comprised of 
technical personnel from the 701st Institute, the Hudong 
Shipyard, and end-users in the Navy was created to carry out the 
design work at the Hudong Shipyard. In the 1970s the frigate was 
essentially completed by Hudong. Nevertheless, development of 
the ship-to-air missile and the main guns was delayed. Later, 
since the Navy was in desperate need, the ship-to-air missile 
frigate was changed to a ship-to-ship missile frigate. The twin 
100mm guns were replaced by single 100mm guns. Hudong Shipyard 
was put in charge of its design and construction based on the 
model developed for the ship-to-air missile frigate. In 1976, 
the ship-to-ship missile frigate was completed. The development 
of the missile frigate went through a difficult path. 
Eventually, the urgent need of the Navy for a missile frigate 
was met. In the early 1980s, the twin 100mm gun was successfully 
developed and installed on the anti-ship missile frigate. It was 
renamed the anti-ship-I missile frigate. In 1983, the 
anti-ship-I missile frigate was further improved by Hudong, the 
system engineering department of the China Shipbuilding Industry 
Corporation and the Third Research Academy of the Ministry of 
Aerospace Industry. Primarily, the two rotating twin SY-1 
missile launchers were replaced with eight fixed YJ-8 missile 
launchers, a simple combat information command system was added 
to the combat command center, electronic warfare equipment was 
installed, and the entire ship was retrofitted to a sealed type. 
The improved frigate was named the anti-ship-II missile frigate. 
In 1988, after the successful development of the anti-aircraft 
missile, the Navy asked the 701st Institute to design a combined 
anti-ship and anti-aircraft missile frigate. Xie Xianzhag and Li 
Jingtang [2621 2417 1016] of the 713th Institute designed a 
special twin ship-to-air missile launcher complete with its own 
missile storage facility. Then, the development of an 
anti-aircraft missile frigate originally proposed in the 1960s 
was accomplished. However, its tactical specifications are much 
higher than those originally proposed. In particular, the Hudong 
Shipyard worked hard to upgrade continuously weaponry and 
equipment on this vessel to enhance the combat capability of the 
ship and acquired considerable experience as well. 
  In 1986, the 708th Institute and the Guangzhou Huangpu 
Shipyard designed and constructed a 500-ton missile frigate that 
could launch a missile attack as well as perform patrol duties. 
It employs a shipboard combat command system and is a new 
generation missile frigate that China has developed. 
<H5>  (3) Torpedo, Missile Boats </H5>
  A torpedo or missile boat is a high-speed craft or hydrofoil 
that uses torpedoes or missiles as its primary firepower. It is 
small, fast, powerful, low cost, highly mobile, very 
maneuverable and concealable. It is suitable to attack enemy 
surface vessels individually or in formation along the coast 
with the support of other forces. It is known as the cavalry of 
the sea. 
  In the 1950s, shipyards in Wuhu and Guangzhou produced a 
copy 
of a Soviet twin-tube torpedo boat. In 1966, the 701st Institute 
was responsible for developing a four-tube torpedo boat. Yan 
Jianti [0917 4675 7555] and Cao Guanzhong [2580 0385 0022] were 
the technical leaders. The first boat built by the Guijiang 
Shipyard in Wuzhou was delivered in September 1976. Later, the 
design was modified and was tested for its speed, wave 
endurance, torpedo fire control panel and simultaneous firing of 
all four torpedoes. It was proven that this independently 
developed four-tube torpedo boat not only had a high probability 
of hits but also excellent endurance in high waves. 
  The development of missile boats was based on our experience 
in the assembly, duplication and improvement of the Russian 
missile boat. It began in the early 1960s. 
  In January 1966, the Central Special Committee approved the 
development of a small steel-hulled missile boat. Under the 
direction of Hua Qiru [5363 3823 1172], the 701st Institute 
chose a design that could simultaneously launch two missiles and 
had a twin 25mm semi-automatic gun. The 713th Institute was 
responsible for designing the missile launcher and Wuhu Shipyard 
was responsible for its prototyping and production. In December 
1966, Wuhu Shipyard completed the missile boat and officially 
handed it over to the Navy. 
  From 1980 to 1982, in order to meet the need to test new 
ship-to-ship missiles, the small steel-hulled missile boat was 
modified so that it could launch four ship-to-ship missiles. 
Since then, validation of and advanced research on various 
concepts of a new 300-ton assault missile boat were carried out. 
<H5>  (4) Subchasers </H5>
  A subchaser is a light anti-submarine frigate. Its primary 
mission is coastal patrol, anti-submarine warfare, and escort. 
  In the mid-1950s, using the design drawings and the 
necessary 
materials and equipment purchased from the USSR, the first batch 
of subchasers was assembled at Huangpu Shipyard by workers sent 
down from the Qiuxin and Dalian shipyards. 
  In October 1959, the Navy requested that a better 
anti-submarine frigate be developed. The first office of the 
Shipbuilding Design Institute of the 1st Ministry of Machine 
Building was responsible for its design. Lu Yongchang [0712 3057 
2490] and Ma Shoulun [7456 1343 0178] were the chief and deputy 
chief designer, respectively. Since the founding of the 7th 
Research Academy in 1961, the technical design was completed by 
the 701st Institute. In 1962, due to our urgent need to provide 
protection to shipping and fishing in the South China Sea, and 
considering the fact that it would be difficult for the 
anti-submarine frigate to pass through the Taiwan Strait after 
its completion, the first ship was assembled at Huangpu Shipyard 
in Guangzhou by workers sent down from Dalian Shipyard using 
parts fabricated at Dalian Shipyard. Later, the remaining fleet 
was constructed by Huangpu Shipyard. 
  An anti-submarine frigate has a propeller silencing device. 
It is highly adaptable to different sea conditions and is very 
fast. The first ship was delivered in 1963. Later, several 
modifications were made based on needs in the field to further 
enhance its performance. In February 1975, when the production 
design of the anti-submarine frigate was finalized, it could 
meet the requirements in the north and south. After years of 
service, the tactical performance of the ship was found to be 
excellent. In January 1974, two ships successfully repelled an 
enemy attack in the battle of the Xisha Islands. In 1983, the 
701st Institute and Qiuxin Shipyard in Shanghai again 
successfully developed a modified version of the frigate. Its 
performance was further enhanced. 
<H5>  (5) Mine Warfare Vessels </H5>
  In 1956, the first product design office of the Bureau of 
Shipbuilding Industry Management of the 1st Ministry of Machine 
Building was responsible for the design of the first generation 
harbor minesweeper and Bai Juyuan [4101 1565 3293] was named 
chief designer. The proof of concept and design work was 
completed in 1958 and its construction was done at Qiuxin 
Shipyard. In 1962, the ship was completed, tested, evaluated and 
then delivered to the Navy. 
  In November 1967, the National Defense Office issued an 
order 
to develop a low magnetic steel hull river and harbor 
minesweeper. The 708th Institute was responsible for its design. 
The minesweeper used a new low magnetic manganese-aluminum 
series of steel that is available in China. Manufacturing 
techniques were developed to improve the degaussing of the 
vessel. Upon completion of its design in 1969, it was 
constructed by Zhonghua Shipyard. In April 1974, it was 
completed, tested and delivered to the Navy. 
  In the early 1970s, the 701st Institute, 708th Institute and 
the Zhonghua Shipyard jointly developed the Model 312 
minesweeper which consolidated the ship and the minesweeping 
equipment in one unit in an attempt to combine application, 
design, and production. Du Yongkang [2629 3057 1660] of the East 
Sea Fleet was the design group leader and Liu Zhiping [0491 3112 
1627] of the 701st Institute was the deputy group leader. The 
708th Institute was responsible for the design work. During the 
development process, the team worked with dozens of factories 
such as the Shanghai Rectifier Plant, Shanghai Electric Works 
and Shanghai 23rd Radio Plant to develop special cables, 
cable-laying equipment and remote control devices. In a year and 
a half, it completed the design, construction and shakedown 
cruise of the 312 boat. 
  These three models of minesweeper removed dozens of 
American-made mines in the early 1970s during the Vietnam War. 
This demonstrated the effectiveness of the minesweepers 
independently developed by China. In 1976, the new-generation 
Model 082 consolidated harbor minesweeper was developed. The 
708th Institute was responsible for the design work and Ma 
Jinhua [7456 6930 5478] was the chief designer. The 701st 
Institute was responsible for the minesweeping equipment. 
Jiangxin Shipyard completed the construction of this model of 
minesweeper and delivered them in 1987. The ship is equipped 
with electromagnetic, sonic, subsonic, cutting, and explosive 
minesweeping devices. Its effective range is several times 
greater than that of the Model 312. Protective measures were 
taken against strong impact against the hull, equipment, and 
personnel. 
  In the late 1970s, the Navy requested that a new surface 
minelayer be developed. In 1981, the Chief of Staff Command and 
the National Defense Office officially issued an order for its 
development. The 708th Institute was responsible for the design 
work and the necessary equipment was developed by other 
institutes in the 7th Research Academy system. Ma Jinhua was 
named chief designer. In 1985, all equipment was qualified on 
land and ship construction began at the Dalian Shipyard. In 
January 1981, the ship was completed, successfully tested and 
then delivered to the Navy. This minelayer could resupply and 
load mines without any pier facility. It is equipped with a 
large span crane. A mechanized mine transport system exists 
between its two decks and with horizontal and vertical motion 
control. A navigation command system capable of pinpointing the 
locations of the vessel and the mines is also on board. It is at 
1980 world class level. 
<H5>  (6) Landing Craft </H5>
  Between 1955 and 1962, China designed and constructed three 
different models of landing craft. In the 1970s, two models of 
medium landing craft capable of operating in Category II zones 
were successfully developed and put into production. In 1975, we 
began to develop the 450-ton Model 072 large landing craft to 
carry more powerful weapons. This vessel was designed by the 
708th Institute under the direction of Chief Designer Ding 
Weiren [0002 3837 0117]. The Zhonghua Shipyard was responsible 
for its construction. To ensure high speed and capability to 
reach and leave the beach, the landing craft has a slender bow 
to reduce wave drag. A special two-section 17-meter-long folding 
suspension bridge was developed. The bridge is hydraulically 
driven and only takes 3 minutes to extend and position. The 
vessel has a large covered tank section; an amphibious tank be 
driven forward into the vessel from its stern and leave facing 
forward from the platform at the bow. The vessel is also 
equipped with a 60-ton hydraulic stern anchor, a hydraulically 
driven ramp and a bow door opener. The first Model 072 landing 
craft was completed in 1979, and passed an expanded appraisal 
test before it was delivered. The vessel's speed is over 20 
knots. In two beach landing trials, the end of the ramp was no 
more than 0.8 meter under water. In actual use, the Model 072 
landing craft has excellent speed, maneuverability, seakeeping 
quality, and landing capability. In the 1980s, China began to 
develop new medium and large landing craft. 
<H5>  Section 4. Auxiliary Vessels </H5>
<H5>  (1) Ocean-Going Instrumentation Ship </H5>
  An ocean-going instrumentation ship is a special ship 
constructed for the development of intercontinental ballistic 
missiles and aerospace technology. 
  In the mid-1960s, based on the order issued by the National 
Defense Science Commission, the ship design department of the 
7th Ministry of Machine Building, the 7th Research Academy of 
the 6th Ministry of Machine Building and the appropriate test 
base under the National Defense Science Commission formed a team 
to begin proof of concept work on the onboard measurement scheme 
and measurement control system on an ocean-going instrumentation 
ship by combining their experience in application, design and 
production together. In addition, the 7th Research Academy 
pulled personnel from 10 different institutes to form the "64 
Work Group." It was led by Xu Xueyan [6079 1331 1750]. Together 
with Shangguan Shipan [0006 1351 0013 4149] and Wang Lichun 
[3769 4539 2504] of the test base, they jointly proved the 
concept of the instrumentation ship. After years of 
investigation, repeated testing, and validation, the overall 
design of the instrumentation ship and technical schemes for its 
measurement and control, communication, navigation and location, 
recovery, and meteorological systems were finally determined. 
  In 1974, various units began the ship design and equipment 
development work. In the same year, the 708th Institute, 
Jiangnan Shipyard and the Test Base reorganized a design team 
with combined experience in application, design and production 
to perform the technical design of the instrumentation ship. It 
was headed by Xu Fuliang [6079 1381 5328]. In May 1975, after 
the leadership group reviewed and approved its technical design, 
construction design of the ocean-going instrumentation ship 
began at Jiangnan Shipyard under the direction of Xu Mingliang 
[1776 2494 0081]. The ocean-going instrumentation ship has a 
long cruising radius and good endurance against wind and waves. 
It is 191 meters long, 38 meters high and 22 meters wide. Its 
nine levels are equivalent to a 14-story building. There are 
over 50 antennas on the deck. Its total displacement with full 
load is more than 20,000 tons. Its average cruising speed is 18 
knots. The ship is equipped with a highly accurate measurement 
and control system, a multi-purpose, multi-network, long-range, 
all-weather communications system, an advanced navigation and 
location system and a meteorological system. The electricity 
consumed on board is equivalent to that of a medium-size city of 
300,000 people. This ocean-going instrumentation ship is China's 
first-generation comprehensive mobile tracking and measurement 
station. Its development was a highly complex and huge system 
engineering project and incorporated many new technological 
accomplishments. In the design, construction equipment 
development, installation and tuning process, many key technical 
issues were resolved. 
  (i) Stability of the vessel and its equipment 
  In order to maintain the stability of the vessel in heavy 
seas to ensure accuracy of measurements, the design of the 
instrumentation ship incorporated three levels of measures. The 
first level is the stability of the vessel itself. The ship has 
a pair of retractable stabilizing fins and a super-large 
single-plate hull. An active rudder and a bow heading device are 
used together to control drift and bow yawing to make sure that 
the instrumentation can be stabilized within the range of 
observation. The second level is to employ a planar coordinate 
stabilization system on top of the first level to minimize the 
residual swaying angle of the ship to a fraction of a degree for 
the instrumentation sitting on the stabilizing platform. The 
third level is to automatically control the azimuth and pitching 
angle of the instrumentation to stabilize the accuracy to the 
second level by measuring the servo systems of onboard equipment 
such as the radar, telemetry system and dual frequency 
tachometer and processing the signals by a central computer in 
order to accomplish the objective of capturing and continuous 
tracking of targets. 
  (ii) Minimization of hull distortion and measurement of 
distortion 
  Missile tracking imposes very stringent requirements on the 
instrumentation ship. A small longitudinal distortion of the 
vessel will introduce a large error in measurement. In order to 
solve this problem, the 708th Institute took special measures in 
hull structure design and layout to increase the rigidity of the 
hull without adding additional weight to the vessel to minimize 
the distortion in rough water. An onboard optical distortion 
measuring device developed by the Changchun Institute of Optics 
and Fine Mechanics was installed to measure the unavoidable 
residual distortion so that corrections could be made to meet 
the rigorous requirement for certain precision measurement 
apparatus such as the laser video theodolite, where distortion 
is supposed to be maintained to within 1/1000 the length of the 
ship. 
  (iii) Vibration damping and noise reduction 
  There are a large number of precision electronic and optical 
devices on the instrumentation ship that desire minimal 
vibration and low noise. The 708th Institute adopted the steam 
turbine engine manufactured by the Shanghai Turbine Factory, 
designed a new propeller, and took special structural measures 
to meet the minimal vibration requirement. In terms of overall 
layout, the boiler is located in the middle-aft section and the 
instrumentation is situated in the middle and middle forward 
section of the ship for maximum separation. They are insulated 
with double doors filled with foam insulation to reduce noise. 
The noise levels in the engine room and other compartments were 
measured and found to meet our specifications. 
  (iv) Electromagnetic compatibility 
  The instrumentation ship is equipped with over 50 antennas 
and more than 1,000 pieces of electronic equipment. 
Electromagnetic interference becomes a serious problem when 
there are so many high-power electronic devices working over so 
many bands on a vessel. The Institute of Instrumentation and 
Communications of the National Defense Science Commission, the 
708th Institute and the Jiangnan Shipyard designed an antenna 
zoning plan by taking electromagnetic compatibility measures 
into consideration. The 704th Institute, the Institute of Cable 
Research and a cable plant assisted in obtaining coupling 
interference data, developed a high frequency cable assembly, 
sorted out cables into separate layers and bundles according to 
frequency band, and set up special conduits for different cables 
to suppress coupling. The Changzhou Second Radio Plant developed 
a better shipboard power supply filter to suppress conductive 
cable interference. In addition, numerous shielding measures 
were taken to suppress radiation interference to solve the 
electromagnetic compatibility problem. 
  (v) Navigation and positioning 
  The system engineering department was responsible for the 
navigation and positioning system. The means for location 
includes an inertial navigation system developed by Zhang 
Zongxun [1728 1350 6104] of the 707th Institute, the global, 
all-weather, high-precision satellite navigation system 
developed by Ma Yeqin [7456 2814 0530] at the 1020th Institute 
and the astronomical theodolite developed by Yang Ming [2799 
2494] at the 717th Institute. Through the use of a computer, a 
comprehensive positioning system comprised of these three 
instruments can use the high-precision positioning data 
collected by the satellite navigation and astronomical 
theodolite to calibrate the zero drift of the inertial 
navigation system accumulated over an extended voyage to improve 
the location accuracy of the instrumentation ship. 
  (vi) Long-range all-weather communications 
  The communications department of the Chief of Staff Command 
was responsible for the communications system on the 
instrumentation ship. A comprehensive communications system 
comprised of a variety of communications means such as 
long-range, high-power short-wave communications, 
super-long-wave communications, relay communications, satellite 
communications and data transmission, frequency and phase-shift 
telegraph, facsimile, and secure telephone. It is also equipped 
with a timing system that is based on an atomic clock to ensure 
the transmission of large amounts of data and information from 
ship to ship, to shore, and to aircraft under all weather 
conditions. 
  (vii) Weather problems 
  The weather system was the responsibility of the Weather 
Bureau of the Chief of Staff Command. The vessel is equipped 
with a comprehensive weather forecast system that is comprised 
of a weather radar, a sonde, a high-altitude helium balloon 
launcher, a satellite weather pattern receiver, a radio weather 
communications device and other conventional meteorological 
equipment to provide high-altitude weather data over the ocean 
in a timely manner. 
  (viii) Salvage and rescue issues 
  The salvage and rescue system was the responsibility of the 
navigation safety department of the Navy. The ship is equipped 
with rescue boats, hydraulic cranes, a helicopter pad and a 
command tower with the corresponding navigation communications 
equipment to recover and store the data compartment of the 
missile, or to rescue astronauts. 
  (ix) Tracking and measurement 
  On the basis of the measurement and control plans prepared 
by 
the Institute of Instrumentation and Communications of the 
National Defense Science Commission for the ocean-going 
instrumentation ship, the vessel is equipped with a measurement 
and control system that is comprised of a monopulse precision 
radar developed by the 14th Institute of the 10th Research 
Academy, a laser video theodolite developed by the Changchun 
Institute of Optics and Fine Mechanics, a dual-frequency 
tachometer developed by the 504th Institute, a comprehensive 
telemetry system developed by the 704th Institute of the 
Ministry of Aerospace Industry and a central computer system 
developed by the 15th Institute of the 10th Research Academy and 
Changsha Institute of Engineering that can handle 1 million 
computations per second to solve problems associated with 
tracking, data capture and guidance at sea. 
  Since 1975, the instrumentation ship has gone through its 
construction, trial voyage, equipment installation, tuning and 
calibration stages. Following the order of the Central Special 
Commission, the Jiangnan Shipyard, the 708th Institute, the 
Institute of Instrumentation and Communications of the National 
Defense Science Commission and the instrumentation ship base 
completed the construction, equipment installation, tuning and 
shakedown cruise of two instrumentation ships. During this 
period, under the leadership of Li Qi [2621 1142] of the 
Shanghai Coordination Group of the National Defense Science 
Commission, with the cooperation of relevant departments under 
the jurisdiction of the 6th Ministry of Machine Building and the 
city of Shanghai, five major tests including technical 
coordination, gear meshing, performance in sea voyage, 
calibration and correction were conducted by the Jiangnan 
Shipyard, 708th Institute, the instrumentation ship base and 
Naval representatives on site to determine the performance of 
various measurement devices. During the 1-year test period, it 
passed 816 special tests and 353 military tests and every item 
met design specifications. In early 1980, various onboard 
systems on the instrumentation ship were linked and tested. Its 
air tracking capability was also calibrated. Finally, after 
drills along the coast, all systems and equipment were found to 
work well under the control of the central computer. She was 
ready for assignment. 
  This ocean-going instrumentation ship has successfully 
accomplished numerous missions, including the ICBM test, 
submarine underwater missile launch tests, communications 
satellite launch tests and the exploration of Antarctica. It has 
contributed considerably to the advancement of science and 
technology and weapons testing in China. 
<H5>  (2) Ocean-going Survey Ship </H5>
  The major mission of an ocean-going survey ship is to 
conduct 
a survey of a pre-selected test site before an ICBM test or any 
large scale test takes place. It may also serve as a floating 
weather station to gather and analyze data and to forecast the 
weather. It may also be a communications relay ship for the main 
instrumentation ship. The construction of the ocean-going survey 
ship was the responsibility of the 6th Ministry of Machine 
Building, the National Oceanographic Bureau, the Weather Bureau 
of the Chief of Staff Command and the city of Shanghai. The 
708th Institute was in charge of the overall design and the 
Jiangnan Shipyard was responsible for its construction. The 
technical design phase was directed by Xu Xueyan and the 
construction design phase was directed by Lu Zai [4151 0961] of 
the Jiangnan Shipyard. 
  The displacement of the ocean-going survey ship is 13,000 
tons. It can resist a level-12 storm and can sail anywhere in 
the world. The onboard weather system is comprised of a weather 
radar, a rainfall radar, a wind speed radar, a high-altitude 
helium balloon launcher, a satellite weather pattern receiver 
and a weather rocket launcher. Its communications system is 
centered around a 30 kW short-wave system, complete with a 
variety of communications. The ocean survey system consists of 
experimental apparatus and laboratory for hydrology, geology, 
earth magnetic field, gravity, biology, waves and optics. It is 
also equipped with a hydrophone system and helicopter pad. It is 
capable of conducting high-altitude weather exploration, 
scientific ocean survey, underwater communications testing and 
communications relay. Construction of the ocean-going survey 
ship began in June 1975 at Jiangnan Shipyard and it was 
completed in October 1979. 
<H5>  (3) Other Auxiliary Ships </H5>
  (i) Ocean-going salvage and rescue ship 
  In order to pick up the data capsule of an ICBM that has 
splashed down, and to anticipate future needs to rescue 
submariners and astronauts, it was decided that an ocean-going 
salvage and rescue ship be built. In order to keep the number of 
ship models to a minimum and to speed its construction, it 
essentially has the same design as that of the ocean-going 
survey ship. The vessel is equipped with a diving rescue vessel, 
a 56-ton hydraulic crane, a rescue dome, three 25 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/] decompression chambers, two large helicopters 
and a helicopter pad, navigation equipment, and a number of 
boats. It also has a 1,000-meter deep-water anchor and a 
200-meter position-holding anchor to enable the vessel to 
operate at a fixed position on the sea. The ship was designed 
and constructed by the same organizations involved in the design 
and construction of the ocean-going survey ship. Her 
construction began in 1975 and she was completed and delivered 
in November 1979. 
  (ii) Ocean-going supply ship 
  In order to supply the entire fleet involved in the 
full-range ICBM test, a 20,000-ton supply ship for both liquid 
and solid cargo was designed and built by Dalian Shipyard. Her 
cruising speed is 18.5 knots and she can resist a level-12 storm. 
  (iii) Rescue and towing ship 
  In order to ensure that damaged vessels in the ICBM test 
fleet could be recovered, a 400-ton high-power variable pitch 
propeller rescue ship was designed and built by Zhonghua 
Shipyard to provide services such as medical assistance, 
underwater repair, pumping, supply, and fire fighting at sea. In 
the ICBM test, it was also responsible for the determination of 
the splash-down point of the missile. 
  (iv) Training ship 
  The "Zhenghe," a 5,500-ton ocean-going training ship built 
for the Naval Academy, was designed by the 708th Institute and 
built by the Qiuxin Shipyard. The ship is equipped with a 
complete set of training equipment to provide training for 108 
cadets. In 1988, the "Zhenghe" visited Hawaii. 
  (v) Large degaussing ship and ocean cable-laying vessel 
  To degauss large ships and to lay cable, the 708th Institute 
and honghua Shipyard designed and built a large degaussing ship 
and a cable-laying ship and completed them in 1973 and 1982, 
respectively. 
  (vi) Mother ship for target mine hydrophone tracking system 
  To meet the requirement in testing naval weaponry at the 
South China Sea Deep Water Test Site, the 708th Institute 
designed a mother ship and other auxiliary ships for the target 
mine and hydrophone tracking system in 1982. The mother ship was 
constructed by Zhonghua Shipyard with a full displacement of 
4,000 tons. It is 112 meters long. It is capable of assembling, 
testing, maintaining and repairing target mines, hydrophone 
systems and sonar location systems. It can also be used to 
launch, deploy, and recover hydrophones, as well as to process 
measured data on a real-time basis. The auxiliary ship was 
constructed by the Wuzhou Shipyard. Its maximum displacement is 
615 tons and it is 55 meters long. It is used to deploy and 
recover hydrophones and velocity/depth sensors and accept the 
data they acquire. It is then transmitted to the mother ship by 
radio in a coded format. These two vessels were both delivered 
in 1986. 
<H5>  Section 5. Shipboard Weapon Systems and Equipment </H5>
  A shipboard weapon system is comprised of shipboard weapons, 
control devices and measurement equipment. 
<H5>  (1) Underwater Weapons </H5>
  When the new government was first founded, there were no 
underwater weapons. The development of underwater weapons was of 
great concern to the Chinese Communist Party Central, the State 
Council and the Central Military Commission. Since the late 
1950s, a relatively comprehensive technical development, design, 
production and testing system for underwater weapons has been 
established. An experienced technical team has been formed to 
develop a number of underwater weapons of considerable caliber 
to equip the Navy. 
  (i) Torpedoes 
  A torpedo can be launched, controlled, and guided 
automatically to destroy submarines, surface vessels, and other 
targets. In the early stage, the Navy was equipped with 
torpedoes imported from the USSR. In order to produce torpedoes 
domestically, the 872nd and 874th Torpedo Plants were a part of 
the 156 major projects supported by the USSR in the 1950s. In 
April 1958, the Naval Ordnance Department established the Second 
Naval Research Institute (i.e., the predecessor of the 705th and 
710th institutes of the 7th Research Academy). Associate Chief 
Yang Han [2799 3352] of the Naval Ordnance Department acted as 
its director. In September 1962, the Navy put Gou Yuanshu [5384 
0337 2579], Chief of the Naval Ordnance Department and Associate 
Bureau Chief of the Fifth Bureau of the 3rd Ministry of Machine 
Building, in charge of organizing torpedo development and 
constructing torpedo plants and test sites. In 1965, the Qinghai 
Lake Torpedo Production and Test Facility was established. In 
1966, the 750th deep water torpedo test base and torpedo arming 
plant were built in Yunnan. In 1968, two more torpedo plants 
were constructed in Yunnan. The construction of the above 
plants, institutes and test sites created the necessary 
condition for the development, production and testing of 
torpedoes. 
  In the late 1950s and early 1960s, China began to duplicate 
Soviet-made thermal powered automatically controlled anti-ship 
torpedoes for surface ship and submarine use and the 
jet-propelled anti-ship torpedo used on aircraft. To duplicate 
these two torpedoes, workers and technical personnel at the 
874th, 342nd and 374th Plants and the 705th Institute, with the 
cooperation of the Northwest Polytechnical University and the 
Navy, overcame numerous technical hurdles and made repeated 
breakthroughs. Back then, the 7th Research Academy had just been 
founded. Director Liu Huaqing [0491 5478 3237] visited the 
Institute of Torpedo Research numerous times to gain a deeper 
understanding of the status of the duplication work and to 
provide direction to this project. He took advantage of the 
collective team, and gathered funding, equipment, and personnel 
to overcome various problems and hurdles. In the early 1970s, 
the design and production model finalization for both torpedoes 
were completed. They were named the Y-1 and Y-2 torpedo, 
respectively. This effort laid a preliminary foundation for 
personnel training and created the environment for development 
and production. 
  While we were duplicating the two torpedoes, the 705th 
Institute began developing an electrically powered acoustically 
guided anti-submarine torpedo for nuclear submarine use. In 
November 1965, the National Defense Science Commission held a 
meeting in Beijing to review the development plan for the 
electrically powered acoustically guided anti-submarine torpedo. 
It was named the Y-3. The 705th Institute of the 7th Research 
Academy was in charge of the overall design of the Y-3. Its 
chief designer was Dong Lin [5516 3829] and the associate 
directors were Yang Baosheng [2799 0202 3932] and Jiang Lianfang 
[3068 6647 2455]. At the end of March 1966, the 705th Institute 
completed system validation for the Y-3 torpedo. Later, the 7th 
Research Academy established a number of laboratories to begin 
the development of the torpedo and its launcher in full scale. 
As a result of a joint effort of the 712th Institute of the 7th 
Research Academy, the 1418th Institute of the 4th Ministry of 
Machine Building and Xinxiang Battery Factory, a 
high-performance silver/zinc battery was developed in the 1960s 
to meet the need for the electrically powered acoustically 
guided anti-submarine torpedo designed by the 705th Institute. 
The outside casing of the torpedo is a welded aluminum structure 
designed by Shanghai Jiaotong University. Hudong Shipyard solved 
the production problem of the torpedo casing. Furthermore, it 
employed a phase-shift multi-beam guidance system developed 
primarily by the Institute of Acoustics of the Chinese Academy 
of Sciences with assistance from the 705th Institute. 
  The Y-3 torpedo was developed by over 80 production and 
research organizations, including the 5002 and 5062 plants. This 
was during the Cultural Revolution. The technical personnel 
rigorously followed the spirit of the "special open letter" 
issued by the Central Military Commission on the nuclear 
submarine project. They eliminated any interference to fight for 
time to deliver four prototype torpedoes for testing at the 
750th underwater test facility in Yunnan in 1969. In 1972, they 
produced 10 more prototypes to be tested on lakes and at sea. 
The design was finalized in 1975. In 1983, the Navy conducted 
numerous production model finalization tests at the Liaonan 
Torpedo Test Range and solved all the problems encountered in 
the tests. In 1984, the State Council and the conventional 
weaponry design finalization committee of the Central Military 
Commission approved the final design of this torpedo. The 
successful development of the Y-3 provided the major weapon for 
our nuclear submarine. It was also our first step toward 
independent torpedo development. 
  In the mid-1960s, a passive acoustic anti-ship torpedo was 
modified by the 874th Plant, Northwestern Polytechnical 
University and 872 Plant and was named the Y-4A torpedo. The 
effort was led by Zhang Zhenghe [1728 2973 0735] and Lu Hongxin 
[7120 4767 2450] as chief engineers. It was a modification of a 
Soviet torpedo. The speed of the torpedo was increased by 25 
percent and the stability and reliability of its self-guidance 
system and its fuse were also improved. In February 1984, the 
final production design of the Y-4 was approved by the State 
Council and the conventional weaponry design finalization 
committee of the Central Military Commission. 
  In the late 1960s, a hybrid active/passive acoustic 
anti-ship 
torpedo was developed by Northwestern Polytechnical University 
in conjunction with the 874th and 872nd Plants. It was named the 
Y-4B torpedo. Yang Qiming [2799 0796 2429] was the chief 
designer and Liu Yongzhe [0491 3144 0772], Wang Youyu [3076 2589 
0151] and Xie Yiqing [6200 0001 3237] were the associate chief 
designers. They introduced a non-inertial electric depth 
detector to replace the mechanical depth controller, employed a 
new head handling and draining device, and adopted a finned tail 
to significantly improve its performance. This torpedo was 
successfully tested numerous times at sea. In February 1984, the 
State Council and the conventional weaponry design finalization 
committee of the Central Military Commission approved the final 
design of the Y-4B. Furthermore, it received a first place 
national science and technology progress award. This is the 
first active/passive acoustic anti-ship torpedo independently 
developed by China. 
  Since 1980, the 705th Institute has led the development of 
lightweight active/passive acoustic anti-submarine torpedoes 
according to models available in other countries. This project 
was included as a key defense development project in the Seventh 
5-Year Plan by the State Council and the Central Military 
Commission. It is the first-generation anti-submarine torpedo 
independently developed by China. Its performance is advanced 
and involves highly complex technology. Its construction 
requires high-precision machining and involves a large number of 
organizations. In addition to having the 705th Institute heading 
development, an on-site torpedo command was established to 
strengthen the organization and coordination work. Duan Wenbin 
[3008 2429 2430] was the commander. In order to strengthen the 
organization and coordination in the development effort, a 
torpedo design system was established and Huang Zhengyi [7806 
2398 0001] of the 705th Institute was the chief designer and 
Chief Engineer Li Xuan [2621 3551] of the 874 Plant and Chief 
Engineer Yuan Youmin [0626 1635 3046] of the 872 Plant were the 
associate chief designers. They were in charge of all technical 
aspects and overall coordination. With the cooperation of 12 
ministry committees and 92 other organizations nationwide, all 
participating plants and institutions collaborated closely to 
overcome a series of technical hurdles encountered in the design 
and construction of the torpedo. A prototype was developed in 
1989 and was successfully tested on the lake at the 750th Test 
Range in Yunnan and on the sea at the Liaonan Test Range, 
respectively. The results showed that this light-weight combined 
active/passive acoustic torpedo met all tactical specifications 
listed in the development request document. 
  (ii) Torpedo launcher 
  In 1962, the 705th, 701st and 704th institutes were jointly 
responsible for the development of a torpedo launcher for the 
torpedo boat, and the 461st Plant was in charge of its 
production. It was successfully developed in September 1963 and 
passed national appraisal in 1964. At the same time frame, the 
705th Institute began to design a pneumatic torpedo launcher for 
submarine use. This is a technically complicated device. It 
requires that the tube have a high degree of concentricity and 
linearity and be able to launch without any air bubbles to 
expose the location of the submarine. After 3 years of hard 
work, the institute designed over 10,000 parts, solved a series 
of material and equipment problems, particularly the welded 
compressed air bottle developed by the Dalian Shipyard, this 
pneumatic submarine torpedo launcher was successfully developed 
in 1966. 
  The development of a torpedo launcher for nuclear submarines 
began in 1965. The 705th Institute was in charge of its design 
and the 461st Plant was responsible for its production. Zhang 
Yian [1728 5065 1344] and Zhang Jian [1728 1017] were the chief 
designer and associate chief designer, respectively. Upon proof 
of concept, a balanced hydraulic pressure scheme was adopted so 
that no bubble would be generated and the submarine could 
maintain its balance. This device was constructed at the 
Jiangnan and Dalian shipyards. As a result of the joint effort 
of the technical staff and workers, technical issues such as 
titanium alloy processing and molding of corrugated parts were 
solved. Prototypes were constructed and tested before it became 
a success. In September 1969, the 461st Plant delivered a 
complete torpedo launcher to a submarine facility. After a 
deep-sea launch test, the design was found to be successful. 
  In the meantime, the torpedo design department and the 
system 
validation department also arranged the development of a sonar, 
a torpedo firing command panel and a navigation device to be 
integrated with the torpedo and torpedo launcher to form a 
complete weapon system. 
  (iii) Mines 
  Mines are simple, low cost, highly destructive and suitable 
for use in large quantity. They can lurk in water over an 
expanded period of time and destroy enemy vessels unexpectedly. 
China began to develop mines from duplication. In 1957, we 
started to duplicate Soviet-made mines. The finalized models 
included a large contact anchored mine, a medium contact 
anchored mine and a line contact mine. In the 1960s, we 
successfully developed a sound-activated submerged mine. The 
tactical and technical specifications of these mines were 
relatively backward. 
  In the mid-1960s, specifically in reference to the severe 
sand sedimentation problem along the coast, the 710th Institute, 
the 662nd Institute and the 884 Plant jointly developed a 
sound-activated submerged mine. Moreover, the mine was made to 
be more resistant against sweeping and underwater explosion and 
more effective. From the mid-1960s to the mid-1980s, over 20 
types of mines, including a small non-contact bottom mine, an 
ultrasonic hydraulic bottom mine, an air-dropped large submerged 
mine, an automatic depth-holding floating mine, a small 
automatic depth-holding floating mine, a non-contact-trigger 
anchored mine, a rocket type automatic surfacing mine and a 
programmed remote control mine, were developed by the 701st 
Institute, the 848 Plant and the 662 Plant to meet the needs of 
different surface vessels, submarines, aircraft and manual 
deployment to create mine fields comprised of sunken, anchored, 
floating, and automatic tracking mines. In addition, a novel 
automatic switching technique was employed for the acoustic 
fuse. A dual magnetic diaphragm receiver was used in the 
magnetic fuse. Furthermore, major breakthroughs were also made 
in signal processing of the hydrostatic fuse, piezoelectric 
transducer and electronic circuitry. 
  (iv) Counter-mine weapons 
  China began to copy Soviet-made minesweeping gear in 1958. 
Designs for a mine-cutting sweeper, an electromagnetic jaw 
sweeper and an acoustic deep-sea sonic response sweeper were 
finalized. In 1966, led by the 710th Institute, China began its 
own independent development of counter-mine weapons. Over the 
past two decades, a number of counter-mine weapons have been 
developed. For example, in the early 1970s a Model 312 
integrated remote control minesweeper was developed jointly by 
the East China Sea Fleet, the 710th Institute, 708th Institute 
and the Zhonghua Shipyard. Because the vessel and its 
minesweeping equipment are integrated, the vessel is compact, 
has a shallow draft, and is highly maneuverable. It was highly 
effective in the Vietnam War. In the 1980s, the relevant units 
began to develop a new counter-mine system that can put a 
variety of minesweeping gear on the Type-312 boat. 
  (v) Depth charges and launchers 
  China began to copy Soviet-made depth charges in 1959. 
Beginning in the mid-1970s, it independently developed a number 
of depth charges. In 1975, the Model 75 rocket depth charge 
anti-submarine system was developed. Its launcher has 12 
barrels. It is capable of automatic angle setting, loading, and 
tracking and can be launched together or singly. In 1981, the 
710th Institute and the 282nd Plant jointly developed the Model 
81 depth charge anti-submarine system. The combustion gas is 
diverted laterally to reduce axial thrust. The tail of the 
rocket engine was modified to achieve two different ranges to 
expand the range of attack. 
<H5>  (2) Shipboard Gun Weapon Systems </H5>
  The shipboard gun is an important part of the weapons 
systems 
on surface vessels. The research and development of shipboard 
guns in China has evolved from manual operation to remote 
control and from separate control of a single gun to an entire 
weapon system. In the 1960s and 1970s, in order to meet the 
urgent need in the field, a number of factories and institutes 
under the 5th Ministry of Machine Building modified a batch of 
Soviet-made 57mm guns and copied Soviet-made twin 25mm, 30mm and 
37mm ship guns. As a result of this duplication effort, a 
prototype construction and production line was established and a 
large number of technical personnel were trained. 
  To develop independently shipboard weapon systems, the 
ordnance department of the Navy organized a team to develop a 
37mm ship gun in 1958. The 7th Research Academy established the 
713rd Institute in April 1963. With the cooperation of other 
relevant factories and institutes, they successfully developed a 
variety of shipboard gun weapon systems. 
  (i) Twin 37mm ship gun system 
  The shipbuilding engineering department of the China 
Shipbuilding Corporation was responsible for the development of 
this ship gun system and Wu Dimin [2976 2769 3046] was the 
technical person in charge. The 713th Institute was responsible 
for its design and the principal technical person there was Xie 
Qun [6200 5028]. The servo system of the gun was designed by the 
202nd Institute and produced by the 847th Plant. The twin 37mm 
gun used the ZPJ-4 electromechanical command panel designed by 
the 716th Institute and produced by the 454 Plant, the Model 341 
gun-laying radar developed by the Second Shanghai Radio Works, 
and the MZ-2 target display developed by the 559 Plant. After 
individual components such as the gun, command panel, and radar 
were finalized, the entire weapon system was tested on land and 
sea. It was found to perform well and to meet all 
specifications. In 1984, the design of this twin 37mm shipboard 
gun was finalized. It is the first small caliber shipboard gun 
system successfully developed by China. 
  (ii) Twin 100mm ship gun system 
  The shipbuilding engineering department was responsible for 
the development of this twin 100mm shipboard gun system and Liu 
Guoqing [0491 0948 1987] was the technical person in charge. The 
713th Institute was responsible for its design and the 4306 
Plant of the Navy and Shanghai Changcheng Elevator Plant were 
responsible for its production. The major technical people 
included Xu Jinmiao [1776 6855 8693] and Ying Yanlin [2019 1484 
2651]. The system employed the second-generation digital command 
panel developed by Yu Xichun [0151 1585 4783] of the 716th 
Institute, the Model 343 gun-laying radar designed by the 720th 
Institute and produced by the 4110 Plant, and the sighting 
system comprised of antennas and optical instrumentation 
designed by the 701st Institute and manufactured by the Hudong 
Shipyard. In 1982 and 1983, the entire system underwent design 
finalization tests at the Liaoxi ship gun test range on land and 
sea. In 1985, the design was officially finalized. This 
shipboard gun is more advanced and sophisticated and has better 
prospects for further development. 
  (iii) Twin 130mm shipboard gun system 
  This shipboard gun system is mounted on our first-generation 
guided missile destroyers. Its development was done by the 
overall assembly validation department of the 7th Research 
Academy. The principal technical people were Li Baiyun [2621 
4101 0061], Zhu Xibin [2612 6932 2430] and Gu Decai [0657 1795 
4101]. In 1968, the 713th Institute began to design the gun and 
its servo system and the First Heavy Machinery Plant was 
responsible for its production and the primary technical person 
was Zhong Jiabing [6988 0857 6333]. Initially, the shipboard gun 
system used a digital command panel designed and produced by 
Shen Anjia [3088 1344 1367] of the 308 Plant. Later, the system 
was improved to use the Model IA multi-processor distributive 
command panel that displays its major parameters in table form. 
Furthermore, it was equipped with the 343 radar designed by the 
720th Institute. Design finalization test for the twin 130mm 
shipboard gun was tested on land and sea in 1975 and 1980, 
respectively, at the Naval Test Base. Later, it was further 
improved to enhance its performance. 
  In the 1980s, the twin 37mm ship gun was improved to be a 
fully automatic, sealed, remote-controlled ship gun system. The 
twin 130mm gun became microprocessor controlled. In November 
1987, its design was finalized by the government and it was 
named the Model 76 twin 130mm shipboard gun system. In addition, 
we began to develop anti-missile ship gun systems and new ship 
gun systems. 
<H5>  (3) Navigation Equipment </H5>
  Onboard navigation equipment guides the ship along a 
pre-determined course to ensure safety. It also provides 
accurate information of the target, including heading, speed, 
position and attitude, to the weapon system by way of the 
command and control system. 
  China began to develop navigation equipment by duplicating 
Soviet-made conventional equipment such as the sextant. In 1960, 
the 707th Institute and Jiujiang Instrumentation Plant were 
established specifically for the development and production of 
navigation equipment. It began with copying Soviet-made 
navigation devices and gradually shifted toward independent 
development to meet different needs. Since the late 1960s, 
navigation technology has grown in areas such as inertial 
navigation and combined navigation. 
  (i) Inertial navigation 
  Inertial navigation is characterized by an independent 
navigation system that does not rely upon any external 
condition. It has excellent stealth capability and high 
precision and is an ideal navigation system for nuclear 
submarines and ocean-going instrumentation ships. In September 
1965, the 6th Ministry of Machine Building held a meeting to 
review different proposals for an inertial navigation system. 
Experts in inertial navigation, including Lu Yuanjiu [7120 0337 
0036], reviewed and positively affirmed the development plan for 
the 915 inertial navigation system prepared by the 707th 
Institute. After 4 years of work by the 707th Institute, the 
first prototype 915-1 inertial navigation equipment was 
constructed. However, there were still several remaining 
unresolved technical issues. Since 1974, the National Defense 
Science Commission, the National Defense Office and the lead 
engineering team for nuclear submarines and ocean-going 
instrumentation ships have organized a number of experts from 
different fields led by Ning Guodong [1337 0948 2767] and Zhang 
Zongxun [1728 1350 3169], to deal with the problems. The effort 
resulted in the development of the 915-IIA inertial guidance 
system. After going through stringent laboratory and field 
testing, more problems were found and resolved. This led to the 
development of the 915-IIB and IIC inertial guidance systems. 
They were installed on the ocean-going instrumentation ship and 
nuclear submarine, respectively. Since the 1980s, under the 
leadership of Wang Shunting [3076 7311 0080] and Li Zigang [2621 
3320 0474], a new inertial guidance system that is more reliable 
and adaptable to different environments has been developed. 
Results from field testing and expert appraisal indicate that 
the accuracy of the inertial guidance system is close to 
world-class level. 
  (ii) Astronavigation 
  An astronavigation system not only has the ability of 
independent navigation and location on a starlit night but also 
can dynamically and accurately correct the error accumulated as 
a result of the continuous operation of an inertial system. It 
is a necessity for a nuclear submarine or an ocean-going 
instrumentation ship. The 717th Institute began to develop the 
high accuracy Model 815 celestial guidance system and the Model 
820 astronavigation system in the mid-1970s. The 815 celestial 
guidance system employs a deck coordinate system. It uses the 
horizon data provided by the inertial guidance system to track 
the celestial body using a computer-controlled periscope. The 
accompanying K-5 computer was developed by the 709th Institute. 
The atomic clock was developed by the Hubei Institute of 
Physics. After 3 years of hard work, the 815 starlight 
navigation system was found to meet all design requirements 
through system testing and sea testing and then was installed on 
submarines. The 820 astronavigation system was developed by the 
717th Institute under the direction of Yang Ming [2799 2494] in 
collaboration with the 709th Institute, the 713th Institute and 
Changchun Institute of Optics and Fine Mechanics. It was 
completely assembled, tuned and tested at sea in 1978. In 1979, 
it passed technical appraisal and was installed on the 
ocean-going instrumentation ship. 
  (iii) Satellite navigation 
  In the early 1970s, the 1020th Institute and the Institute 
of 
Physics of the Chinese Academy of Sciences organized a technical 
team to develop satellite navigation equipment. Since China 
canceled its own navigation satellite program, a decision was 
made to use the signal from the NNSS transit satellite system of 
the United States to develop shipboard receivers. In 1979, Ma 
Yeqin [7456 0673 0530], et al. of the 1020th Institute developed 
such a receiver. It was installed on our ocean-going 
instrumentation and survey ships and completed numerous 
precision location measurements. In the mid-1980s, the 1020th 
Institute, the Department of Systems Engineering, the 750 Plant 
and the 765 Plant successfully developed a series of improved 
shipboard receivers, the WD-II and WYD-I satellite navigation 
systems, the WYD-II/Omega combination navigation system and a 
small satellite navigation system. A new territory in satellite 
navigation was created to serve as a foundation for future 
development of satellite navigation in China. 
  (iv) Combination navigation 
  Computers and software have been used in every field since 
the 1970s. Ship navigation systems are moving toward integrated 
combination systems. A combination navigation system was 
developed by the Department of Systems Engineering of the China 
Shipbuilding Industry Corporation under the direction of Luan 
Yongnian [2940 3057 1628]. They combined eight pieces of 
equipment used in inertial navigation, astronavigation, and 
satellite navigation to create a single computer controlled 
navigation system to provide accurate navigation and location 
information. Harbin Shipbuilding Institute, the 707th Institute 
and the Ship Systems Engineering Department also developed a 
variety of combination navigation systems for medium and large 
vessels such as the "Zhenghe" training ship, guided missile 
frigates, and destroyers. 
  In the past four decades, the development of navigation 
equipment in China has progressed from duplication to 
independent development. It has met our preliminary goal of 
serialization, generalization and automation and is marching 
toward high accuracy and reliability. 
<H5>  (4) Sonar Equipment </H5>
  Sonar equipment is used for underwater detection, location, 
tracking, and navigation. It is the underwater observation 
equipment for shipboard weapon systems. In 1956, sonar equipment 
was listed as a key issue in the national 12-year plan for 
science and technology. It has run through the course of three 
stages, i.e., duplication, independent development, and 
application of new technology. 
  (i) Submarine Sonar Equipment 
  China built a sonar equipment factory in the late 1950s. In 
the early 1960s, it began to duplicate sonar equipment for 
medium size torpedo submarines. In the mid-1960s, the 706th 
Institute began to develop the SQZ-3I and SQZ-3II general 
purpose sonar and TS-6 mine detecting sonar for submarine use. 
These devices were installed on nuclear submarines in 1970. In 
1975, they passed design finalization and went into production. 
During this period, the Institute of Acoustics of the Chinese 
Academy of Sciences, Jiangning Machinery Plant, and the Shanghai 
22nd Radio Plant also developed the SQW-3 sound-speed and 
sound-ray tracking plotter and the SQC-I reconnaissance sonar 
for nuclear submarines. The Dongfeng Machinery Plant and the 
Institute of Acoustics of the Chinese Academy of Sciences 
developed the SQZ-A general purpose sonar for conventionally 
powered submarines. Under close cooperation between the Navy and 
the Chinese Academy of Sciences and various industrial 
organizations, the 706th Institute completed the development of 
a variety of sonar equipment within a short period of time. 
  (ii) Surface Vessel Sonar Equipment 
  From the mid-1960s to the early 1980s, the 706th Institute, 
Jiangning Machinery Plant and Jiangxin Machinery Plant 
successfully developed the SJD-2, SJD-3, SJD-4 and SJD-5 
shipboard echo sonar and the SJC-1B reconnaissance sonar for 
various surface vessels to complete missions such as range 
finding and reconnaissance. 
  (iii) Communications Sonar 
  In 1965, Harbin Military Engineering Institute began to 
develop the SQX-3 submarine communications sonar and SJX-4 
surface vessel communications sonar. Later, the responsibility 
was transferred to the 706th Institute. The project was 
completed in 1982. These two sonars use a mosaic cylindrical 
transducer. It has a high transmission efficiency and reception 
sensitivity. It employs a lightweight glass truss and has 
excellent sound penetration. It has a large range and can 
identify friend from foe. When used on conventional submarines 
and guided missile frigates, it guarantees communications 
between submarine and surface ship. In order to solve the 
communications problem between submarine and surface ships, the 
Jiangning Machinery Plant developed the SJX-2 communications 
sonar. It passed production design finalization in September 
1974. The Jiangxin Machinery Plant also developed the SQX-1A and 
SQX-1B small dedicated communications sonar to be installed on 
deep-dive submarine rescue vessels and deep-dive vehicles. 
  (iv) Sonar Warfare Equipment 
  These are defensive devices that provide protection and 
confuse the enemy. In addition to the SQK-1 smoke bomb 
duplicated by the 718th Institute in the mid-1960s, other sonar 
warfare devices developed include the SQK-3 low frequency and 
SQK-3 high frequency interference device produced by the 718th 
Institute, 710th Institute and Shanghai 22nd Radio Plant. Design 
finalization and equipment deployment of these devices were done 
in 1987. Besides, the 750th Test Range and Jiangxin Machinery 
Plant developed the SQK-5 self-propelled and the SJK-6 towed 
decoys. 
  (v) Special Sonar Equipment 
  In addition to shipboard and submarine sonar equipment, 
China 
also developed a variety of special purpose sonar equipment, 
such as the SKD-41 aerially deployed sonar developed by the 
Northwestern Polytechnical University and the 706th Institute, 
the SKD-42A aerially deployed sonar developed by the 706th 
Institute, and the aerially deployed sonar developed by 
Northwestern Polytechnical University and the 872nd Plant. These 
sonars were found to perform well and passed technical appraisal 
and design finalization. Design finalization of the SKF-1 
passive all-directional sonar buoy, which was jointly developed 
by the 706th Institute, 972nd Plant, Jiangning Machinery Plant 
and 712nd Plant, was approved in 1967. Design finalization of 
the HF-2 aerially deployed non-directional sonar buoy, developed 
by the 872nd Plant, was passed in 1972. They are installed on 
seaplanes. Furthermore, certain organizations developed a 
land-based general purpose sonar, a long baseline location 
system, a torpedo sonar system and special sonar equipment for 
the test base. 
  In the 1980s, digital and microprocessor technology was 
introduced to sonar equipment in China. Emphasis was placed on 
design reliability. Major performance characteristics and 
capabilities are approaching those of similar foreign products 
in the early 1980s. 
<H5>  Section 6. Hydrodynamics Research and Experiments </H5>
  Hydrodynamics is the science that studies the relative 
motion 
between an object and a fluid, including the state of the object 
and that of the fluid and their mutual interaction. It is also 
the major basic science for military ship technology. 
Hydrodynamic experiments can predict the hydrodynamic behavior 
of a vessel in a variety of sea conditions so that modifications 
can be made to continuously improve the ship. It can provide the 
data needed to control the underwater trajectory and surfacing 
process of a missile launched under water. It also can create 
conditions necessary to develop a "quiet" submarine and to 
improve the performance of sonars and guided torpedoes. 
<H5>  (1) Construction of Hydrodynamics Research Organizations and </H5>
Experimental Facilities 
  Prior to 1949, there was no special research organization or 
experimental facility to study hydrodynamics. After the new 
government was founded, the Bureau of Shipbuilding Industry of 
the Ministry of Heavy Industry began to establish research 
organizations and experimental facilities for hydrodynamics. 
  (i) Creating an organization to conduct research on 
hydrodynamics 
  In 1950, the Bureau of Shipbuilding Industry decided to 
build 
a ship model test basin based on expert recommendation. In 1954, 
a small cantilever ship model test basin (major dimensions are 
70 x 5 x 2.5 m, speed 0.1-5 m/sec) designed by Yan Jiaji [7346 
1367 7535] and Ge Zhengyi [5514 2973 5030] to study ship fluid 
dynamics was constructed and put in operation in Shanghai. At 
the same time, the Institute of Ship Model Testing was created 
to perform the necessary tests. In 1965, the Institute of Ship 
Model Testing was renamed the Institute of Shipbuilding and 
began to investigate a plan for a large towing basin. In 1957, 
the Institute of Ship Science was established by the First 
Machine Building Ministry and Transportation Ministry. In the 
late 1950s, the Institute of Ship Science began to build a 
hydrodynamics research base in Wuxi. In this period, test basins 
and facilities were constructed at Shanghai Jiaotong University 
and Dalian Naval Machinery School. The First Naval Research 
Institute also built a deep ship model test basin. After the 
Seventh Research Academy was established in 1961, the 702nd 
Institute was established to study ship performance on the basis 
of some of the researchers at the Institute of Ship Science and 
the Ship Principle Laboratory of the First Naval Research 
Institute. Between 1961 and 1965, more than 300 college and 
professional school graduates in shipbuilding, electronics and 
mechanics were assigned to the 702nd Institute. It held high 
level classes on hydrodynamics to train key employees to bring 
the technical team up to speed. A foundation for the study of 
hydrodynamics was established. The major research effort was 
switched to the study of hydrodynamics associated with military 
vessels. 
  (ii) Construction of experimental facilities for 
hydrodynamics 
  In order to meet the need in the development of our 
first-generation military vessels, the State Planning Commission 
officially approved the construction of a large-scale 
hydrodynamics experimental facility in Wuxi in 1963. It was 
listed as a key national construction project. As a result of 
the effort of the 702nd Institute and other relevant 
organizations, China's largest deep-water ship model towing 
basin designed by Liu Xin [0491 7451], et al. of the 702nd 
Institute was completed and put into operation in 1965. By the 
end of the 1960s, the underwater explosion basin, large wave 
basin and jointed-arm basin were designed by the 702nd Institute 
and put into operation. 
  The deep-water ship model towing test basin is used to study 
the overall performance of ships. The basin is 474 m long, 7 m 
deep and 14 m wide in the middle and 7.5 m wide in other areas. 
A man-carrying frame is used. There are two tractors, one 
primarily for surface vessel models and the other for submarine 
models. There is a moving plate wave maker at the end of the 
basin. It can be used to measure the drag and cruising speed of 
a surface ship, submarine, or torpedo to facilitate model and 
profile selection. 
  The underwater explosion test basin is used to determine the 
capability of the underwater structure of a vessel to withstand 
an underwater explosion. The basin has a diameter of 85 m and a 
maximum depth of 16 m. It is equipped with a floating test 
platform. The basin and the measurement system in the laboratory 
are connected by a 60 channel coaxial cable. The test equipment 
includes a 20 MHz transient recorder and a computer controlled 
magnetic tape deck and a high-speed analysis system. This 
facility was at world class level at the time it was built. 
  The wave basin (environment simulation basin) is used to 
test 
the seakeeping quality of a surface vessel. It provides the data 
needed for ship design selection. The basin is 69 m long, 46 m 
wide and 4 m deep. It is equipped with a rotating bridge with a 
maximum angle of rotation of 45 degrees. A trailer is suspended 
under the bridge, which has a maximum speed of 4 m/sec. Air wave 
makers are installed on two adjacent sides of the basins, eight 
units along the short side and 13 units along the long side, to 
generate regular and irregular waves as desired. 
  The jointed-arm basin is used to determine the hydrodynamic 
characteristics of a ship model when it is turning on the 
surface or under water. The circular basin has a diameter of 48 
m and a depth of 4.5 m. The maximum rotating speed of the 
jointed arm is 1 radian/sec. At the maximum radius, it 
corresponds to a linear velocity of 20 m/sec. 
  From the early 1970s to the 1980s, the 702nd Institute 
designed and constructed a low speed wind tunnel, a large 
cavitation cylinder, a structure impact pool, a water/air basin 
and a variable pressure basin. 
  The low-speed wind tunnel is used to verify the 
maneuverability of underwater vessels in a moving fluid and to 
observe the air drag associated with a surface ship. The tunnel 
has an octagonal cross-section with a 3 m diameter. The 
experimental section is 8.5 m long. The maximum wind speed is 93 
m/sec. 
  The large cavitation cylinder is used to study the 
propulsive 
force, torque, and cavitation characteristics of propellers in 
order to select an optimal scheme. The cylinder is 0.8 x 3.2 m 
in dimension with a minimum cavitation factor of 0.15, maximum 
water speed of 20 m/sec, maximum propeller rotation speed of 
4,500 rpm, maximum propulsive force of 800 kg and maximum 
equivalent torque of 50 kg. 
  The structure impact basin is used to perform impact tests 
on 
ship structures. The basin is 15 m long, 5 m wide and 5 m deep. 
The maximum impact acceleration is 7 m/sec[.sup]2[/]. The 
basin is equipped with a hydraulically controlled medium 
strength impact tester to evaluate the effect of impact on 
shipboard equipment ranging from 200 kg to 2 tons. It also has a 
4 m free fall impact machine to perform single pulse impact 
experiments on small models ranging from 30 g to 100 kg and a 
fast Fourier analyzer that can perform mode recognition of a 
highly complex structure. 
  The water/air basin is used to study the motion of an object 
between air and water to provide background information required 
for the understanding of the entrance into the water of a 
submarine-fired missile or torpedo. China designed and developed 
two water/air basins. The one completed in the late 1970s is 25 
x 5.5 x 9.5 in dimension and has a maximum speed of 3 m/sec and 
an 18 x 10 m camera window. The large basin completed in the 
mid-1980s is 25 x 6.5 x 12.5 m. 
  The variable pressure basin is used to study the drag and 
propulsion of a ship model under cavitation and to determine the 
hydrodynamics of various weapons in simulated sea battle 
situations. The major dimensions of the basin are 150 x 7 x 4.5 
m, the maximum vacuum is 1/20 atm, and the highest trailer speed 
is 13 m/sec. 
  During this period, ship model testing basins were also 
constructed at the Zhongshan University, Shanghai Institute of 
Shipping and Transportation of the Ministry of Transportation, 
Wuhan College of Waterway Shipping Engineering, Dalian Institute 
of Engineering, Tianjin University, Nanjing Institute of 
Engineering, Shanghai Jiaotong University, Harbin Shipbuilding 
Engineering Institute and the 708th Institute. Northwestern 
Polytechnical University and the 605th Institute of the Ministry 
of Aerospace Industry also built test facilities to study the 
hydrodynamics of torpedoes and seaplanes. The high speed water 
cylinder constructed by Northwestern Polytechnical University is 
11.5 x 11.6 m in size. It has a working section that is 400 mm 
in diameter and 2,000 mm in length. The water speed can be 
varied from 0-18 m/sec and the pressure ranges from 0.2-3 
absolute atm. Under the direction of Chief Designer Huang 
Jingquan [7806 2529 3123], the cylinder was completed in 
September 1983. In November of the same year, its fine tuning 
was finished under the direction of the head of the water 
cylinder laboratory at the California Institute of Technology. 
It has an excellent flow field and acoustic property in the 
working section. In addition to routine studies such as 
cavitation, fluid dynamics, flow field visualization and 
analysis, it is capable of measuring and studying fluid dynamic 
noise of a body such as a torpedo. 
  These test facilities played a critical role in the 
development of military vessels, naval weapons and shipbuilding 
technology. 
  (iii) Developing experimental hydrodynamics techniques 
  Testing techniques are an important way to evaluate the 
level 
of experimental research in shipbuilding. During the course of 
constructing its experimental facilities in hydrodynamics, China 
also stressed the improvement and development of testing 
techniques. In the 1950s, steel wire or connecting rod 
navigation instruments were used in experiments. In the 1960s, 
electromechanical or electrical test devices were developed to 
overcome the shortcomings of mechanical devices to improve 
accuracy and efficiency. In the late 1970s, the 702nd Institute 
employed computer and digital control technology to develop a 
digital irregular wave maker and other digital instruments. In 
the 1980s, test apparatus in hydrodynamics research entered an 
era of automatic servo control and non-contact telemetry mode. 
In servo control and data processing, a microcomputer is 
integrated with the test apparatus to form an automated test 
system. Some towing basins can perform fully automated test and 
real time data processing on drag, sailing, and open-water 
experiments to improve efficiency. This signified that China had 
reached a new plateau in hydrodynamics testing techniques. 
Unique test instruments and techniques include: 
  Inclined flow cylinder to measure work done. This has an 
adjustment mechanism that is easy to operate. It is compact and 
has a small strain gauge transducer that is highly accurate. It 
may be used to test inclined flow of a propeller model in a 
cavitation cylinder. By coordinating with the upstream axis, it 
can be used to test propellers. With a 50 percent propeller 
force gauge, it can be used to adjust propeller and to study its 
dynamic characteristics to further expand the usefulness of the 
cylinder. 
  Digital flash camera system. This is fully digitally 
controlled and can be used to observe and take pictures of 
cavitation on any propeller blade. It may also be used to 
observe and photograph the motion of a vibrating or rotating 
object. 
  Variable torque cross-rocker. This is an effective means to 
study non-linear cross-rocking. It can expand the test range of 
a ship model to a maximum amplitude of 30 degrees in order to 
obtain its hydrodynamic coefficient. 
  2.6-meter camera/periscope. This is a special periscope that 
is directly installed in the towing basin to monitor the flow 
pattern around the ship model beneath the water surface and to 
observe other physical phenomena. It can take single-shot 
pictures at a fixed point or be used in continuous dynamic 
observation and photography. 
  Regeneration of inhomogenous cavitation flow field. An 
inhomogenous flow field is produced in a large cavitation 
cylinder with a skin-mounted screen to simulate flow field 
distribution at the stern. It offers a new way to study the 
pulsating pressure, activation force and corrosion resistance of 
the propeller. Its experimental accuracy is close to that of a 
comparable cavitation cavity abroad. 
  The development of new hydrodynamics test equipment and the 
improvement of the measurement standard indicates that China has 
made substantial progress to improve its testing capability in 
hydrodynamics. It plays a critical role in the development of 
military vessels and naval weaponry. 
<H5>  (2) The Role of Hydrodynamics Research in the Development of </H5>
Naval Weapon Systems and Equipment 
  (i) Effect on submarine development 
  The contribution of hydrodynamics research is most obvious 
in 
submarine development. In the mid-1960s, China decided to 
develop nuclear powered submarines. Under the direction of Zhang 
Jingcheng [1728 2529 6134], hydrodynamics research on nuclear 
submarines was initiated at the 720nd and 719th institutes. It 
had a major effect on ensuring its development progress and 
quality. 
  Selection of a tear drop profile. In the mid-1960s, research 
personnel and total assembly designers conducted over 30 
experiments on a variety of hydrodynamic models. By means of 
theoretical calculation and motion simulation, basic patterns 
governing various fluid dynamic parameters, motion 
characteristics and quickness of a tear drop shaped submarine 
were gradually understood. Methods for theoretical calculation 
and analysis were developed to meet the design needs. 
  Overall performance test for model selection. In 
coordination 
with total assembly design, the hydrodynamics research 
department conducted a variety of tests to compare a number of 
design schemes for torpedo and guided missile nuclear submarines 
in the model selection process. In addition, a variety of towing 
tests under different cruising conditions, dimension effect 
tests, propeller cavitation cylinder tests, and near surface 
effect tests have been performed to provide the necessary data 
for ship model selection and design verification. 
  Seakeeping quality experiments on models. Since the late 
1960s, the experimental hydrodynamics research department 
conducted numerous surface and near surface seakeeping quality 
tests on models to predict the performance of submarines. In 
1975, a special program was written based on theoretical 
calculation to provide data for underwater launching of missiles 
from a submarine. 
  Maneuverability experiments. During the technical design 
stage, the hydrodynamics research department conducted a number 
of mobility and maneuverability tests for the submarine to 
determine factors such as the geometric shape of the stabilizer 
fin and rudder, its major parameters, the hull layout, the 
rudder engine power, and the geometric position and efficiency 
of the rudder axis. In order to measure the rotation derivatives 
of the submarine, a wind tunnel forced vibration device, a phase 
analyzer and electric force balances were developed. The forced 
vibration device and a jointed-arm basin were used to measure 
the rotation derivative of the submarine. As a result, an 
experimental method and a program were established to measure 
the rotation derivatives of an underwater object. Wan Tingdeng 
[8001 1694 6989] et al. calculated the imaginary mass 
coefficients for the six degrees of freedom of a torpedo nuclear 
submarine using a binary slice method. Computer simulation was 
used to calculate the maneuverability of the submarine on the 
vertical and horizontal plane. 
  Study of explosion resistance and vibration characteristics. 
In order to determine the safety radius of the 
pressure-resistant hull, underwater explosion experiments were 
conducted at the reactor cabin, main engine room, and missile 
compartment. In order to measure the intrinsic frequency of the 
shock-reduction systems associated with the main and auxiliary 
engines, the vibration characteristics of the hull were studied 
experimentally. A method was developed to test and calculate the 
overall vibration of a submarine. Recommendations to improve the 
method were also presented. The vibration of the astronavigation 
system onboard a nuclear submarine was calculated to ensure that 
it operates normally at the cruising speed of the submarine. The 
study of submarine fluid dynamics not only provided important 
data for its development but also expanded the field of 
experimental research, raised the level of theoretical analysis, 
and educated a large number of technical people. It also 
promoted advances in the study of hydrodynamics associated with 
ships in China. 
  (ii) Effect on surface vessel development 
  Anti-submarine frigate. Because an anti-submarine frigate 
has 
four aft propellers, this presents a number of problems in the 
design of the aft profile. To this end, the design department 
prepared more than 10 designs of various lengths and profiles. 
Satisfactory results were obtained from drag and other 
hydrodynamic tests in experimental basins. Finally, a round 
design was adopted. After the first prototype was constructed, 
additional improvements were made on the aft profile and 
accessory layout based on tests done on the actual vessel. The 
propeller load was adjusted to raise the cruising speed of ships 
built later by 0.5 knot. It created a new approach to the study 
and design of the hydrodynamics of surface vessels. 
  Guided missile destroyer. The development of the 
first-generation guided missile destroyer began in 1965. It has 
a high tonnage and high cruising speed. A round bow design was 
used for the first time. A great deal of hydrodynamics research 
and ship model experiments were conducted in order to predict 
the quickness and seakeeping quality of the vessel and to select 
the optimal profile and major dimensions. Actual ship test 
results showed that the ship profile not only ensures high speed 
but also excellent seakeeping quality. It is the successful 
model. In 1975, in order to meet requirements in advanced 
research on a new destroyer, a series of studies was conducted 
on the quickness of destroyers. By way of experimentation, 
dynamic drag and effective power as a function of length to 
width ratio and rectangular coefficient and effect of location 
and size of the spherical bow on its drag were obtained. Methods 
were developed to calculate the stability of surface vessels, 
including destroyers, under the combined effect of wind and 
waves and wave impact when a vessel sails against the wind. 
  Ocean-going instrumentation fleet. On the basis of special 
requirements of the ocean-going instrumentation fleet, 
comprehensive experiments were done on all major ship models to 
determine their hydrodynamic characteristics. Furthermore, 
certain key problems associated with these vessels were 
resolved. For instance, the load of an ocean-going surveying 
ship is highly variable and is concentrated in the middle of the 
vessel. It has a major impact on the bending resistance of its 
hull in heavy seas and on the swaying period of the ship, which 
directly affect the measurements. The situation was clarified by 
way of hydrodynamics experiment. The problem was resolved by 
adopting a series of measures in the overall design of the 
vessel. In addition, excellent results were obtained from a 
winch cable tension experiment for the ocean-going supply ship. 
  (iii) Impact on weapon development 
  In the 1960s, research on the hydrodynamics and 
maneuverability of torpedo was initiated at the 705th Institute 
and Northwestern Polytechnical University. In the late 1960s, in 
coordination with the effort to develop an electrically powered, 
sound-guided anti-submarine torpedo, the 702nd Institute 
conducted a study on a special torpedo engine. A theoretical 
method to calculate circulation near a rotating propeller was 
presented. It provided the data necessary for the development of 
a low-noise propeller. Furthermore, experimental studies on jet 
propulsion and low-noise torpedo head profiles were also 
performed. Since the 1980s, studies have been done on water 
impact hydrodynamics, cavitation development pattern, and 
hydroballistic with cavitation associated with torpedoes dropped 
from aircraft. Exploratory work was done on water impact 
buffering and on submersion stability technology. 
  To assist the development of guided missile nuclear powered 
submarine, Cheng Guanyi [4453 6306 0001], et al. at the 702nd 
Institute initiated a series of studies on underwater missile 
ignition, missile surfacing process and missile attitude 
maintenance since the early 1970s. They launched more than 3,000 
underwater vertical launches of missile models and successfully 
predicted a number of performance parameters such as attitude 
and scatter which are in good agreement with actual test 
results. In addition, schemes to modify the missile profile and 
to expand the tail were presented to improve its hydrodynamics 
upon leaving the water. 
  (iv) Strengthening technology reserve in hydrodynamics 
research 
  Study of cavitation mechanism. The 702nd Institute did a 
great deal of work on the effect of flow state, air content and 
propeller roughness upon the inception, growth, and 
disappearance of cavitation. Theoretically, a linear and a 
non-linear solution for circulating flow were developed. This 
provides a basis for cavitation-free, low-cavitation and 
cavitation-resistant design to minimize noise, drag, corrosion 
and vibration. 
  Study of ship noise. Hydrodynamics research made it possible 
to reduce ship noise and to develop long-range sonar. The 702nd 
Institute, with the cooperation of the 725th Institute, the 
Institute of Acoustics of the Chinese Academy of Sciences, and 
Tianjin Institute of Rubber Research, conducted experimental 
research to reduce submarine propeller noise by using a 
sound-absorbing material in its inner cavity. This reduced the 
effect of engine noise on its own sonar. In addition, studies on 
hydrodynamic noise and noise reduction mechanisms and the 
boundary layer of a moving object in water were also initiated 
in preparation for the development of low-noise, high 
performance, "quiet" ships and weapons. 
  Improving combat capability in different sea conditions. In 
the 1960s, Liu Chuxue [0491 2806 1331] at the 702nd Institute 
began to study the seakeeping quality of guided missile 
destroyers and other vessels. It began with predicting the 
behavior of the ship under regular and irregular wave 
conditions. It eventually resulted in the development of a ship 
design optimization method that balances both seakeeping quality 
and quickness requirements. It allows us to use a computer to 
directly select the optimal ship profile based on the tactical 
requirements. In addition, based on slice theory, a 
three-dimensional hydrodynamics method to calculate ship motion 
was developed through theoretical and experimental studies on 
the seakeeping qualities of hydrofoils, catamarans, 
shallow-draught vessels and engineering ships. These 
experimental results will further improve the combat 
capabilities of our ships. 
  Study on ship propellers. Since the late 1970s, in the 
process of improving the propeller of conventional submarines, 
the hydrodynamics research department designed a new propeller 
using a theoretical method based on the lift line and lift 
surface of a circulating flow. The underwater speed of the 
submarine was raised by 1 knot, propeller cavitation ceased and 
noise was substantially reduced. In addition, through a series 
of cavitation cylinder tests for various propellers, researchers 
established the experimental patterns for all the propellers 
used in China. Studies on energy-conserving propellers and jet 
propulsion were initiated. A perfected design was established 
for water jet propulsion. On the basis of theoretical research 
on propeller lift line and lift surface and propeller cavitation 
mechanisms, a comprehensive design method and experimental 
procedure have been established. This has an important effect on 
the design of a high-efficiency propeller. 
  After nearly four decades of construction and development, 
China has created a relatively complete system for hydrodynamics 
research that is centered around the experimental facilities at 
Wuxi Hydrodynamics Research Center. It includes higher learning 
institutions and related industrial organizations. We have a 
high-level technical team that is well trained and experienced. 
It plays a critical role in the development of naval vessels, 
naval weapons and equipment and shipbuilding. 
  Since the founding of the our new government, China has 
designed and built more than 6,000 military vessels and 
developed a variety of weapons and equipment. Their performance 
levels are continuously improving. Some military vessels and 
certain technological fields are approaching world-leader level. 
Nevertheless, compared to other countries, there is a 
substantial gap in weapons and electronics. China will continue 
to strengthen its basic and applied research on shipbuilding 
technology. It will concentrate on key technologies involving 
air defense, anti-submarine warfare, early warning systems, and 
anti-missile warfare. A new generation of ships and weapons will 
be developed to contribute to the defense of the long coastline 
of China. 
<H5>  Chapter XXI. Testing of Conventional Naval Weapon Systems </H5>
and Equipment 
  The tactical and technical characteristics of conventional 
naval weapons and equipment must be evaluated under near-combat 
conditions. Except for a few that can be directly tested by 
naval forces in the field, most weapons and equipment must 
undergo tests for development, verification, and design 
finalization at a base that is equipped with special facilities 
and instrumentation. To this end, the Navy built a variety of 
test sites for conventional weapons while it constructed the 
guided missile test range to create a comprehensive test base 
for naval weapons and equipment. 
<H5>  Section 1. Construction of Naval Conventional Weapon Systems </H5>
and Equipment Test Ranges 
  Based on the need to build up naval weapons and equipment, 
the Central Military Commission decided to establish an 
organization to oversee the testing of naval conventional 
weapons and equipment in January 1964. In December 1965, with 
the approval of the Chief of Staff Command, the conventional 
weapons testing department of the naval test range was created 
to plan the construction of test ranges for underwater weapons, 
shipboard guns, and guidance systems. Huang Jingwen [7806 2529 
2429] was the department head and Wang Jiahe [3769 1367 0735] 
was the political advisor. 
  Because various naval weapons have different test conditions 
and requirements, it was decided to build a shallow-water 
weapons test range in Liaonan and a shipboard gun test range and 
a guidance equipment test laboratory in Liaoxi. In July 1966, 
the National Defense Science Commission, the Navy, and the Sixth 
Ministry of Machine Building jointly reviewed the construction 
plan for the test ranges. The Navy then began to carry the 
construction work. In the 1970s and 1980s, in response to 
advances in conventional weapons and equipment, a deep-water 
test range and an electronic warfare test site were built in the 
South China Sea with the approval of the State Council and the 
Central Military Commission to conduct tests on deep-sea weapons 
and electronic warfare equipment. 
<H5>  (1) Construction of Shallow-Sea Underwater Weaponry Test </H5>
Range 
  Testing of underwater weaponry primarily depends upon sonar 
measurement because the tests are affected by water propagation 
characteristics. It is more difficult and involves complex 
technology. After survey and validation work, the Navy chose to 
build China's first shallow-sea underwater weaponry test range 
in Liaonan (Liaonan Test Range). Song Peihua [1345 1014 5478] 
was the director and Qi Qingshan [7871 3237 1472] was the deputy 
political advisor. They were responsible for the construction of 
the test range and for the organization of underwater tests of 
torpedoes, mines, and depth charges. 
  (i) Construction of torpedo test facilities 
  The key issues in organizing torpedo testing are the 
construction of test facilities and development of accurate and 
reliable instruments. In the mid- and late 1960s, before the 
Liaonan Test Range was completed, thermally powered 
automatically controlled anti-ship torpedoes were tested along 
the coast in Qingdao, Lushun, and Zhoushan to meet our urgent 
needs. These tests required the mobilization of our ships over 
long periods of time. Moreover, measurements were made using 
outdated techniques. Very little data was gathered with poor 
accuracy. It was very difficult to provide a scientific 
evaluation of torpedo performance to meet the objectives of the 
tests. It was concluded that a fixed test launch facility with 
special instrumentation had to be constructed before additional 
torpedo tests could be conducted. As a result of the hard work 
done by the naval test range conventional weaponry testing 
department, the first sea-based fixed torpedo launch facility in 
China was completed in 1972. The facility is 20 m long, 18 m 
wide and 18.7 m high. The portion above the waterline is 7.2 m 
high and has three stories. It is equipped with a surface ship 
and submarine torpedo launch systems to simulate the firing of 
anti-ship torpedoes from surface ships and submarines, 
respectively. The facility is connected to a pier by a 240 m 
steel beam bridge which is used to transport torpedoes. Multiple 
torpedoes tests can be conducted daily. This not only 
substantially reduced the number of ships required but also more 
importantly created an initial condition to conduct controlled 
torpedo testing. It accurately maintains the bearing and 
attitude of the torpedo and eliminates any incidental factors 
that are associated with the motion of the ship to more reliably 
determine the performance of the torpedo. 
  In order to evaluate the performance of a self-guided 
torpedo, a standard acoustic target is needed. In 1972, Meng 
Qingji [1322 1987 3444] of the Liaonan Test Range proposed a 
preliminary simulated noise source. It was further developed by 
the Nanjing Institute of Engineering. In 1982, the Institute of 
Acoustics of the Chinese Academy of Sciences developed a torpedo 
automatic noise tracking correlator to measure its underwater 
trajectory. During this period, Liaonan Test Range and Qiqihar 
Second Northern Radio Plant developed an internal magnetic 
recorder for torpedoes. These devices worked well in torpedo 
testing. 
  (ii) Construction of torpedo test facility 
  In the early years of the Liaonan Test Range torpedo testing 
was crude. Its technical staff, on one hand, managed to complete 
their assignments with what they had. At the same time, they 
were actively engaged in the development of test equipment. In 
1970, Pan Shangbin [3382 1424 2430] of the Liaonan Test Range 
presented a fuse testing scheme. It was manufactured by the 
721st Plant. The main component of this device is installed on a 
ship and the torpedo is equipped a sonar transponder. In 1980, 
Pan Shangbin designed a telemetry unit that transmitted the fuse 
signal via radio, instead of sonar. It was successfully 
developed by the 884th Plant. It satisfied the requirements of 
simultaneous multiple torpedo testing at high cruising speeds. 
Determination of the power of an underwater explosion is 
critical to the understanding of the charge loading to produce 
an even larger destructive effect. The Liaonan Test Range 
cooperated with the 702nd Institute and the Institute of 
Mechanics of the Chinese Academy of Sciences to develop a 
pressure measurement device for underwater explosion in the 
mid-1970s. It preliminarily solved the problem associated 
measuring underwater explosion produced with torpedoes loaded 
with a large amount of explosives. In the 1980s, Zhao Hongchun 
[6392 3163 2504], Li Changqiong [2621 2490 8825] and Zhao Lin 
[6392 3829] of the Liaonan Test Range and Zhang Jincheng [1728 
6855 1004] and Lu Zhongli [4151 1813 4409] of the Institute of 
Mechanics of the Chinese Academy of Sciences jointly developed a 
digital remote explosion pressure gauge to improve the 
reliability of the equipment. In the mid-1980s, under the 
direction of Associate Director Cheng Yankang [4453 1693 1660] 
of the Institute of Mine Research, a microcomputer-based remote 
underwater explosion pressure measurement system was 
successfully developed by using two-stage computer control, 
multiple redundancy technology and modular IC structure to 
create a new generation of equipment for underwater explosion 
measurement. 
  (iii) Construction of depth charge test facility 
  The most important tactical and technical specification to 
evaluate during the testing of a depth charge is its sinking 
speed. Liaonan Test Range worked with Beijing University and the 
612th Plant to develop an instrument to measure the underwater 
trajectory of a rocket-propelled depth charge. In conjunction 
with the fixed-depth sounder/speedometer developed by the depth 
charge laboratory of the Liaonan Test Range, problems associated 
with the measurement of sinking speed were resolved. 
  After over two decades of construction, Liaonan Test Range 
has completed more than 100 test assignments on torpedoes, 
mines, and depth charges. The testing of underwater weaponry is 
becoming standardized. 
<H5>  (2) Construction of Ship Gun Test Range </H5>
  Shipboard guns and land-based guns have a great deal in 
common. In order to make full use of the test range for 
land-based guns, usually testing for individual gun and charge 
performance is done at the Baicheng Conventional Weaponry Test 
Range. However, land testing cannot reflect the actual field 
conditions such as wave interference, multiple path effect and 
environmental factors such as salt, fog, and mildew that the 
weapon system will experience when it is installed on board a 
ship. It is also hard to effectively simulate the 
characteristics of an enemy "target" approaching by sea. 
Therefore, a special sea test range was built in Liaoxi. It is 
responsible for the testing of ship guns, command panels, 
radars, and optical instruments. Key facilities constructed for 
the ship gun test range include the coastal test front, testing 
shop and data processing and instrumentation room. The coastal 
testing front is 100 m offshore and 50 m below sea level. The 
target approaches from the ocean to reflect true sea background 
conditions such as wave interference and multiple path effect. 
  Since the mid-1960s, on the basis of the needs of different 
testing assignments, it has been equipped with optical 
measurement instruments, high accuracy radar, various gun 
targets, ship targets, air targets, parachute targets and towed 
targets. It has completed the design finalization for more than 
20 models of weaponry in over 50 projects. 
<H5>  (3) Establishment of Navigational Equipment Test Institution </H5>
  In the mid-1960s, the National Defense Science Commission 
and 
the Navy decided to establish a navigational equipment test 
institute in the naval test range conventional weaponry testing 
department. It is primarily responsible for the testing of 
compasses, range-detectors, depth-detectors, azimuth levels, 
inertial navigation systems, astronavigation systems and radio 
navigation systems. For over 20 years, with increasing test 
loads on navigational equipment and more demanding testing 
requirements, the institute has gradually installed a variety of 
instruments to acquire and store data in order to perform 
equipment appraisal and design-finalization tests. The degree of 
automation in sea testing is improved. A set of equipment 
calibration procedures was established. A test protocol for 
design finalization was formulated. It has performed over 40 
assignments to test navigational equipment. 
<H5>  (4) Establishment of Follow-Up Deep-Water Test Range </H5>
  In the mid-1960s, during the planning stage of the shallow 
sea Liaonan Test Range, the construction of a deep water test 
range was considered to perform testing on deep water torpedoes, 
explosives, depth charges, sonar and deep-water behavior of 
submarines. In 1973, after the Navy completed a preliminary 
survey, with the approval of the State Council and the Central 
Military Commission, a follow-up deep-water test range was being 
built in the South China Sea. Qian Yueren [6929 6390 0117] was 
the commander and Hu Riheng [5170 2480 5899] was the political 
advisor. To choose an ideal deep-water region, the Naval Test 
Base organized two survey trips in 1973 and 1977. They 
recommended two test ranges, southeast of Hainan Island and near 
the Xisha Islands. Their recommendation was approved. Soon 
afterward, construction of the deep-water test range and sea 
test facilities began. 
  Deep-water weapons testing is more demanding as far as test 
facilities and conditions are concerned. The deep-water test 
range has four fully-functional mother ships and auxiliary 
vessels that are equipped with advanced testing and operating 
equipment such as target mines, sonar tracking systems, sonar 
location systems, radio location systems, manned diving vessels 
and remote-control diving vehicles. In order to improve the 
technical level of the testing staff, the deep-water test range 
sent two groups of people abroad for additional training. During 
their training period, they made great advances in breaking the 
world deep-diving record. In 1985, the Navy successfully 
completed its first 200 m simulated deep dive. The Hainan 
Deep-Water Test Range was one of the participating units. In May 
and June 1988, the Hainan Deep-Water Test Range smoothly 
completed the deep-water launch of a self-guidance torpedo. 
<H5>  (5) Building Electronic Countermeasures Test Site </H5>
  In order to improve electronic warfare capability of the 
Navy, it is necessary to conduct scientific experiments under 
combat conditions. In the mid-1970s, the State Council and the 
Central Military Commission decided to build a naval electronic 
warfare test site to conduct strategic and tactical tests of 
countermeasures equipment, to perform in-flight tests and to 
provide training. After surveying different areas along the 
coast and near inland lakes, with the approval of the Chief of 
Staff Command, it was built in the Bohai region. In November 
1981, the test site was officially created. Fang Juzheng [2075 
1446 2973] was the commander and Wang Dianlong [3769 3013 7893] 
was its political advisor. 
  To accelerate the construction of this electronic warfare 
test site, the Navy and the National Defense Science, Technology 
&amp; Industry Commission provided funding to equipment the site 
with a measurement radar, infrared thermal imaging system, 
infrared intensity radiometer, and wide-band radar system to 
meet the requirements in measuring targets of different 
characteristics in different bands with high accuracy. In order 
to precisely reflect the reflection area of an interference 
shell, the test site built wooden launch vessels. Furthermore, 
it began applied research on simulated analog tests. In the 
meantime, it initiated an effort to resolve problems associated 
with multiple-target testing and the simulation testing 
engineering system. 
  In 1988, the electronic warfare test site was built up to a 
certain scale. A test team was formed. It has completed 62 
testing assignments and tactical electronic warfare drills. 
<H5>  Section 2. Torpedo Tests </H5>
  Modern torpedoes are concealed prior to launching a surprise 
attack. They hit the most vulnerable part of a vessel below the 
water line. Hence, the testing is highly complex and demands a 
great deal from the test facility. China began to organize 
torpedo tests in the 1960s and solved a series of complicated 
technical issues associated with underwater measurement. 
Moreover, the testing has been extended from shallow water to 
deep water, and from self-control to self-guidance torpedoes. 
The testing organization and level continues to improve to 
smoothly complete various assignments. 
<H5>  (1) Test of Air-to-Ship, Ship-to-Ship, and Submarine-to-Ship </H5>
Torpedoes 
  (i) Test of air-to-ship torpedoes 
  In November 1960, the Navy organized the first air-drop test 
for its jet-propelled air-to-ship torpedo in Lushun. It was a 
solid rocket engine torpedo which was deployed by an H-5 bomber 
from high altitude. Due to the poor technical level in 
production and testing, it was terminated because the cause of 
failure of the first torpedo was never found. Until the 374th 
Plant was constructed to exclusively manufacture air-to-ship 
torpedoes, the production of this model of air-to-ship torpedo 
was arranged. 
  In July-September 1969, a design-finalization test of the 
jet-propelledair-to-ship torpedo was organized by the Liaonan 
Test Range. In this test, the external trajectory was measured 
by three theodolites. The internal trajectory was measured with 
an internal tracking recorder. Explosive targets were deployed 
on the surface; 24 torpedoes were launched. Although some data 
was obtained, the tests were still not satisfactory. Later, on 
the basis of progress in air defense weapons, the air drop 
altitude was changed. The 374th Plant, Navy representatives at 
the plant and the Liaonan Test Range jointly conducted a study. 
A rudder was added to the torpedo and the top fin of the torpedo 
was modified to reduce the angle of entrance into the water. In 
March-April 1970, an air-to-ship torpedo test involving 39 
torpedoes was organized by Deputy Chief Li Qiushun [2621 3061 
7311] of the Torpedo Laboratory at Liaonan Test Range. The 
performance of the jet-propelled air-to-ship torpedo was found 
to meet all specifications. Consequently, it passed the design 
finalization test. 
  (ii) Test of ship (submarine)-to-ship torpedoes 
  In 1965, the Navy organized the first sea test of its 
thermally-powered self-control ship (submarine)-to-ship torpedo 
in Qingdao and launched more than 100 torpedoes. Because of the 
simple experiment setup, very little data was taken. It was more 
difficult to draw any precise conclusions. In 1970, the Navy 
organized another test on this model of torpedo in Lushun and 
Zhoushan. Over a period of more than a year, involving more than 
615 submarines, fast boats and supply ships, over 500 torpedoes 
were launched. The measurement apparatus in that test was 
improved. Important parameters such as the cruising speed, 
depth, and transverse roll of the torpedo were obtained. 
However, the accuracy was still poor. Other ballistic parameters 
of the torpedo were still not available. The test was 
reorganized to evaluate the overall performance of this torpedo 
after the Liaonan Test Range was constructed. Finally, the 
design-finalization test for the thermally powered self-control 
ship (submarine)-to-ship torpedo was completed. 
<H5>  (2) Test of Acoustically Guided Anti-Submarine Torpedo </H5>
  In 1972, Li Qiushun and Zhang Guoyi [1728 0948 5030] of the 
Liaonan Test Range organized the design-finalization test for a 
dual-plane passive acoustic anti-submarine torpedo, i.e., the 
Y-3 torpedo. The result showed that the torpedo design was a 
success. In March-October 1983, a production model finalization 
test for the Y-3 was done at the Liaonan Test Range. The 
National Defense Science, Technology &amp; Industry Commission, 
Navy, China Shipbuilding Industry Corporation, and National 
Defense Office in Yunnan sent people to guide the test. This 
test was executed by director Li Anliang [2621 1344 0081] and 
associate directors Meng Qingji and Tian Yichun [3944 0110 2504] 
of the test site. The Lushun Naval Base, the North Sea Fleet and 
Naval Test Base collaborated with the test site. Eleven vessels, 
including destroyers, submarines, patrol boats, target ships and 
mine retrievers were used; 43 torpedoes were launched. The test 
results showed that all major tactical specifications such as 
speed, range, depth, transverse roll, effective guidance range 
and guidance accuracy were met. Nevertheless, problems such as 
malfunction in guidance tracking and the fuse trigger due to the 
marine environment and internal electronic interference were 
also found. A team comprised of development, testing personnel, 
and end users was organized on site to deal with the problems. 
Chief Designer Yang Baosheng [2799 0202 3932] and Associate 
Chief Designer Jiang Lainfang [3068 6647 2455] analyzed the 
problems with their technical staff and finally resolved all the 
issues to complete the test. In March 1984, a follow-up 
production model finalization test on the Y-3 torpedo was 
conducted at the Liaonan Test Range to address issues concerning 
the storage and use of such torpedoes onboard of a submarine. 
The tests listed in the outline were successfully completed. 
Since then, China has had its first generation of independently 
developed passive acoustic anti-submarine torpedoes for its 
nuclear-powered submarines. 
  In late May 1988, a deep-water test on the Y-3 torpedo 
launched from a nuclear submarine was done at the deep-water 
test range in the South China Sea. The result showed that the 
torpedo launch system could safely handle the launch of a 
torpedo at great depths. After a torpedo is launched at a great 
depth, its guidance system could capture its target to begin 
automatic tracking. If the target was lost, the torpedo could 
reinitiate a search to guide itself to the target. This 
deep-water test also demonstrated that the Y-3 was a success. 
<H5>  (3) Test of Acoustic Antiship Torpedo </H5>
  (i) Test of the Y-4A 
  In March 1977, the first test to improve the design of the 
Y-4 torpedo was conducted at Liaonan Test Range. The overall 
tactical performance of the torpedo was appraised to prove that 
the improved design was essentially successful. 
  In September 1979, the newly produced Y-4 torpedo underwent 
its second sea test at Liaonan Test Range. Problems such as high 
noise in the guidance beam, unreliable depth variation and fuse 
malfunction at the terminal stage were found in the test. After 
corrective measures were taken, it was tested for the third time 
in June 1980. The results showed that the overall performance 
was excellent, the fuse was reliable and stable and the guidance 
beam was uniform. 
  In July 1981, associate director Meng Qingji of Liaonan Test 
Range organized a production model finalization test for the 
Y-4. This test involved 56 vessels, including guided missile 
frigates, submarines, fast patrol boats and auxiliary ships, and 
launched 78 torpedoes. Other than fuse malfunction, other design 
specifications were met. After the problem was resolved by the 
874th and 872nd Plants, a follow-up test on the torpedo fuse was 
successfully completed in the East China Sea in December 1982. 
This is an improved version of China's first-generation passive 
guidance anti-ship torpedo. 
  (ii) Test of the Y-4B 
  From the late 1960s to the late 1970s, Northwestern 
Polytechnical University conducted a series of scientific 
experiments on the active and passive acoustic guidance, 
non-contact fuse and small electronic depth controller of the 
Y-4B. The focus was on the evaluation of the performance of the 
guidance system and the non-contact fuse of the torpedo and the 
feasibility of cruising at a great depth with stability. In 
March 1982, Director Li Anliang of the Liaonan Test Range 
organized a test on the sea to finalize the design of the Y-4B. 
With the collaboration of Liu Feng [0491 6912], Xie Yiqing [6200 
0001 3237] and Li Zhishun [2621 1807 5293] of Northwestern 
Polytechnical University and the 874th and 872nd Plants, most of 
the items being tested went along smoothly. Major tactical and 
technical parameters such as overall design, guidance, fuse and 
depth control were found to meet our specifications. The 
development effort was a success. In particular, for the first 
time depth control was done electronically, instead of 
mechanically. This significantly improved the performance of the 
torpedo. However, it caused a scatter in its effective active 
self-guidance range. This problem was resolved by following the 
recommendation to calibrate the active guidance "time control 
curve" section by section proposed by Peng Haifa [1756 3189 
4099] of the Liaonan Test Range and by changing the vertical 
attitude of the transponder transducer as proposed by Chief 
Zhang Shihe [1782 1709 3109] of the Liaonan Test Range. 
  In March 1987, the Y-4B production model finalization test 
was conducted at the Liaonan Test Range. The test was organized 
by Director Tian Yichun and Associate Director Chen Zhibin [7115 
1807 1755]. Organizations involved include various departments 
of the Navy, Northwestern Polytechnical University, and the 872, 
874 and 482 plants. A total of 58 vessels were used and 63 
torpedoes were launched in this test. The results showed that 
all performance indicators of the torpedo met tactical and 
technical specifications. In this test, the "Test Procedure for 
Torpedo Design Finalization" written by Zhang Shihe and Tian 
Yichun of the Liaonan Test Range was used. Under the premise of 
ensuring the reliability of the test data, this procedure 
reduces the number of torpedoes required for such a test. It 
shortens the test period and improves the test efficiency. 
  The successful development of the Y-4B filled a void in 
active/passive acoustic anti-ship torpedo. 
<H5>  (4) Test of Light Acoustic Anti-Submarine Torpedo </H5>
  In 1989, a light-weight active/passive acoustic 
anti-submarine torpedo was tested on a lake at the 750th test 
site. From September to November of the same year, it was tested 
for its bottom searching capability at the the Liaonan Test 
Range. The testing of this torpedo is more complicated. It was 
jointly organized by the Navy and China Shipbuilding Industry 
Corporation. The National Defense Science, Technology &amp; 
Industry 
Commission sent its own staff to provide guidance. Vice 
Commander of the Navy, Li Jing [2621 2529], arrived at the scene 
to inspect the preparation work. Naval Test Base Command Wang 
Huique directed the test at sea. Commander Wang Chaofan [3769 
6389 0416] of the naval test region acted as the test group 
leader. Chief Wang Ruiyuan [3769 3843 3293] of Liaonan Test 
Range was the deputy test leader. He was in charge of organizing 
the tests. In the tests, the Surveyer-2, 3 and 4 of the Nanhai 
Deep-Water Test Range were responsible for launching torpedoes 
and deploying tracking and measurement instruments. Surveyer-3 
and 4 encountered very rough weather when they were deploying 
external trajectory tracking equipment. Gale winds exceeded 
level 10. They fought this kind of weather for 2 days and a 
night. Despite fatigue and bad weather, the safety of the ships 
and personnel was ensured. Furthermore, they continued to work, 
especially the divers, who successfully deployed the targets in 
strong currents at low temperature to contribute to the 
successful completion of the test. 
  With close cooperation of personnel from the Liaonan Test 
Range, the Nanhai Deep-Water Test Range, the 705th Institute, 
the 874 Plant and the 872 Plant, the test lasted 67 days. It 
mobilized nine ships and a helicopter. Fifteen torpedoes were 
fired to obtain data such as searching, tracking, researching 
trajectory, active self-guidance effective range, false alarm 
rate, torpedo speed, and tracking of a moving target. The 
results showed that this light active/passive acoustic 
anti-submarine torpedo had met all major tactical specifications 
listed in the development plan. This provides the data for 
design finalization. 
<H5>  Section 3. Test of Mines and Anti-Submarine Weaponry and </H5>
Equipment 
  The purpose of testing mines and anti-submarine weaponry and 
equipment is to evaluate their strategic and tactical 
performance in near combat situations. Due to limitations 
imposed by the test conditions, development tests and 
performance evaluations of mines are usually carried out by 
various naval fleets in conjunction with the development and 
production organizations. Since the construction of the Liaonan 
Test Range over 20 years ago, it has completed 43 tests on mines 
and deployed nearly 1,000 mines. Close to 100 armed mines were 
exploded. In addition, it also completed the testing of 
depth-charge anti-submarine systems and torpedo anti-submarine 
systems. 
<H5>  (1) Test of Mines </H5>
  Location is the difficult task in mine tests. Not only does 
a 
moving target need to be located but also the position of an 
underwater mine must be determined. They require a long period 
of time. Usually, it requires 6-8 hours to continuously locate 
the target and mines. There is a large variety of mines and each 
requires a different test method. 
  (i) Mine explosion tests 
  The pressure and power of an exploding mine are of interest. 
To solve this problem, more than 100 anchored mines, drift 
mines, and sunk mines loaded with different amounts of charges 
were exploded at the Liaonan Test Range between July 1970 and 
October 1988. A number of explosion pressure measurement 
systems, such as a digital remote explosion pressure sensing 
system and a microcomputer-based underwater explosion pressure 
monitoring system, were used in the test. The results showed 
that mines developed by China are very powerful and destructive. 
The effective radius of the fuse is consistent with the 
destructive radius of the explosive. In the meantime, the tests 
also provided valuable data for the development of new mine 
fuses and ship designs. 
  (ii) Tests of M-1B mine 
  The M-1B mine was a modified version of the M-1 mine. It was 
developed by the 701st Institute of the Seventh Research Academy 
by adding a displacement acoustic fuse to the M-1. Its 
design-finalization test was performed in September through 
December 1981 at the Liaonan Test Range. This test involved the 
use of frigates to drop 21 depth charges and two armed mines. It 
evaluated the M-1B's resistance against an exploding neighboring 
mine, fuse action, resistance against depth charges and falling 
off target. The results showed that the mine essentially met all 
tactical specifications. After the development took measures to 
correct the problems surfaced during the test, a follow-up 
design-finalization test was done in March-May 1982. It was a 
success. The development of the M-1B has a significant military 
advantage in terms of enhanced active attack of contact mines 
and expanded useful area. 
  (iii) Test of microprocessor-based combination mines 
  In June-August 1985, the first-generation 
microprocessor-based mine developed by the Dalian Surface Vessel 
Design Institute of the Navy was tested at the Liaonan Test 
Range. The outcome indicated that the design of the 
microprocessor-based combination mine was sound. This test 
showed that it was possible to consolidate all kinds of fuses 
for a bottom mine to have a programmable combination fuse that 
has a unique feature to alter the capability of the mine. Then, 
one mine can be used to replace a variety of mines. It had a 
revolutionary impact on mine development. 
  (iv) Test of rocket engine rising mine 
  Between 1985 and December 1986, the first-generation rocket 
engine rising mine developed by the 710th Institute of the 
Seventh Research Academy was tested at the Liaonan Test Range. 
This test was organized by the mine testing laboratory of the 
Liaonan Test Range. People from relevant department of the Navy, 
China Shipbuilding Industry Corporation, the Seventh Research 
Academy, the 710th Institute and the 884 Plant also participated 
the test. A number of destroyers, frigates, and submarine 
hunters were used to deploy 20 large depth charges and one armed 
mine; 42 mines were tested. Furthermore, experimental data was 
effectively recorded from various instruments such as a mine 
fuse tester, a NC-2 internal measurement device, a Model 7910 
mine fuse remote tester and an electronic radio location system. 
The test followed the "test procedure for mine design 
finalization" written by Liaonan Test Range Senior Engineer Wang 
Shiming [3769 0013 2494] and Li Dexu [2621 1795 2485]. The test 
proved that all major tactical characteristics such as mine 
floating, fuse separation, regional property, resistance against 
sweeping, current resistance, underwater explosion resistance 
and overall deployment, have met combat requirements. In 
October-December 1989, a production model finalization test was 
conducted at the Liaonan Test Range. It was found that the 
performance of this rocket engine floating mine is at an 
advanced domestic level. 
<H5>  (2) Test of Anti-Submarine Weapon Systems </H5>
  An anti-submarine weapon system is usually comprised of a 
sonar detector, control panel, launch devices, and depth charges 
or torpedoes. As progress is being made in science and 
technology, submarines are also becoming more sophisticated. 
During the process of development of naval weapons, China also 
developed and tested some anti-submarine weapon systems. 
  (i) Test of the 2500 depth-charge anti-submarine system 
  The 2500 depth-charge anti-submarine system consists of 10 
subsystems, including a sonar, depth-charge-firing control 
panel, rocket engine depth-charge launcher, electric aiming 
device, charge thrower, large depth-charge launcher and 
depth-charge deployment stand. In December 1975, a bow attack 
test of the system was carried out in Taiqinggong, Qingdao. In 
January 1976, a stern attack test of the system was done in 
Lushun. It was found that the 2500 depth-charge anti-submarine 
system operated reliably and stably. Its tactical performance is 
close to that of comparable systems made abroad. In May-June 
1982 and March-June 1983, two design-finalization tests for the 
2500 depth-charge anti-submarine system were conducted at the 
Liaonan Test Range. Both tests were organized by Chief of Staff 
Gao Fusheng [7559 1381 3932] and Director Chen Yutang [7115 3768 
1016]. The tests involved 35 frigates and destroyers and six 
helicopters and launched 160 rocket depth charges in accuracy 
tests and actual firing tests. In the tests, optical instruments 
were used on land and synchronous cameras were used on ships to 
record the relevant data. In addition, helicopter-mounted 
cameras were used to pinpoint locations where the 
rocket-propelled depth charges fell. The results showed that the 
accuracy of the 2500 depth-charge anti-submarine system could 
meet its major tactical requirements. 
  (ii) Test of digital control panel depth-charge 
anti-submarine system 
  In March-May 1981, the digital control panel of the 
anti-submarine depth charge developed by the 716th Institute of 
the 7th Research Academy was tested in the East China Sea. From 
December 1983 to January 1984, a Model 2500 depth-charge 
anti-submarine system equipped with such a digital control panel 
was tested at the Liaonan Test Range. The digital control panel 
was found to work smoothly and reliably. The 2500 anti-submarine 
depth-charge system equipped with the digital control panel is 
more reliable and accurate in use. 
  (iii) Test of anti-submarine torpedo system 
  From August 1975 to January 1976, an anti-submarine torpedo 
system was tested in two stages at the Liaonan Test Range. The 
first stage was to perform actual and simulated torpedo 
launching from a submarine using a periscope. The second stage 
involved the launch of Y-3 torpedoes from a nuclear-powered 
submarine against surface ships. The results showed that both 
actual and simulated torpedo launches were successful. The 
submarine-based torpedo system could function smoothly and 
stably with an accuracy that meets requirements. 
<H5>  Section 4. Test of Ship Gun Weapon System </H5>
<H5>  (1) Test of Twin 37mm Ship Gun Weapon System </H5>
  At the end of 1980, the twin 37mm ship gun weapon system was 
tested at the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range. The test was carried 
out in two stages on land and at sea. The Liaoxi Ship Gun Test 
Range did a great deal of technical preparation work on testing 
technique, measurement, timing, target, weather and operator 
training to complete the land test. In the tests, the weapon 
system was found to be unstable. The cause was identified by the 
development unit and the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range. After 
taking corrective measures, it was retested in April 1981. All 
items listed in the outline were smoothly completed. The land 
test results showed that every tactical specification was 
essentially met and it was ready for design-finalization tests 
at sea. 
  In mid-December 1982, the twin 37mm ship gun weapon system 
underwent design-finalization testing at the Liaoxi Ship Gun 
Test Range. The tests progressed in the order of dynamic problem 
solving, fixed surface target gunnery and remote control drone 
gunnery. The problem-solving part passed and there was a high 
percentage of hits on the targets. The twin 37mm ship gun 
primarily relied on the calibration method to improve its 
accuracy for an air target. Since weather reports were not 
available to the antiaircraft gunners, it was impossible to fire 
accurately. Later, in a simulated firing test after adopting a 
scheme proposed by Zhu Xibin [2612 6932 2430] of the Systems 
Engineering Department of China Shipbuilding Industry 
Corporation, the accuracy was significantly improved. 
Satisfactory results were obtained in a drone firing test. The 
design-finalization testing was successfully completed in 
December of the same year. All tactical specifications have met 
design requirements. During the same period, the 
design-finalization testing was completed on land and at sea for 
a similar twin 30mm ship gun weapon system. 
  The test of the twin 37mm ship gun weapon system II that is 
used to shoot down anti-ship missiles was tested at the Liaoxi 
Ship Gun Test Range in October 1987. In this test, in addition 
to completing various technical preparation work, an ultralow 
target with a reflective area of 0.1 meter square and a 
low-altitude towed target were deployed, a digital automatic 
recorder was developed and an experimental scheme to suppress 
the dynamic accuracy of a small area ultralow-altitude target to 
allow the test to proceed smoothly. On this basis, the power, 
resolution, reaction time and dynamic tacking accuracy of the 
twin 37mm ship gun II with reference to low-altitude and 
ultralow-altitude targets were investigated. It was found that 
this ship gun system could detect and track targets in time. Its 
accuracy against low-altitude towed targets was excellent. 
<H5>  (2) Test of Twin 100mm Ship Gun Weapon System </H5>
  Design-finalization testing for the twin 100mm ship gun 
weapon system was conducted in two stages; on land and at sea. 
The stage done on land was primarily focused on its dynamic 
accuracy and the sea phase was to evaluate its firing accuracy. 
Its reliability and tactical performance were tested throughout 
the entire process. 
  In May 1982, the twin 100mm ship gun was tested on land at 
the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range. This included dynamic accuracy 
tests with reference to constant-speed targets traveling 
straight on the sea, targets flying horizontally at constant 
speed, and diving targets. The test results on targets at sea 
show that this ship gun system is reliable, stable, and accurate 
enough to meet all specifications. 
  In 1983, the twin 100mm ship gun was equipped with the first 
medium-caliber automatic shell supply system independently 
developed by China. After going through anchoring test, static 
and dynamic problem solving at high speed, and functional drill 
at sea, the service behavior of the twin 100mm ship gun was 
further evaluated under intense longitudinal and transverse 
rolling. In addition, it also underwent firing accuracy tests 
using fixed surface targets, towed targets, and remote control 
drones. 
  The twin 100mm ship gun weapon system passed two stages of 
rigorous test, including close to 200 dynamic accuracy tests and 
firing nearly 1,000 rounds in the gunnery tests. It was proved 
to meet all design specifications. It is stable, reliable, 
accurate and could work automatically around the clock in all 
weather conditions. 
  From 1972 through 1987, the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range 
organized tests on 6 different ship guns in 3 different 
calibers, 7 models of radars of 2 different types, 7 models of 
control panels of 3 different kinds, and 5 models of ship gun 
weapon systems in 3 different calibers. In addition, on the 
basis of its experience, they also prepared the "test procedure 
for the design finalization of ship gun weapon system," "test 
procedure for the design finalization of tracking radar," "test 
procedure for the design finalization of ship gun firing control 
panel," and "test procedure for the design finalization of ship 
gun weapon system on the sea." 
<H5>  (3) Testing of Twin 130mm Ship Gun Weapon System </H5>
  In 1971, the digitally controlled twin 130mm ship gun weapon 
system developed by the 368 Plant needed to be tested. The 
Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range had just been constructed. The plant 
created a test team by pulling technical talent from different 
organizations. They were trained at Baicheng Conventional Weapon 
Test Range while they prepared for this task. In the fall of 
1972, the twin 130mm ship gun system was tested for the first 
time at the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range. Due to lack of 
experience, it was directly installed on a ship to conduct test 
at sea without going through any land tests. Consequently, major 
technical problems such as lack of coordination were 
encountered. The test was terminated. A review of this 
experience led us to understand and follow the procedure that 
land tests must be conducted before any test can be conducted at 
sea. 
  In 1973, the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range began to test the 
twin 130mm ship gun system on land to verify the feasibility, 
coordination, and stability of the system, and to evaluate the 
dynamic accuracy of the system using the sea surface as a 
background. The land accuracy test had to be conducted using 
model sea combat conditions; ultralow-altitude targets were used 
to simulate anti-ship missiles. These were the difficulties of 
the test. In particular, it was necessary to determine 
accurately any deviation from every theoretical factor. After 
numerous attempts, Yang Banglin [2799 2831 2651] at the test 
range wrote a program entitled "solution to theoretical values 
of various firing factors" to solve this problem. In 1973, the 
testing of individual units of radar, control panel and ship gun 
began. In 1975, design-finalization testing of the entire system 
was conducted. Through dynamic accuracy test using ships and 
aircraft as targets, and target practice using fixed surface 
targets and towed targets, the performance of the twin 130mm 
ship gun weapon system was evaluated. The test results showed 
that the system worked smoothly with excellent accuracy. The 
plan was feasible, but not very reliable. 
  In October 1980, the twin 130mm ship gun system was tested 
at 
sea at the Liaoxi Ship Gun Test Range. The focal point and 
difficulty was its firing accuracy test. Based on the experience 
acquired in gunnery tests on water, an aerial camera was used to 
measure the actual distance between the water splash and the 
bull's eye to obtain the relevant parameters to calculate the 
range and bearing deviation. Thus, the key technical issue with 
regard to the accuracy test at sea was resolved. After it was 
qualified for tracking accuracy, its firing accuracy was tested 
using fixed and towed targets. Finally, a remote control target 
ship was used to test its firepower in real combat situations. 
While it was found that the system was highly accurate, it was 
still not very reliable. After the systems were modified to a 
multi-processor distributive function ship gun system using 
brand-new, highly reliable components and technology by the 
713rd Institute and the 368th Plant, it was tested in Zhoushan 
in 1986. After a number of target practice tests using fixed and 
towed targets, the capability of this ship gun system was 
substantially enhanced. It was more reliable and accurate. 
<H5>  Section 5. Testing of Navigational Equipment </H5>
  There is a variety of navigational equipment. Furthermore, 
it 
needs to be tested under dynamic conditions in the ocean, which 
makes its testing more difficult. The navigational equipment 
test laboratory of the naval test base, in collaboration with 
the appropriate institutes and factories, developed a variety of 
dynamic bearing and level measuring instruments and 
high-precision inertial navigational equipment for ship use. It 
imported a highly accurate ship location measuring device that 
solved the problems associated with measuring such navigational 
parameters as bearing, transverse rocking angle, longitudinal 
rocking angle, ship location and cruising speed under different 
test conditions. It created the necessary condition for the 
successful testing of navigational equipment. 
<H5>  (1) Testing of Radio Navigational Equipment and Combined </H5>
Navigational Equipment 
  From July to October 1970, the navigational equipment test 
laboratory organized a test of the "Changhe 3" radio 
navigational equipment. Because the only instrument available 
was an optical theodolite, the test was severely affected by the 
weather and visibility. Furthermore, the cruising range of the 
test ship was limited. It was impossible to provide real time 
results. The experimental period was extended. In May 1984, the 
navigational equipment test laboratory simultaneously conducted 
the design-finalization tests for two models of satellite/Omega 
combined navigational equipment developed by the 765th Plant and 
the 750th Plant and by the 20th Institute of the 10th Research 
Academy, respectively. The location accuracy of the 
satellite/Omega combined systems were checked against that of 
the high-accuracy radio location equipment. It was found that 
its accuracy met the design specification. 
<H5>  (2) Testing of Platform Compass </H5>
  In July 1970, the navigational equipment test laboratory 
conducted a development test of the 502 platform compass at sea 
to validate its feasibility. Due to the use of outdated 
equipment and test methods, it failed. This failure brought us 
some beneficial experience and a valuable lesson. After 1971, 
the navigational equipment test laboratory concentrated on the 
development of precision measurement instrumentation for bearing 
and level. Some results were obtained. Su Laizhi [5685 0171 
0037] proposed a dual display angle measuring platform which 
solved the problem associated with the measurement of bearing 
accuracy under different dynamic conditions. It minimized the 
effect of rocking on the bearing measurement. However, it could 
not provide a real-time answer. Yao Shaoshi [1202 1421 1102] 
proposed using a long-focal-length aerial camera and a 
high-precision measurement system to form a level accuracy 
measurement scheme. Furthermore, he proposed using a joint base 
to overcome the effect of hull distortion during rocking on the 
measurement of level accuracy in order to solve the problem of 
measuring level accuracy under dynamics conditions. At the same 
time, the navigational equipment test laboratory was also doing 
research on test methods, equipment installation, and 
calibration and accuracy evaluation. 
  From 1975 to 1989, the navigational equipment test 
laboratory 
conducted developmental tests, accuracy evaluation tests and 
design-finalization tests for five platform compasses, including 
the H/HPL-001 developed by the 455 Plant and 457 Plant, the 
H/HPL-002 developed by the 707 Institute, and the H/HPL-003 
developed by the 442 Plant and Harbin Institute of Shipbuilding. 
These tests involved numerous tasks, multiple voyages, and long 
test cycles. In order to speed up the tests, they worked day and 
night to take advantage of better weather conditions. In some 
cases, they went to sea 6 days a week to complete assignments on 
time. 
<H5>  (3) Testing of Inertial Navigation Systems </H5>
  An inertial navigation system provides parameters such as 
bearing, transverse rocking angle, longitudinal rocking angle, 
cruising speed, northerly speed, easterly speed and ship 
location. It is a piece of independent, highly accurate 
navigational equipment. It requires extremely high accuracy and 
long testing periods. 
  In the fourth quarter of 1976, the navigational equipment 
test laboratory conducted its initial development test on the 
915-IIA inertial navigational equipment to validate its design 
and inspect the accuracy of each navigational parameter. The 
test results showed that the design was feasible. However, the 
accuracy was poor. In 1978 and 1983, tests were done on the 
915-IIA and 915-IIB inertial navigational equipment for 
accuracy. Due to technical reasons associated with the inertial 
navigational systems and outdated measurement technique, the 
tests did not generate the desired result. In 1985, the 
navigational equipment test laboratory again conducted six tests 
on the two models described above. Because of the high-accuracy 
radio location equipment used, and also because the two systems 
were improved somewhat, excellent results were obtained. 
  In 1986, the navigational equipment test laboratory of the 
Naval Test Base performed incoming inspection for imported 
navigational equipment over a period of 3 years to check its 
accuracy and reliability. In order to complete the inspection 
work within the period specified in the contract, director Yao 
Shaoshi proposed a scheme to simultaneously record and process 
bearing accuracy data independently. They developed the 
necessary equipment for real-time data acquisition. In addition, 
any error and the technical condition of the product being 
inspected can be reviewed immediately. A specific course and a 
particular mode of ship motion that can produce the largest 
error are chosen to conduct the test. Once a problem was 
discovered, it was immediately brought to the attention of the 
technical staff of the manufacturer. The data is used as the 
evidence to assess the actual level of the product being 
inspected. 
  The navigational equipment test laboratory insists on 
quality. Problems are exposed by testing. They often assist 
development units to locate the source in order to find a fix. 
In March 1988, during a check of the 915-IID navigational test 
equipment, it was found that the ship location accuracy error 
was excessive. The navigational equipment test laboratory 
conducted analysis, testing, and verification at the same time 
and finally found the source of the problem. The 707th Institute 
adopted a number of technical measures to solve the problem and 
the quality of the product was improved. 
  From 1976 to 1989, the navigational equipment test 
laboratory 
tested four models of navigational equipment. During the course, 
in order to meet the stringent accuracy requirement, especially 
in bearing and level accuracy measurement, it was necessary to 
develop a set of automated high-accuracy shipboard inertial 
navigational equipment. On the basis of a comprehensive survey 
and concept validation, Zheng Zizhen [6774 2737 4394] presented 
an astronavigation scheme that is comprised of a microcomputer, 
an astro-theodolite and a high-accuracy radio locator. This is a 
highly accurate, automated dynamic real-time inertial 
navigational system that combines optics, mechanics, electronics 
and microelectronics. Its use not only completed the assignment 
but also improved the degree of automation of the test. 
<H5>  Chapter XXVI </H5>
<H5>  Section 1. Metallic Materials for Military Use </H5>
<H5>  (5) Metallic Panel Material </H5>
  The injector plate is a critical component of a the injector 
system of a liquid hydrogen/liquid oxygen engine. It operates in 
a hostile environment: not only must it work at high 
temperatures up to 3,000-3,500C but also at low 
temperatures below 100-150C. This challenging task was 
jointly tackled by the Beijing Institute of Steel Research, 
Taiyuan Steel Works, Tianjin Institute of Metallurgy, Tianjin 
Experimental Metal Works and Beijing Institute of Aerospace 
Materials. After repeated testing, the composite face plate was 
successfully used on the Long March-3 rocket. Its performance 
characteristics are more advanced than those for comparable 
products made by other countries. 
<H5>  (6) Metallic Material and Pressure-Resistant Hull Material </H5>
for Submarines 
  Due to its excellent heat-conduction properties, copper 
alloy 
is widely used in submarine heat exchangers. It must be capable 
of withstanding high pressure, as well as impact and corrosion 
from sea water when the submarine is cruising at high speed, to 
ensure its integrity during use. In order to supply the white 
brass for the main and auxiliary condensers, the technical staff 
at the Luoyang Copper Processing Plant, with the cooperation of 
the Luoyang Institute of Shipbuilding Materials, developed two 
different grades of white brass condenser tube in just over a 
year to meet an urgent need in submarine construction. On this 
basis, the Luoyang Copper Processing Plant used an RF induction 
furnace to melt copper and a low-frequency oven to maintain its 
temperature. It was cast in a semi-continuous manner. Zirconium 
was added to solve the crystallization problem. They 
successfully developed a more superior condensed white brass 
plate. At the same time, the team at the Luoyang Copper 
Processing Plant added small amounts of metallic elements in the 
condensed white brass to strengthen the plate. It solved the 
strength requirement in hot rolling to meet a need in submarine 
development. 
  Pressure-Resistant Hull Material 
  In 1960, Anshan Iron and Steel began to develop 921, 922 and 
923 steel with a yield strength on the order of 60 kg. Until 
1966, a breakthrough was made to meet all technical 
specifications. In addition, a high-strength, highly malleable, 
radiation-resistant steel that can be welded was developed as a 
pressure-resistant hull material. A new stress corrosion 
resistant alloy tube developed by Beijing Institute of Steel 
Research and Shanghai Fifth Iron and Steel Plant is used in 
submarine evaporators. It was given a first place national 
science and technology progress award. 
<H5>  (7) Friction-Reduction Materials </H5>
  In the 1960s, Beijing Institute of Steel Research, Shanghai 
Institute of Non-Ferrous Metals, Central China Institute of 
Metallurgy and Beijing Institute of Powder Metallurgy were 
engaged in research on friction-reduction materials for specific 
circumstances. A number of accomplishments were obtained. In the 
early 1970s a dynamically sealed graphite lubricant and a 
metal/plastic composite lubricant were developed for combustion 
turbine and jet engines for aircraft use. The latter has 
advantages such as low friction coefficient, low erosion, high 
strength, good thermal conductivity and a small thermal 
expansion coefficient similar to those of a fluorine containing 
plastic. It is suitable to operate in a vacuum, at low 
temperature and in an inert-gas environment. It has been 
successfully used in aerospace applications. Its performance 
characteristics are at an advanced level compared to similar 
products made abroad. A boron-carbide pneumatic bearing, 
developed in the late 1970s for aerospace and ship applications, 
has advantages such as high density, high hardness, low specific 
gravity, high erosion and pinch resistance, high corrosion 
resistance, and low static friction coefficient. Its dimensions 
remain stable after long periods of use at high temperatures and 
it can be stopped and started for more than 10,000 times. In the 
early 1980s, a high-temperature vacuum self-lubricating bearing 
material for an agile-frequency magnetron and a floating seal 
material for rocket engine fuel were developed. 

